 Even insiders make mistakes.  Sometimes, big, fat, $7 million-dollar mistakes.  Alpheus L. Ellis, a director of NCNB Corp. and, until recently, its largest shareholder, sold too soon when he unloaded a huge block of the regional banking company's stock last month for $43 million.  Mr. Ellis sold 928,230 shares for $46.32 a share on July 5, according to a recent filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  But since he sold, NCNB stock has climbed steadily, closing yesterday at $54.25, up 75 cents in composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange.  If Mr. Ellis had waited just four weeks, he would have made an extra $7.4 million.  Waiting a month would have meant more money for NCNB, too.  That's because the stock Mr. Ellis sold was part of an 8.5 million-share secondary offering.  "In retrospect, it would have been nice to have more dollars," said Rusty Page, NCNB's senior vice president and head of investor relations.  But he said the sales price was more than two times the company's per-share book value {assets minus liabilities}.  Pricing the shares higher "would have been kind of greedy, and we're not that way," said Mr. Page.  Mr. Ellis couldn't be reached for comment.  But don't fret too much about the Tarpon Springs, Fla., banker.  The shares he sold, which were indirectly owned, represented only a tiny fraction of his NCNB holdings.  Mr. Ellis acquired the stock in 1984 as part of a deal to sell his bank-holding company, Ellis Banking Corp., to NCNB.  He retains 6,903,274 shares, or a 7.2% stake.  ---  FEATHERING THE NEST EGG: The four founders of Bonneville Pacific Corp. sold 383,144 shares of company stock to an employee stock ownership plan at less than the market price.  A review of the Salt Lake City power-company's incentive and compensation package disclosed "we didn't have a very meaningful retirement plan," said Robert L. Wood, one of the founders and the company's chief financial officer.  To rectify the situation, an ESOP was set up for the firm's 103 employees.  The shares, which represent a 2.9% stake in Bonneville, were sold on June 14 and June 30 for $7.83 each.  The market price on those days was $10.375 and $11.75, respectively.  Bonneville Pacific shares closed yesterday at $10.50, down 25 cents in national over-the-counter trading.  Mr. Wood said he is somewhat concerned the retirement plan isn't diversified enough.  But employees, as they near retirement age, will be able to "diversify their individual accounts" into other holdings, he said.  In addition, SEC filings show that late last month two vice presidents of the company sold smaller stakes, 3,000 and 300 shares, respectively.  ---  UNCOUPLING: At Trinity Industries Inc., a Dallas-based maker of structural steel products and railroad cars, two insiders recently sold chunks of their stock.  On June 23, Jess T. Hay, a Trinity director and chairman of Lomas & Nettleton Financial Corp., sold 17,500 shares, or more than three-quarters of his holding, SEC filings show.  Most of the stock was sold at $42 a share, for proceeds of about $735,000.  The stock closed yesterday at $44.50, up $1 in composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange.  Mr. Hay couldn't be reached for comment.  On July 17, Richard G. Brown, a senior vice president, sold 5,817 shares for $241,405, or $41.50 a share.  That was a bit more than half his stock, but Mr. Brown said he still has "lots of stock options left."  He added, "I'm 65 years old and I'm reorganizing my finances."  ---  HARD DOLLARS, SOFTWARE: Matthew Griffin, the Egghead Inc. vice president who accumulated 100,000 shares {5,000 of them indirectly} July 7 to July 18 for more than $1.1 million, has been with the software retailer only since February.  Previously he had spent most of his career as a developer of high-rise buildings on the West Coast.  About a year ago, he and two colleagues formed a closely held company to engage in "buying operating companies and restructuring them," but they abandoned that plan to spend full time as the new management of Egghead.  One of their main priorities, Mr. Griffin says, is "declaring war on shrink."  He wants to reduce the 2.6% of sales that are now lost through inventory mysteriously disappearing.  As for his big purchase, Mr. Griffin calls it "partly an investment and partly a signal to the community and to employees that we believe in what we're doing."  Rite Aid Corp. and its president, Martin L. Grass, were indicted by an Ohio grand jury on bribery charges.  The charges were brought in connection with an alleged attempt by Mr. Grass to bribe a state pharmacy regulator in April.  Although the indictments were handed up June 14, the Cuyahoga County court kept them secret until yesterday.  Lt. James Veres, who is in charge of the county sheriff's detectives division, said the secrecy was necessary so that further allegations involving state government officials could be investigated.  No other parties have been charged.  The indictments against Mr. Grass and the company represent an important juncture in the bizarre and protracted case, which has already harmed the reputation of Rite Aid, the nation's largest drug-store chain.  It isn't clear how much the developments could ultimately hurt Rite Aid's business in Ohio, where it operates 349 stores.  Moreover, regulators indicated that even if the company is convicted of bribery, its license to do business in the state probably won't be revoked.  The court could, however, impose other penalties.  Rite Aid expressed confidence that Mr. Grass and the company would eventually be exonerated, but the stock market reacted negatively to the news.  In active trading on the New York Stock Exchange, Rite Aid closed at $38.75 a share, down 87.5 cents.  On April 27, Mr. Grass, the 35-year-old son of Rite Aid Chairman Alex Grass, was arrested by sheriff's deputies in a hotel room in Cleveland after he handed a $33,000 corporate check to Melvin Wilczynski, a state pharmacy board member.  In the hotel room, Mr. Grass also offered Mr. Wilczynski about $36,000 in health benefits for himself and his ailing mother.  In exchange, Mr. Wilczynski was asked to sign six copies of an undated resignation letter addressed to Ohio Gov. Richard F. Celeste, who makes pharmacy board appointments.  The meeting was videotaped by county sheriff's deputies who were waiting next door.  The tape was used in presenting the case to the grand jury.  In addition, the corporate plane in which Mr. Grass flew from Harrisburg, Pa., was confiscated and used as evidence of a "criminal tool."  An assistant county prosecutor, William R. Caine, charged in April that the payment was part of a Rite Aid scheme to gain control of the regulatory board and to soften vigorous regulatory enforcement against the corporation's 349 Ohio pharmacies, which contribute about 10% of the company's business.  Mr. Grass's attorneys and Rite Aid officials reiterated their denial of any wrongful intent.  "We don't have any formal statement yet, but we would stick by our previous comment," said Suzanne Mead, a Rite Aid official.  The company has consistently claimed that the charges are without merit because the payment Mr. Grass made to Mr. Wilczynski was a legitimate buy-out of a consulting contract, not a bribe.  "As the facts become public," Ms. Mead said, "we feel they {Martin Grass and Rite Aid} will be exonerated."  The bribery charge is a third-degree felony.  If convicted, Mr. Grass faces a prison term of three to 10 years and substantial fines, according to Lt. Veres.  Neither Martin Grass nor his attorneys could be reached for comment.  Rite Aid officials declined to comment any further on the impact of the indictment on business operations.  Mr. Wilczynski, who cooperated with investigators in the case, declined to comment on the indictments or to predict how the state pharmacy board might respond.  "There are eight of us," he said.  "I don't know where the board would go as a group."  Even if Rite Aid is convicted, industry analysts don't expect the case to cause the company lasting financial damage.  "In the worst case, there would be a fine for the corporation, but they would continue to do business in the state," predicted Monroe Greenstein, an analyst for Bear Stearns & Co. "States are loathe to shut business out of their borders."  Ohio Board of Pharmacy members said they expect to take a wait-and-see approach to the case.  According to board counsel David Rowland, such criminal cases aren't within the panel's jurisdiction.  The company apparently hasn't violated any pharmacy laws, he said, and the board hasn't any power to impose administrative penalties in bribery cases, even those involving board members.  Settsu Corp. of Japan proposed to acquire R.L. Crain Inc. for 63 million Canadian dollars (US$53.3 million).  The purchase of the business-form producer would be the latest in a series of acquisitions in the U.S. and Canada by Settsu, a paperboard-products company.  In October, Settsu bought Uarco Inc., a Barrington, Ill., business-form producer.  Crain said Settsu agreed to buy all its shares outstanding for C$12 a share.  Settsu also agreed to buy Crain's convertible debentures at C$1,068.25 for each C$1,000 principal amount plus accrued interest.  The Canadian company said its controlling shareholder, Craisec Ltd., agreed to tender its shares.  Craisec, which is controlled by members of the Crain family, holds about 79% of the voting rights of Crain shares through ownership of special common shares with 10 votes each.  A tender offer won't be made until regulatory approvals have been obtained and other unspecified conditions have been met.  Crain said Bowater Canadian Ltd. also agreed to tender its unspecified holding of Crain shares and debentures.  Craisec rejected in 1986 a proposal for Crain from Bowater Canadian's parent, Bowater Inc., a Darien, Conn., newsprint producer.  Crain had 1988 net income of C$2 million and sales of C$121.9 million.  It has more than 1,000 employees and nine manufacturing plants.  In a darkened room, nine pilots peer at a video monitor and listen intently to a recording of calm voices preparing for an emergency landing of United Airlines Flight 173 at the Portland, Ore., airport.  On the monitor, an arrow charts the plane's course on a map of the Portland area.  A clock counts down the seconds.  All at once, the tape ends.  After a moment of stunned silence, the meaning sinks in: Some of the men whose voices were just heard are dead.  Flight 173 ran out of fuel and sputtered into a forest, killing 10 people, including two crew members.  When the classroom lights come on, the pilots -- in this case, Eastern Airlines recruits -- slowly start to pick apart what went wrong on that day in 1978.  By the time they finish, they come up with about 10 examples of poor communication and lack of coordination among the doomed plane's three well-trained, experienced pilots.  Not a flattering review.  But a useful one.  So useful that sessions like this go on at every major airline and most small ones these days, with pilots listening to the disasters of others in hopes of avoiding their own.  In fact, such "cockpit resource management" training is credited with helping keep last month's crash of United Flight 232 in Sioux City, Iowa, from being more deadly than it was.  Safety experts say teamwork and resourcefulness in the cockpit are primarily what got the crippled jet to the airfield, where it cartwheeled to a halt.  A stunning 185 of the 296 people on board survived.  The crew's quick-wittedness wasn't a fluke, many believe, and may well become a model of how a cockpit should work during an emergency.  The crew members' cockpit training clearly came into play, says William Traub, United's vice president for flight training.  "We just keep emphasizing to pilots the importance of using every resource possible in an emergency," he says.  The men on Flight 232 certainly used a few.  As soon as he heard the aircraft's tail engine explode, Capt. Dennis Fitch, a United DC-10 training pilot aboard as a passenger, sent word to the cockpit that he was available to help.  Capt. Alfred C. Haynes, a 33-year United veteran, readily accepted.  The airliner, with the hydraulics that allow pilots to control it crippled, was spiraling downward at about 2,400 feet a minute.  Scrunching down on his knees between the crew seats, Capt. Fitch experimented with the throttles.  The two pilots found that they could keep the nose of the plane up if they advanced the two remaining engines to full throttle, and that they could steer, with great difficulty, by varying the thrust of each engine.  Capt. Haynes's willingness to accept the advice of his colleagues and the help of Capt. Fitch appears to have been vital.  Federal officials say preliminary data show the jet leveled off after Capt. Fitch went to the cockpit.  "It was just going in circles until that training captain got there," one official says.  Meanwhile, Capt. Haynes talked with air-traffic controllers about possible landing sites, and the flight engineer, D.J. Dvorak, sought advice by radio from United's San Francisco maintenance base and its Denver operations center.  Capt. Haynes, who with other crew members survived the crash, brushes aside any talk of cockpit heroics.  "We put our best resources and knowledge together and did what we felt was best," he told reporters upon leaving a Sioux City hospital last week.  "We made it up as we went along."  Similar teamwork paid off on another troubled flight earlier this year, United says.  Capt. David M. Cronin, who in February safely landed a Boeing 747 in Honolulu after its cargo door blew off, praises flight engineer Randal Thomas for taking the initiative to recommend dumping fuel over the Pacific Ocean.  "I was thinking of a million other things, trying to keep the airplane from going into the drink," Capt. Cronin says.  Also, at a critical point, co-pilot Gregory Slader, a 747 instructor, disagreed with Capt. Cronin over how far to extend the crippled plane's flaps -- and prevailed.  Cockpit training encourages co-pilots and flight engineers "to be advocates" who question the captain when they think something is wrong, Capt. Cronin says.  The first step away from standard flight-simulator training came in the late '70s, when Northwest Airlines started trying to address human factors that can lead to accidents.  It added realistic everyday annoyances, like air-traffic control interruptions and noise, to simulator sessions, and graded crews as a team.  United started its crew-coordination program in 1981, after a series of emergencies blamed on cockpit errors.  Now most airlines give pilots such a course when they are hired and require one-day refreshers every year.  The idea is to create "a superb, self-correcting team, so if an individual does make a mistake and screw up, the team is working well and corrects it," says Richard Hackman, a Harvard University social psychology professor who studies cockpit crews.  "There is case after case where the aircraft technically was able to fly out of trouble, and the crew members individually were able to, and yet they got into trouble."  In cockpit resource management training, pilots learn from others' mistakes.  In the case of United Flight 173 recently reviewed by Eastern's nine recruits, the doomed plane circled Portland for nearly 90 minutes, its landing gear stuck.  On the cockpit tape, the captain appeared to postpone landing and didn't acknowledge the second officer's warnings about fuel.  No one challenged him, though the aircraft was perilously close to empty.  By the time the captain and crew realized the extent of the problem, the engines were failing.  At that point, the recorder goes silent.  After listening to the tape, Eastern's trainees break into three groups to discuss how the captain, first officer and flight engineer each behaved.  Their instructor, Paul Richardson, writes their suggestions on an easel, linking them.  The captain disregarded input from the second officer, one trainee says.  No one ever related the amount of fuel remaining to the amount of time it would take to land, says another.  The first officer never spoke up, says a third.  When the flight engineer announced that only 4,000 pounds of fuel remained, the captain thought that was for each tank, but the junior officer never corrected him.  By the time the class finishes, a chain of about 10 events adds up to trouble, even though no single one caused the accident.  Teamwork, however, doesn't come naturally to many pilots.  They often enter commercial aviation after years in the military, flying fighter jets solo -- no cockpit crew or scores of passengers to contend with.  If something happens, "their attitude is, 'Get those other pilots out of here and I'll take care of this,'" says Harvard's Mr. Hackman.  "It's understandable, but it's not the optimum response."  The trick may be to balance that sense of self-reliance with a learned ability to listen to subordinates.  Tapes show that the co-pilot on an Air Florida jet that crashed in a snowstorm in Washington, D.C., in 1982 raised questions about the amount of slush on the wings before takeoff.  Again during takeoff, he repeatedly warned that something was "not right."  Through it all the captain remained silent until the co-pilot called out, "We're going down]"  "I know it," were the captain's last words.  The Philippine government, looking for a boost to its sputtering effort to privatize industries, said it has agreed to sell a huge nickel refinery to a group led by one of the refinery's former owners for $325 million.  Felipe Bince, an official with the government's Asset Privatization Trust, said a letter of agreement was signed yesterday to sell Nonoc Mining & Industrial Corp.  It would mark the largest transaction yet in the government's sputtering privatization effort.  The Asset Trust agreed to sell Nonoc to Philippine Nickel Co., a new company now being formed for the purchase and headed by Filipino-Spanish industrialist Jesus Cabarrus.  The individuals also paid the Asset Trust a non-refundable 105 million pesos (US$4.9 million) which the sales agreement terms "earnest money."  Philippine Nickel has 60 days to complete two preliminary terms for the purchase.  As a down payment, it must assume Nonoc debts, which Mr. Bince said total "more than $70 million," with the approval of Nonoc's creditors.  The company must also show proof of access to $100 million it says is needed to rehabilitate the plant.  The group has an additional month to demonstrate its access to another $100 million for operating capital.  Following a one-year grace period, Philippine Nickel has six years in semi-annual installments to pay the remainder of the $325 million.  Philippine Nickel will be headed by Mr. Cabarrus, who indirectly held a major stake in Nonoc until government banks foreclosed the property in 1984.  Loral Corp., a maker of radar-warning gear for jet fighters, is the target itself of lawsuits over the sale of two divisions to its chairman, Bernard L. Schwartz.  The suits, all pending in New York State Supreme Court, allege a conflict of interest on the part of Loral and its outside directors in selling the divisions to Mr. Schwartz.  Loral's sale to Mr. Schwartz stood out among recent management buyouts in that the 63-year-old chairman and chief executive officer has kept his corporate posts at Loral after purchasing the two divisions.  Loral declared Mr. Schwartz the winner of an auction for the divisions last April even though his bid was the lower of two bids made for Loral's Aircraft Braking Systems and Engineered Fabrics units.  Mr. Schwartz paid $455 million in cash and debt for the two divisions.  The only other bidder, Banner Industries Inc., Cleveland, offered $467 million in cash and debt or $457 million in cash for the divisions.  Banner has now filed a suit here calling Loral's auction "a sham."  Banner's suit seeks at least $100 million in damages, a decree nullifying the sale and a rerun of the bidding.  Banner also claims that Loral kept from it information provided to Mr. Schwartz indicating that the value of the two divisions far exceeded either bid.  Banner's New York attorney, Daniel A. Pollack, says his client now believes the businesses are worth "$600 million and possibly more."  He says Banner remains prepared to pay "whatever it takes" to acquire the divisions.  Mr. Schwartz disputes these claims and contends that Banner's chairman and chief executive, Jeffrey J. Steiner, is simply a sore loser.  "The issue," says Mr. Schwartz, "is if {Mr.  Steiner} had put up more money {for the divisions} he would've won."  Some Loral shareholders also are furious about the sale.  At least four holders are suing to void the transaction and to have a new auction.  The stockholder suits also demand that Mr. Schwartz, and the outside directors who ran the sale, pay Loral the $12 million difference between the winning and losing bids.  "It's a nice piece of money," says John Halebian, an attorney on one of the suits.  "It's not like the shareholders are quibbling over nickels and dimes," he says.  Banner, a distributor of aviation parts and a maker of fasteners, entered the bidding April 25 for Aircraft Braking Systems, based in Akron, Ohio, and Engineered Fabrics, based in Rockmart, Ga.  The Banner bid came after Loral agreed in March to sell the businesses to its chairman for $425 million in cash and debt.  Under the agreement, the sale was to close unless the special committee of outside directors received a higher bid by April 27.  When the deadline arrived, the special committee accepted the sweetened $455 million bid from Mr. Schwartz and rejected the Banner offer.  The directors explained that a $17 million "breakup fee" that Loral had agreed to pay Mr. Schwartz and his investment bank if the divisions were sold to a third party made the Banner proposal less attractive.  The suits attack the breakup fee as part of a strategy to tilt the auction in Mr. Schwartz's favor.  Banner says the fee served as "a deterrent, not an inducement" for competing bids and "bore no relation" to Mr. Schwartz's costs in preparing his offer.  The suits claim that Mr. Schwartz's relationships with members of the special committee -- especially New York attorney Robert B. Hodes, who headed the committee -- posed conflicts of interest that biased the sale process in the chairman's favor.  The holders contend that conflicts with the outside directors were inescapable because each board member was chosen by the chairman and "owes his position" to Mr. Schwartz.  Mr. Schwartz owns more than 5% of Loral's stock.  Mr. Hodes, who acknowledges that he is Mr. Schwartz's longtime friend and personal attorney, says the special committee structured the sale -- allowing 30 days for other bidders to surface -- to avoid any conflicts.  "I was aware of the potential for difficulty and took every step to avoid it," Mr. Hodes says.  The $17 million breakup fee was no giveaway to the Schwartz group, either, Mr. Hodes says.  Mr. Hodes says he negotiated the amount down from an initial $22 million fee proposed by Mr. Schwartz's investment bank, Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc., and in exchange received an unconditional firm offer for the divisions.  Banner says Loral and the special committee "dragged their heels" in responding to requests for information, imposed last-minute rule changes for the auction and didn't allow Banner representatives to meet executives at one of the divisions for sale until near the deadline for bids.  Banner also complains that the special committee refused to meet with its representatives and would only deal with Banner through Mr. Hodes.  Mr. Hodes says that the special committee also didn't meet with Mr. Schwartz during the bidding, and that Banner had full access to information about the divisions.  "I've got to believe that a person doesn't make an offer that big without being damn sure about the facts.  So I was satisfied that we hadn't withheld any information," Mr. Hodes says.  Banner says it would have bid more for the divisions if it had had information kept from it but provided to Mr. Schwartz, who used the data in soliciting financing for the purchase.  Banner claims that the withheld details included a business forecast showing cash flow doubling in 10 years, data on costs to be shared in the future between the divisions and Loral, and information about Aircraft Braking Systems becoming accredited to supply wheels and brakes for two jetliner models made by Airbus Industrie, a European consortium.  Loral acquired the Aircraft Braking Systems and Engineered Fabrics divisions in January 1987 as part of its purchase of Goodyear Tire & Rubber Co.'s aerospace business.  Following the takeover, Mr. Schwartz sought buyers for the two divisions because they didn't fit into Loral's focus on defense electronics.  Mr. Schwartz offered to buy the divisions himself after Loral failed to receive any other offers.  "That pattern is hardly consistent with a guy who's trying to steal these businesses," he says.  Banner "can be upset that I'm chairman of Loral, but they knew that ahead of time," Mr. Schwartz adds.  "They weren't obliged to enter the competition" for the divisions.  The Canadian dollar hit its highest level in eight years against the U.S. unit as money poured in to take advantage of the widening spread between U.S. and Canadian short-term interest rates.  The Canadian unit closed in Toronto at 85.12 U.S. cents, up from 84.69 cents Monday.  "Today's spurt in the dollar reflects the attractiveness of Canadian interest rates," said Aron Gampel, Bank of Nova Scotia senior economist.  U.S. short-term rates have been declining while Canadian rates have remained firm.  The spreads between Canadian and U.S. short-term rates have nearly reached record levels, said Barry Davenport, senior vice president of Treasury markets with Bank of Montreal.  "It's pushing the {Canadian} dollar up and so long as rates stay up, so will the {Canadian} dollar."  In trading yesterday, yields on three-month Canada Treasury bills widened to 4.19 percentage points above comparable U.S. rates from 4.05 points Monday.  The Bank of Canada is trying to keep Canadian interest rates high to combat inflationary pressures in the Canadian economy.  The central bank showed no signs of responding to demands from politicians and others for a relaxation of its monetary policy.  Financial analysts predicted that the central bank's influential bank rate would be little changed tomorrow from its current level of 12.36%.  The rate is what the Bank of Canada charges on its loans to commercial banks.  The central bank intervened in the money markets Monday to prevent Canadian short-term rates from following the decline in U.S. rates.  Some analysts predicted the spread between short-term Canadian and U.S. rates will widen further.  Mr. Gampel, the Bank of Nova Scotia economist, said it will probably widen to more than 4.5 percentage points by month's end.  Mr. Davenport said widening spreads could push the Canadian dollar up to 86 U.S. cents in coming weeks.  The analysts said Canadian short-term interest rates are expected to remain at current levels until the fall.  Michael Gregory, an economist with Royal Bank of Canada, said rates should begin declining in September and the dollar should follow.  He predicted the dollar will fall back to 82 U.S. cents by year end.  Mr. Gampel predicted Canadian short-term rates will decline two or three percentage points by year end, causing the dollar to fall to 80 U.S. cents.  Analysts said that on a purchasing power basis the Canadian dollar is currently substantially overvalued relative to its U.S. counterpart.  But for the high interest rates, they estimated the Canadian dollar would be trading at about 80 U.S. cents.  Canada's consumer price index rose at an annual rate of 5.4% in June, mainly because of increases in sales and excise taxes contained in recent federal and provincial budgets.  The Energy Department unveiled a five-year $19.5 billion program to correct environmental and health problems at the nation's atomic weapons plants -- the first part of a cleanup that officials predict will take 30 years and cost many billions more.  In a speech, Energy Secretary James Watkins provided a blueprint for the initial phase, acknowledging that even an optimistic timetable "passes much of the burden to the next generation."  After a top-level review of the shortcomings in environmental-protection and health-protection measures at the government nuclear facilities, the department said it proposes to spend $2.4 billion in the fiscal year starting Oct. 1 to help correct the shortcomings.  After that, the annual bill is expected to increase steadily, peaking at more than $4 billion in both fiscal 1994 and 1995.  For the entire cleanup effort, which will stretch well into the next century, the cost has been estimated at anywhere from $90 billion to $150 billion.  The money, which must still be approved by Congress, would be used to clean up pollution where federal and state safety laws are violated, repair faulty equipment and develop new procedures and technology for future waste disposal, the department said.  The plan commits the department to develop a cleanup priority list, containing known contamination and assessing the extent of yet-unknown hazards.  The department also said it will release health records of workers at weapons facilities for scientific evaluation to determine the extent of risk.  Most of the $19.5 billion will be used at 17 nuclear-weapons plants in a dozen states, but some funds would be allocated for cleanup efforts at more than 70 other government nuclear facilities, most of which have long been closed, officials said.  Among the sites considered to be heavily contaminated are the Rocky Flat plutonium-processing plant in Colorado; the Savannah River weapons plant in South Carolina; the Fernald uranium processing plant in Ohio; the Oak Ridge Reservation in Tennessee; the Idaho National Engineering Laboratory near Idaho Falls; and the Hanford Reservation in eastern Washington state.  Yields on most certificates of deposit skidded below 8% in the wake of widespread declining interest rates.  The average six-month CD targeted at consumers fell 0.17 percentage point to 7.95%, according to a weekly survey of 18 major banks by Banxquote Money Markets, a New York information service.  "Last week's decline in the federal-funds rate influenced a fall in Treasury-bill rates, which forced banks to lower their prime rate and subsequently the yields they pay on CDs," said Norberto Mehl, chairman of Banxquote.  Fed funds are overnight loans of reserves among Federal Reserve member banks.  The average yield on three-month CDs was 8.01%, down 0.13 percentage point, in the week ended yesterday.  The category was the only one yielding more than 8%.  Rates on large-denomination CDs, or jumbos, plummeted.  The average six-month jumbo, usually offered only in denominations of more than $90,000, fell more than one-third percentage point to 7.81%.  Unlike the usual experience, in recent weeks jumbo CDs have been yielding less than smaller accounts.  Generally, banks reward their biggest depositors with better yields.  In the latest week, the average one-year savings CD fell 0.16 percentage point to 7.86%, while the average one-year jumbo dropped 0.28 percentage point to 7.73%.  Among major banks surveyed by Banxquote, yields for three-month and six-month CDs remained just above 8% for banks in New York, California and Pennsylvania, while banks in Illinois, Texas and Florida were paying between 7.7% and 8%.  Banxquote surveys three major banks in each of six areas of the country.  Separately, yields on short-term bills sold by the U.S. Treasury moved sharply lower at the regular Monday auction.  Treasury-bill yields are considered important by bankers setting CD yields.  The average yield on three-month bills dropped 0.46 percentage point to 7.91%, while six-month bills dropped 0.42 to 7.74%.  MeraBank, a Phoenix, Ariz., bank that constantly fidgets with its yields -- and often offers the nation's highest -- had the best yield on six-month CDs, according to Banxquote.  MeraBank's six-month issue yielded 9.90%; certain days last week the bank offered yields of 9.95%.  CDs sold through major networks of brokers and dealers dropped sharply in the week ended yesterday but remained higher than most other types of issues, according to Banxquote.  An average yield of 8.48% was available on six-month certificates, a decrease of 0.30 percentage point.  What an irony that Howell Heflin dealt the death blow to a black who dared think for himself.  Whether Senator Heflin represents the Old South or the New South we are not entirely sure, but the Alabamian joined northern liberals to send a clear message to the William Lucases of the world: Blacks must hew to the party line or be destroyed.  Know thy place.  Strom Thurmond of South Carolina understood the significance of the 7-7 Judiciary Committee vote refusing to "give this black man a chance" by not sending his name to the full Senate to be civil-rights chief at the Justice Department.  "He's a minority, of course.  Years ago minorities didn't have a chance," he said, recalling Jim Crow.  "I know."  Joe Biden said Senator Thurmond's accusation of liberal Democrat racism against a black Republican was "a cynical setup."  But Mr. Biden, the 76th-place finisher in his law class of 85, made a pure plantation argument why Mr. Lucas must be kept down.  Senator Biden said he had "failed miserably to prove that he has some knowledge to compensate for his lack of experience."  Teddy Kennedy, whose brother decided Bobby was fully qualified to be attorney general despite no experience at all, declared that Mr. Lucas is "the wrong man for this very important job."  No white nominee has ever been rejected for agreeing with the President or saying he'd enforce Supreme Court rulings.  This party-line vote (with Democrat Dennis DeConcini backing Mr. Lucas) against a moderate black with a long history of public service and law enforcement raises the political stakes.  Mr. Lucas got smeared partly because he dared to leave the Democratic Party.  He's hardly alone.  The black police chief of Washington, D.C., just became a Republican.  Charles Evers, Mayor of Fayette, Mississippi, and brother of slain civilrights worker Medgar, switched in May because the Democratic Party "is now a party of liberal ideas and special interest groups."  Attorney General Thornburgh was right to call yesterday's vote "raw politics."  But surely this vote goes beyond partisan politics to a broad philosophical confrontation.  Mr. Lucas is part of a generation of blacks desperately worried about the deepest issues of civil rights.  Crime, drugs and welfare pathologies are all encouraged by misguided government policies that remain liberal icons.  Democrats swear fealty to the faith that civil rights is narrower, synonymous with quotas, set-asides and class-action lawsuits.  This same dead religion, incidentally, is behind the Democrats' invocation of class warfare to oppose a capital-gains tax cut.  The White House is not powerless.  Sources say that the administration is considering Bob Dole's suggestion that Mr. Lucas be made a recess appointment.  This would be good for civil-rights enforcement because otherwise the job would be vacant for months given the Senate's snail pace for confirmations.  Mr. Lucas would fill the slot through January 1991, when the next Congress begins.  This would be an excellent recess-appointment precedent since Mr. Lucas never got to make his case to the full Senate as the Constitution requires.  Most importantly, this would show that President Bush is willing to use his constitutional powers.  The Senate has made a mockery of its advice-and-consent power.  Senator Heflin earlier distinguished himself as a yahoo when he decided to vote against Robert Bork, because he "had a strange lifestyle" and "I was further disturbed by his refusal to discuss his belief in God -- or the lack thereof."  The administration could also consider other alternatives.  Mr. Lucas would make an excellent deputy attorney general.  The Democrats have said that it's just this job that Mr. Lucas shouldn't have, that he'd be fine for a job requiring his considerable managerial skills.  Whichever route the administration chooses, the important thing is to nip this liberal plantation mentality in the bud.  There is a core civil-rights issue now at stake.  If the Bush administration rolls over on the trashing of Bill Lucas, it will send a truly ugly message to America's blacks -- one political party insists that they stay on the plantation, and the other party won't fight to liberate them.  This would be an ironic disenfranchisement of blacks, whose most basic civil right is the freedom to follow their own political beliefs.  Judy W. Lansaw, 38 years old, corporate secretary, was elected a vice president of this electric utility holding company.  The U.S. will give Poland up to $50 million in sorghum, corn and butter next year, in an effort to aid the communist nation's transition to a more market-oriented economy, the White House said.  The food aid was announced in Washington and Brussels, where 24 nations are concluding a meeting to discuss ways to aid political and economic changes in Poland and Hungary.  President Bush said in a statement that the aid should help Poland overcome an increasingly critical food shortage and help ease the impact of yesterday's lifting of meat rationing and most price controls on food.  The U.S. aid includes the 8,000 metric tons of surplus commodities already scheduled to be provided to Poland in fiscal 1990, which begins Oct 1.  The White House said the commodities would be provided subject to their availability.  Although the products will be provided as a grant, the items will be sold in Poland, with the proceeds expected to be used to fund "agricultural development activities" there, the White House said.  The White House previously announced President Bush's intention to provide $100 million in economic development aid to Poland, and a lesser amount to Hungary, subject to the approval of Congress.  The food aid, however, doesn't require congressional review.  Earlier this week, the 12-nation European Community, which organized the meeting of 24 nations, also agreed to donate about $120 million of food to Poland.  The seven largest industrial nations agreed at their economic summit last month to ask the EC to spearhead the aid effort.  Caesars World Inc. said it expects to report essentially flat earnings for the fiscal-fourth quarter and lower earnings for the fiscal year ended July 31, triggering a drop in its stock despite forecasts of steady gains for fiscal 1990.  Caesars estimated its fourth-quarter net income at between 65 and 70 cents a share, or about $16 million to $17.3 million, compared with 69 cents a share or $17 million a year earlier.  Revenue is expected to have risen about 8% to roughly $234 million.  The company said increased business was offset by higher bad-debt expenses and general and administrative costs.  For fiscal 1989, the company expects net of between $2.70 and $2.75 a share, or between $66.7 million and $68 million.  Caesars posted net of $2.90 a share, or $77 million, in fiscal l988.  Caesars' dropped $3.625 a share, to close at $39.375 in New York Stock Exchange composite trading, erasing part of its gain in recent weeks from analysts' favorable recommendations based on asset values, market share and other factors.  Steven Eisenberg, an analyst with Bear, Stearns & Co., said the soft earnings don't necessarily signal a weakening of the company's underlying business.  "If you have a lot of high-end customers, which Caesars does, it's not surprising," he said.  Renovations under way at Caesars Palace in Las Vegas are expected to position the company for the onslaught of competition in the Nevada city starting in 1990.  Caesars has maintained a strong position in the Atlantic City, N.J., market despite slower growth there, which analysts say is likely to continue.  Following profit declines in the first and second quarters, J.P. Morgan & Co. has asked senior management to try to reduce the banking company's work force about 10%, or roughly 1,500 employees, over the next 18 months.  A spokesman confirmed that Morgan has a "head-count reduction" goal, but said it isn't a strict mandate or "a pink-slip program."  He wouldn't confirm the 10% figure, but a Morgan executive said it is accurate.  "At this time of year, managers get a set of documents with planning goals and they are to address revenue and profit and expenses," said the spokesman.  "We have a head-count reduction {goal} but some areas including corporate debt securities in the U.S. and financial advisory world-wide are planning to add people because we see revenue opportunities."  The spokesman said managers had been asked in the past to pare down any employees that weren't necessary, but he said this is the first time they've been given a specific reduction goal "to either meet or explain why."  "This isn't a department-by-department cut, but a flexible, overall cut," said one Morgan executive.  "Some departments may go up and some down, but we're trying to keep operating costs flat."  Although Morgan closed unchanged at $41.125 yesterday in New York Stock Exchange composite trading, some analysts viewed the move as a good step.  "This has got to be viewed positively from the point of view of the stock," said James C. McDermott Jr., research director at Keefe, Bruyette & Woods Inc.  "A couple things have been negatively affecting J.P. Morgan's stock and one was the high level of operating expense, and personnel expense is a big part of that.  They had built up staff prior to October 1987 as part of their long-range plan.  Then the crash came and they didn't react in terms of reducing staff."  The Morgan spokesman said "our earnings have been down in 1989, so all of this is hardly illogical."  For the second quarter, Morgan reported a 9.8% drop in net income to $206.3 million, or $1.09 a share.  Morgan relies heavily on federal funds and other short-term sources of liquidity, and because of high short-term interest rates, its net interest income dropped 17.5% in the second quarter.  Morgan had a 36% drop in first-quarter earnings, also related to interest rates.  A group including U S West Inc. won the lucrative 15-year franchise to develop Hong Kong's first cable-television system and a license to provide high-speed data telecommunications services.  The cable TV system potentially could serve 1.5 million households, making it one of the largest cable networks in the world, in terms of subscribers.  In addition to the right to develop the colony's first cable TV system, the group, called Hong Kong Cable Communications Ltd., may have the opportunity to provide a second telecommunications network once monopoly agreements with the local unit of Britain's Cable & Wireless PLC expire.  The Cable & Wireless agreement for local telephone service ends in 1996 and for overseas service in 2006.  U S West holds a 25% interest in Hong Kong Cable, which is led by shipping magnate Sir Y.K. Pao's Wharf (Holdings) Ltd., with a 28% interest.  Richard J. Callahan, a U S West executive vice president, said he expects the cable franchise to turn a profit in about six years.  But more importantly, he expects the deal to create new opportunities for the telecommunications concern overseas, as part of its goal to become a major international player in the sector.  Cable service is expected to begin in 1991 and should be available to most Hong Kong households by 1995.  Initially, Hong Kong Cable plans to offer 15 channels and eventually will have as many as 28.  Reynaldo U. Ortiz, U S West's president for international operations, said the overall investment cost of the Hong Kong network is expected to exceed $500 million.  A large part of the company's costs will come from creating new programming in Cantonese, the language of the vast majority of Hong Kong's residents.  In announcing the winning bid, the government ended four years of debate and delays over cable TV and the future of telecommunications in the colony.  Under terms of the agreement, the group is protected from competition for six years.  The accord also calls for the group to pay the government a royalty calculated on gross receipts from advertising, subscriptions and other fees.  During the 15-year license period, the government estimates it will receive $385 million in royalties.  Other partners are Sun Hung Kai Properties Ltd., a large local property developer, with a 27% share; Shaw Brothers (Hong Kong) Ltd., an entertainment concern that controls the larger of the colony's two TV broadcasters, with a 10% interest; and Coditel S.A. of Belgium, a leading European cable TV operator, with a 10% stake.  Despite what the June 4 massacre of pro-democracy students in Beijing portends, U S West remains optimistic about the future of the consortium in Hong Kong.  The colony reverts to Chinese sovereignty in 1997.  U S West also has cable TV interests in six franchises in the United Kingdom and a stake in a French cable company.  So much for milestones.  The Nasdaq Composite Index surpassed its record closing level during yesterday's trading.  But investors in the over-the-counter market, the home of small stocks, were unimpressed.  Traders and analysts say the indifferent response reflects small investors' continued coolness to stocks in general and smaller issues in particular.  Since the October 1987 stock market crash, "the public has never sincerely embraced small stocks," says Cuyler Kline, managing director of the OTC trading department at Robinson-Humphrey Co. in Atlanta.  "They've come back into the safety zone" of large-capitalization, big-name issues, he says.  The Nasdaq Composite, which tracks about 5,200 OTC stocks, jumped as high as 455.50 before closing at 453.29, down 0.55.  On Aug. 26, 1987, the composite finished at 455.26, establishing the record that investors flirted with yesterday.  Although the Nasdaq composite outgained the New York Stock Exchange composite and the Dow Jones Industrial Average in 1988, small stocks trailed larger issues during the 1982-87 bull market.  So far this year, despite efforts by securities companies including Shearson Lehman Hutton, PaineWebber, Merrill Lynch and Morgan Stanley to convince investors that small stocks are seriously undervalued, investors remain largely uninterested.  After outgaining the Big Board composite index, the Dow Jones industrials and the Standard & Poor's 500-stock index in the first five months of this year, the Nasdaq composite ran out of steam and now trails them all.  The Nasdaq composite is up 18.8% since Dec. 31, while the Big Board composite has jumped 22.5%, the Dow Jones industrials have advanced 21.8%, and the S&P 500 has surged 23.9%.  While the Nasdaq composite is still struggling to establish a high, the American Stock Exchange hit a new peak in June, and the S&P 500 set a new record level last Wednesday.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average is still nearly 100 points from its record of 2722.42.  Many individual investors are just buying bigger stocks or investing in mutual funds, but some are just plain leery of stocks.  Those investors are clinging to money-market securities, which are perceived as having less risk, analysts and traders say.  "I still don't think the public is convinced that we're in a bull market," says Robert Dickey, technical analyst at Dain Bosworth in Minneapolis.  The consensus opinion of individual investors is that the market "is just running up to the same level from which it crashed" and is likely to fall again, he says.  Some officials at securities firms that trade OTC stocks were anticipating the round of selling that occurred yesterday.  Even though interest rates are coming down and many economists say inflation is under control, "the market seems overpriced and ahead of itself to many investors," says Peter DaPuzzo, head of retail equity trading at Shearson Lehman Hutton.  "Some people are selling into the strength, and that's holding the market back."  "We've had a major-league run-up," says E.E. "Buzzy" Geduld, president of big OTC market maker Herzog, Heine, Geduld Inc.  "I still feel okay (about the OTC market), but you've got to be selective now about what you buy."  What's more, the market for initial public stock offerings, which drew investor attention to the OTC market in the past, hasn't regained its pre-crash robustness, Mr. Dickey says.  Also holding the market back these days are its blue-chip-caliber issues, the technology stocks.  Such large-capitalization OTC stocks as Apple Computer, Intel, Ashton-Tate, Seagate Technology and Sun Microsystems have been battered by investors responding to disappointing earnings reports and talk that the computer industry is headed for a slowdown.  Yesterday, many of those issues continued to ease.  Intel fell 1 1/4 to 29 1/4, Ashton-Tate was off 1/8 to 15, Seagate declined 1/8 to 11 1/2, and Sun Microsystems dropped 5/8 to 13 7/8.  Apple Computer was up 1/8 to 39 7/8.  Still, many analysts and traders remain optimistic.  Mr. DaPuzzo expects institutional investors to begin committing more cash to OTC stocks soon, and he says Shearson is anticipating a new round of stock-buying by individuals who can no longer get double-digit returns on moneymarket securities now that interest rates are falling.  Mr. Dickey also doesn't expect the negative sentiment on stocks to persist.  "I can feel the shift taking place," he says.  "It's not anywhere close to a frenzy, but it's building."  Mr. Kline says: "Despite the Nasdaq Composite's doldrums, there is strong interest in stocks; sooner or later, everything will join in."  The OTC market's largest nonfinancial stocks, including the technology issues, dragged it down yesterday.  The Nasdaq 100 Index of big nonfinancials tumbled 2.88 to 425.67, while the Nasdaq Financial Index of large banking and insurance issues rose 1.81 to 448.20.  Among broader Nasdaq industry indexes, banking, other financial and transportation stocks were higher.  The industrial and utility issues finished lower.  One giant utility-index stock, MCI Communications, fell 1 1/4 to 39.  It was Nasdaq's most active stock.  MCI said it reduced its basic interstate long-distance rates by about $12 million annually by lowering rates an average of 1.5%, effective immediately.  Specifically, MCI is reducing some residential rates by an average of 1.9%, business and commercial rates by an average of 0.4% and MCI Card rates by 1%.  Joseph Bellace, a Merrill Lynch analyst who last week downgraded his view of MCI's stock to "neutral" from "above average," reinstated his previous rating, other analysts said.  Mr. Bellace couldn't be reached to confirm the reports.  Warwick Insurance Managers slid 25% and was the biggest percentage loser of the day after the company said it expects to report a loss of at least $7 million for the second quarter.  Warwick Insurance closed at 3, down 1.  Class A shares of Figgie International soared 6 to 75.  The Class B shares rose 3 to 82.  The Willoughby, Ohio, maker of industrial and consumer products said it will hold a Dutch auction to buy as many as 437,811 of its Class A common shares at a price of $74 to $84 a share and as many as 162,189 Class B common shares at $83 to $94 a share.  Dunkin' Donuts was unchanged at 37 3/4 on news that only 23.5% of its shares had been tendered as of last Thursday under DD Acquisition's unsolicited tender offer for the doughnut maker.  Micropolis, a maker of high-capacity disk drives, closed up 1/2 at 3 3/4 after a Kidder Peabody analyst issued a buy recommendation on the stock.  The company's chief executive officer said Micropolis might report a profit in the first quarter of 1990, according to Dow Jones Professional Investor Report.  Micropolis has had four consecutive quarters of losses and expects to report losses in the third and fourth quarters of 1989, the news service said.  In the second quarter, Micropolis had a loss of $10.6 million.  It had net income of $1.2 million, or 10 cents a share, a year earlier.  Walt Disney Co. said it plans to double the size of its new Disney-MGM Studios Theme Park in Orlando, Fla., within the next three years in an effort to handle crowds, which have far exceeded capacity almost every day since the park opened May 1.  The Burbank, Calif.-based entertainment concern also said it tentatively has plans for a new "sea-oriented theme park" around the Queen Mary ship and Spruce Goose airplane attractions in Long Beach, Calif., which the company obtained through its acquisition of Wrather Corp. last year.  The expansion of the $500 million Disney-MGM Studios attraction was disclosed by Disney's chairman and chief executive officer, Michael D. Eisner, when he responded to an article in the Orlando Sentinel about crowded conditions and long lines at the park.  Industry analysts say Disney has had to turn away visitors at the gate almost every day since the park opened.  "It's surprising even to us," a Disney spokesman said of the huge crowds.  This isn't the first time the company has had problems with eager guests swarming to its new parks.  When Disneyland opened in Anaheim, Calif., in 1955, there weren't enough drinking fountains and toilets.  And when Tokyo Disneyland opened in 1983, guests booked their visits through an outside reservation service.  Industry analysts say Disney may have rushed to complete the studio theme park, which has an estimated daily capacity of about 25,000 and is considerably smaller than the other Disney parks, in a move to get an edge on MCA Inc., which is scheduled to open its Universal Studios Florida attraction, also in Orlando, next spring.  Disney had been telling analysts all along that it planned to expand the new park, but the expansion was moved up by six months to a year after the company saw what a phenomenal success the new park had become.  Disney didn't disclose the estimated cost of the expansion.  "The park's current capacity is between five million and six million.  In May, Disney had indicated to us that they would increase the park's {annual} capacity to 8.5 million within three years," Richard P. Simon, an entertainment analyst with Goldman, Sachs & Co., said.  "Since then, we have written that they would increase it more and faster."  Disney said it will announce its expansion plans within the next six weeks.  The company said, however, that it will probably add more attractions for children, given that the park is aimed more toward adults with its re-creation of the Hollywood Boulevard of the 1930s and '40s.  Disney also may develop a themed "land" within the park, similar to the Fantasyland or Tomorrowland in its Magic Kingdom theme parks.  In January, the company plans to open Star Tours, a flight simulator attraction based on the "Star Wars" movies, which is already a hit at Disneyland in Anaheim and at Tokyo Disneyland.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Disney shares closed at $109.75, up $2.25, as the market declined.  Regarding the possibility of the theme park in Long Beach, the Disney spokesman said that the company is working out its plans with the city, and that a formal proposal would probably be completed by the end of the year.  The park, which would be a stone's throw from Disneyland, also would include a hotel, he said.  Designs for the new park are being created by Kim Murphy, show creator of the Living Seas pavillion at Disney's Epcot Center in Orlando, who formerly worked for Sea World and the recently closed Marineland, two Southern California aquatic theme parks.  Tony Baxter, who helped design Tokyo Disneyland and the new Splash Mountain log flume attraction at Disneyland, also is working on the project, the spokesman said.  Disney previously said it planned to build a second park adjacent to Disneyland.  The company also is building Euro Disneyland, scheduled to open in 1992 near Paris.  The Senate Judiciary Committee's rejection yesterday of the nomination of William Lucas to be the Justice Department's civil-rights chief was almost as much a defeat for Attorney General Dick Thornburgh as it was for the nominee.  This is the latest in a string of political embarrassments for the attorney general.  Although he came to this job with a reputation as a very able politician, based on his two successful terms as governor of Pennsylvania, he has stumbled repeatedly in trying to establish himself as a major player in the Bush administration.  Over the past few months, he has seen two top appointments rejected, one because of opposition from the right and the other because of objections from the left.  His aides are involved in a tough, behind-the-scenes clash with drug czar William Bennett, whose staff charges that the attorney general is obstructing efforts to coordinate the administration's anti-drug policies.  And he has angered Congress with attempts to unilaterally reorganize some parts of the Justice Department.  Outside observers blame Mr. Thornburgh's problems on a political ambition that tries to placate both conservatives and moderates -- sometimes alienating both in the process -- and an imperious style that worked well as chief executive of Pennsylvania.  The attorney general and the small coterie of aides he brought with him from Pennsylvania "have miscalculated the risks" of angering influential partisan groups, says Robert Katzmann, a political scientist at the Brookings Institution who studies the Justice Department and Congress.  Unless the attorney general changes his style, adds Mr. Katzmann, "he will face {more} stiff opposition."  Mr. Thornburgh, in an interview, attributed the Lucas defeat to "a strong dose of partisanship."  He dismissed the suggestion that he has suffered a string of political losses that leave him at odds with some powerful legislators and civil-rights leaders.  "I've been around this business long enough to know that today's adversary can be tomorrow's ally," he said.  Comparing the Lucas rejection to President Bush's failed nomination of John Tower as defense secretary, Mr. Thornburgh said, "I don't think {such defeats have} any long-term consequences."  Earlier this summer, Mr. Thornburgh was shocked to find himself blitzed from the right when Senate conservatives shot down his choice of Robert Fiske to be deputy attorney general.  Led by Sen. Strom Thurmond (R., S.C.), opponents criticized the attorney general for selecting a lawyer known to be anathema to many Republicans: Mr. Fiske headed an American Bar Association committee that questioned the qualifications of several Reagan administration judicial nominees.  In the Lucas fight, Mr. Thornburgh incurred the wrath of many prominent civil-rights groups -- precisely the organizations with which he had promised to cooperate after their stormy opposition to his predecessor, former Attorney General Edwin Meese.  Initially, Republican politicians saw Mr. Lucas, a former FBI agent who was defeated for governor of Michigan, as a prime candidate to head the U.S. Marshals Service or to be a deputy to Mr. Bennett.  But Mr. Thornburgh proposed the more sensitve position of civil-rights chief.  He has conceded that he recommended the nomination to President Bush mainly because Mr. Lucas is an example of a black man who, from humble beginnings, rose to political prominence in the GOP, not because of Mr. Lucas's legal skills or civil-rights experience.  The strategy backfired when civil-rights groups conducted a massive lobbying campaign to convince Senate Democrats that Mr. Lucas lacked relevant qualifications and had even been found by two separate courts to have tolerated jail overcrowding and police brutality during his tenure as sheriff of Wayne County, Mich.  The qualifications issue, especially Mr. Lucas's unfamiliarity with basic civil-rights law, was cited repeatedly yesterday as the Senate Judiciary Committee refused on a 7-7 tie vote to recommend his confirmation as the country's top civil-rights enforcer.  The committee also rejected on a 7-7 vote a proposal to send the nomination to the full Senate without a recommendation; a majority vote was needed.  The two votes went mainly along party lines, with only Sen. Dennis DeConcini (D., Ariz.) joining the committee's six Republicans in backing Mr. Lucas.  In an often bitter, 90-minute debate, the Democrats were careful to praise Mr. Lucas's career as a public official.  But Committee Chairman Joseph Biden (D., Del.) charged the Bush administration with "cynicism in the extreme" for nominating "a decent, honest black man" who "demonstrated {at his confirmation hearing} that he knows nothing about the law."  The only committee member who went into yesterday's session uncommitted was Sen. Howell Heflin (D., Ala.), who cast the decisive vote against Mr. Lucas.  Mr. Heflin said that in addition to Mr. Lucas's "lacking in experience and qualifications," his being found in contempt of court for allowing inhumane jail conditions in Wayne County "causes me concern about his managerial abilities."  Republicans on the committee compared Mr. Lucas's rejection to the defeat of Robert Bork, President Reagan's controversial nominee to the Supreme Court.  Sen. Thurmond angrily said, "We ought to give this black man a chance."  In response to the Lucas rejection, Senate Republican Leader Robert Dole urged President Bush to appoint Mr. Lucas to the civil-rights post temporarily, while Congress takes its summer recess.  Under such a "recess appointment," Mr. Lucas could keep the job through the end of next year.  A White House spokesman called the Lucas defeat "disappointing" but said a decision hadn't been made on whether to make a temporary appointment.  It's evident that Mr. Thornburgh, who set out to change his predecessor's combative stance toward Congress to one of cooperation, has provoked considerable animosity on Capitol Hill.  The fighting goes beyond nominations to include management of the Justice Department itself.  For example, Congress has temporarily blocked Mr. Thornburgh's plan to eliminate the department's regional Organized Crime Strike Forces because of support for the strike forces from members of both parties in both houses.  The attorney general has refused to compromise on the matter, and legislators are threatening to ban all Justice Department reorganizations through Oct. 1, 1990.  "That's what will happen unless we come to some new understanding," said Rep. Neal Smith (D., Iowa), who heads the House appropriations subcommittee that oversees Justice Department spending.  Mr. Thornburgh helped provoke the confrontation by announcing plans to disband the strike forces and shifting the location of some Federal Bureau of Investigation personnel without giving Congress the opportunity to consider the moves.  In the interview yesterday, Mr. Thornburgh accused Congress of attempting to "micromanage" his agency.  Rep. Smith countered that the attorney general has refused to follow an informal procedure under which cabinet agencies give congressional committees 15 days notice of any reorganization plans and the opportunity to reject changes.  Even within the Bush administration, Mr. Thornburgh has been making enemies, according to some officials.  Senior aides in Mr. Bennett's Office of National Drug Control Policy have complained that Justice Department officials are attempting to obstruct the drug czar's efforts to set priorities on law-enforcement matters.  "They are objecting without having any specific reasons," claims one Bennett aide.  Under law, Mr. Bennett has the authority to certify all drug-related budgets, including that of the Justice Department.  But Mr. Thornburgh's subordinates "won't give an inch in recognizing that we have a role to play," contends the Bennett aide.  Mr. Thornburgh said he isn't aware of any problems between his department and the drug czar's office.  "This department and my office have been forthcoming to Mr. Bennett's office in every respect," the attorney general contended.  The stormy political waters that have rocked Mr. Thornburgh lately aren't likely to become calm anytime soon.  Already looming is a nomination fight over Clarence Thomas, the conservative, black chairman of the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission, to a seat on the federal appeals court here.  The selection has prompted sharp criticism from liberal groups who are gearing up for another confrontation in the Senate.  Mr. Thornburgh will absorb the brunt of any liberal attacks; he has asserted that his personal front office has taken firm control of screening judicial candidates.  Referring to civil-rights leaders' role in defeating Mr. Lucas, Mr. Katzmann of the Brookings Institution said, "Once you have succeeded, sometimes it emboldens you to try again."  RJR Nabisco Inc. said it hired an investment banker to help determine whether to sell its 20% stake in ESPN Inc., the cable sports network.  The food and tobacco giant said it took the action after it received several inquiries from interested buyers, but wouldn't identify them or say how many contacts it had received.  Exploring a sale of the ESPN stake is part of RJR Nabisco's plans to slash its overall debt by $5.5 billion within the next year.  The company was acquired earlier this year for $25 billion in the largest leveraged buy-out ever by Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co.  Separately, there may be a decision on whether RJR's Del Monte Foods unit will be sold and to whom, in the next few weeks, according to people familiar with RJR.  In March, RJR hired Goldman, Sachs & Co. to evaluate Del Monte and study options, including a sale.  That unit could fetch upwards of $3 billion.  The ESPN stake would be a fraction of that.  Based on cash flow estimates, analysts believe the current market value of all of ESPN is about $1.5 billion to $2 billion.  Although that would seem to indicate a price as low as $300 million for RJR's partial stake, some analysts think RJR could draw even less.  That's because RJR's ESPN interest, a minority holding, simply offers a buyer an investment, rather than a business to control.  "Typically you don't get premium prices for a minority stake," said Larry Gerbrandt, a senior analyst with Paul Kagan Associates Inc.  Moreover, Capital Cities/ABC Inc., the owner of the remaining 80% stake, has the right of first refusal on any sale of the stake.  "If another company makes us an offer," said an RJR spokesman, "we have to offer Capital Cities/ABC a chance to match the price."  To some analysts, Capital Cities seems like a natural to buy the sports cable network, just for the sake of having complete ownership.  Capital Cities wouldn't comment.  The RJR spokesman said his company, which will be helped by Lazard Freres & Co., notified Capital Cities/ABC of its intentions to explore a sale of its stake, and had "some preliminary discussions, but nothing serious."  The spokesman said the other interested parties have surfaced in the past two months.  RJR, whose Nabisco unit acquired the ESPN stake in 1984 for $60 million, stressed that it hasn't decided whether to sell or not.  And Roger Werner, president and chief executive officer of ESPN, said he thinks RJR might not sell.  "They might end up staying," he said, "because it's a good investment."  Within the cable industry, ESPN is a well-regarded property.  The largest cable network in the country, it currently reaches some 52.4 million households, more than double the number just six years ago.  The network turned its first operating profit in 1985.  This year, its operating earnings will be about $115 million, according to Francine Blum, a media analyst for Wertheim Schroder.  "It's grown at a very respectable clip in the past four years," she said.  "And it clearly has the premier position in cable sports."  Christopher Henney, 48, resigned as vice chairman to form a consulting business for the biotechnology industry.  Mr. Henney, who will remain a director, was a co-founder of Immunex, which was founded in 1981.  The biotechnology concern said it doesn't plan to name a new vice chairman at this time.  Responding to government and public pressure to clean up the environment, American Telephone & Telegraph Co. plans to eliminate chlorofluorocarbons from all its manufacturing processes by 1994.  The telecommunications giant's policy is more aggressive than internationally mandated guidelines, which require a 50% cut in 1986 CFC usage levels by 1998.  CFCs are man-made compounds linked to a hazardous depletion of the ozone layer.  They are widely used as a cleaning agent in manufacturing.  The domestic electronics industry accounts for 12% of the CFC usage in the U.S., according to the Environmental Protection Agency.  AT&T estimates it accounts for one-third of the industry's usage.  As the dangers of CFCs have become known and efforts to curtail their use have grown, the company has been under pressure to find alternative cleaning agents, says David Chittick, AT&T's vice president for environment and safety engineering.  An international treaty, the Montreal Protocol, requires that by 1998, production as well as consumption of CFCs be cut to half of 1986 levels.  Mr. Chittick says AT&T is pursuing research into new manufacturing processes.  Earlier this year, it began using -- and marketing to other suppliers -- a preparation method for electronic circuit boards that eliminates the need to clean parts with CFCs.  AT&T's new CFC-elimination policy also calls for the company to pare its 1986 CFC usage level by 50% by 1991.  Occidental Petroleum Corp. said its Occidental of Pakistan Inc. unit discovered oil and natural gas in the North Potwar region of northern Pakistan near Rawalpindi.  The oil company said the discovery well, Bhangali-1, tested at a rate of 3,110 barrels of oil and 7.2 million cubic feet of natural gas a day, ranging in depth from 12,024 feet to 12,339 feet.  The tests were conducted through a 28/64-inch choke.  Flowing tubing pressure was 3,720 pounds per square inch absolute.  Oil gravity was 32 degrees on the American Petroleum Institute scale.  A spokesman said the discovery well is located 30 miles from the Dhurnal field, whose 19,000 barrels of oil and 40 million cubic feet of natural gas a day make it the largest-producing field in Pakistan.  The company is hopeful that the new well, when fully developed, will be larger than the Dhurnal field.  Occidental has a 76% interest in the discovery well and a 45% working interest in the Dhurnal field.  Lomas Financial Corp., reporting a net loss of $282.4 million for the fiscal year ended June 30, said it will suspend its common stock dividend until it has returned to profitability.  Fourth-quarter figures weren't available.  The financial-services company had been paying 18 cents a share quarterly, after cutting the dividend from 35 cents in May.  But it said new credit agreements with its banks will require it to be profitable to pay a dividend.  Further, Lomas said it believes it ought to sell its commercial-leasing unit and stabilize its financial condition before a dividend is reinstated.  Still, Lomas said it hopes to resume dividends late next year, so that its lengthy history of paying dividends each year won't be broken.  Analysts welcomed the move.  "I think it's in the best interests of everyone that they suspend the dividend at least for a while, while they rebuild the capital of the company," said Bruce G. Garrison, an analyst at Houston-based Lovett Mitchell Webb & Garrison, who expects Lomas to be "nicely profitable" in fiscal 1990.  Lomas had projected the large loss, saying in late June that it would take $253 million in reserves and write-downs on Texas real-estate holdings, capitalized software costs and other assets.  At the time, however, Lomas estimated its net loss at $202 million, after including a gain from the sale of its credit-card operations to Merrill Lynch & Co.'s Merrill Lynch Capital Partners.  The company said it had hoped to complete the sale in July, allowing it to include the gain in its year-end results.  However, that sale now is scheduled to close this week, and the gain will be included in the company's fiscal-first-quarter results.  Lomas said its net loss included a $15.7 million gain from early retirement of debt and $6.6 million in earnings from discontinued operations, including its credit-card and leasing operations.  In fiscal 1988, Lomas had a net loss of $56.4 million, including a $7.6 million gain from early retirement of debt and $28.5 million in earnings from discontinued operations.  Revenue for the year was $609.9 million, up 3% from $592.6 million the prior year.  Lomas fell 87.5 cents a share after the news, to close at $7.625 in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  U.S. SURGICAL Corp. boosted its quarterly 33% to 20 cents a share, payable Sept. 15 to shares of record Aug. 30.  The Norwalk, Conn., maker of surgical staplers previously paid 15 cents quarterly.  Leon C. Hirsch, chairman, cited growth in sales and earnings for the increase.  Best Designs for Elderly  Appeal to Young, Too  DESIGNERS are creating more products that meet the special needs of the fast-growing elderly market.  But many are hedging their bets and trying to make the products appeal to young people, too.  "It's encouraging to note the growing number of products that do accommodate the elderly and still remain attractive to younger people," says James Pirkl, chairman of the design department at Syracuse University.  He cites such products as easy-to-load cameras, pump-style toothpaste dispensers, needle-threading sewing machines, lever-operated faucets and watches with larger numbers.  A new example: the Bed-Lift, a device that uses an electric motor to raise a mattress and box spring off their frame or base.  The late William Wachsman, a Los Angeles designer, threw his back out while making a bed when he was 68 years old and spent the next 15 years developing the lift.  The mattress and box spring rise to a height of 33 inches and move a foot away from the headboard.  This enables a person to make the bed without straining his back or banging his knuckles on the headboard.  Mr. Wachsman's partner, Max Friedman of Woodland Hills, Calif., says the Bed-Lift was designed not just for the elderly, but for anyone with back ailments.  Meanwhile, designer Vladymir Rogov of San Diego has produced a set of eating utensils created primarily for the elderly.  The knife, fork and spoon have fat handles that are easy for an arthritic hand to grasp.  But Mr. Rogov says he tried to make the cutlery attractive enough so younger people would want to buy it, as well.  The Wachsman Bed-Lift won first prize in the American Society on Aging's 1989 competition to design new products for the elderly.  The Rogov cutlery won an "exhibit honorable mention."  Margaret Wylde, the contest organizer, says of such products, "If it ain't good for everybody, it ain't good for older people."  Few Companies Tailor  Products for Lefties LEFT-HANDERS' lib is moving ahead, but at a slow pace.  The size of the left-hand market -- estimated at 10% to 20% of the U.S. population -- is discouraging many American companies from investing in innovative designs for southpaws.  "Fifteen percent of the population is left-handed, and no one is catering to it," says Noel Zeller, president of Zelco Industries Inc.  The Mt. Vernon, N.Y., company recently brought out a calculator in mirror-image models to fit lefties and right-handed users.  Karen Carlisle, owner of the San Francisco store Left-hand World Inc., says left-handers are "not as militant as when I went into business in 1976."  Most of the left-hand products that are available in the U.S., such as scissors, playing cards and kitchen utensils, come from abroad.  U.S. manufacturers are less willing to produce small quantities, says Mrs. Carlisle, because it isn't cost efficient.  James O'Halloran says the left-hand version of his Radius toothbrush accounts for 12% of his sales and costs 25% more to make than his right-hand toothbrush because of the low volume.  Radius Corp. absorbs the extra cost, but retailers still grouse about stocking the left-hand model.  Despite the drawbacks, though, Mr. O'Halloran says it's simply good business to avoid alienating left-handed consumers, even if they're a small minority.  Odds and Ends  GOLFERS CAN THROW in the towel.  Joe Rivers, a financial consultant, and Design Continuum of Boston have come up with a new way to clean the grips of golf clubs.  The size of a 12-ounce soda can, the Grip Caddy slips over a club handle and uses water and a replaceable foam insert to scrub the grip. . . .  N.V. Philips, the Netherlands-based maker of lighting and electronics products, wins the American Center for Design's 1989 Business Award.  Philips gets high marks for uniting its design, marketing and engineering departments to create new products.  Rent a video of "Three Men and a Baby" in Midland, Texas, these days, and you'll find a commercial for Raindance Car Wash, Midland's local scrub shop where you can get your car cleaned for $6.95.  Rent other top releases -- from "Bull Durham" to "Twins" -- and you'll see commercials for Mark Bevers Chevrolet, the Home Plate Diner or the Midland Angels, the local farm baseball team.  The ads are the brainstorm of a local Midland company, Video Air Time, and the fledgling company is sure it's got a gold mine on its hands: splicing commercials for local businesses into the hottest national video releases, which are then rented out by four Midland video stores.  Video Air Time is so sure of its concept that it intends to offer franchises nationwide, at $25,000 a pop.  It plans to start recruiting franchisees next week at the Video Software Dealers Association conference in Las Vegas.  Since national commercials have fared well on video -- Pepsi and "Top Gun," or Schweppes with "A Fish Called Wanda" come to mind -- "we felt that on a local basis, it's a very viable product also," says Terry Mathis, Video Air's vice president of franchising.  Local advertisers seem to love it.  "Our business was up 20%," says Rod Slaton, manager of Raindance Car Wash.  There's just one small hitch: Video Air never got permission from the studios on whose movies it is advertising.  While Video Air can profit nicely from its little business, the movie studios themselves get precisely nothing.  The studios, when informed about the business, were mad.  Fighting mad.  "We consider this activity unlawful and we take it very seriously.  We are further investigating it," says a spokeswoman for Paramount, whose recent video releases include "Coming to America" and "The Accused."  Video Air's Mr. Mathis, however, insists his company is well within the law, and says it doesn't need to get permission from the studios to run its ads.  "Our contention is that the physical cassette no longer belongs to the movie company the minute they sell it to the video store," he says.  Mr. Mathis adds, though, that Video Air expects to come under fire from the big movie companies and, for that reason, it included a Houston law firm as one of its partners in the start-up company.  The law firm has advised Video Air there is no copyright infringement on a video release as long as a commercial is spliced into the very beginning of a video, where there currently is nothing but blank space, he says.  Video Air's commercials all appear in that blank space, he adds.  But the copyright infringement issue is almost certain to be challenged.  "I'm sure the studios will sue for copyright infringement," says Alan J. Hartnick, a partner in the New York law firm of Colton, Hartnick, Yamin & Sheresky.  Mr. Hartnick says he believes Video Air is guilty regardless of where the ads are placed.  "They're blatantly taking somebody's property for their own use," he contends.  "This is not what consumers rent tapes to see," says Richard Cohen, senior vice president at Buena Vista Video Worldwide, Walt Disney's home-video unit.  "This is offensive to us and we're outraged."  According to Mr. Mathis, Video Air's founder and president Allen Frasier approached some studio executives in 1985 about advertising on videos and was rebuffed.  But at the time, there were no ads of any sort on videos; today, national commercials on video releases are becoming common -- and profitable for the studios.  What's more, movie companies and advertisers are scrupulous about matching up movies with appropriate national ads, a detail Video Air doesn't worry about.  Most national advertisers on video so far have created special commercials, often hugely elaborate extravaganzas related to the movie's plot.  Cross-promotions between the product and video are common.  But Video Air simply runs whatever commercial a local business happens to have.  The basic price is $20 per videocassette for 90 days, with discounts if the commercial is spliced into several releases.  If a local business doesn't have any commercials of its own, Video Air produces one.  Instead of matching advertisers with movies, "we try to put them on the newest videos we can get them on," sometimes doubling up local commercials on a single video, Mr. Mathis says.  He adds, however, that Video Air is starting to try tying in advertisers with movies.  For "Rain Man," whose video release will include a national ad for Buick, Video Air is "trying to get local Buick dealers to do a tag at the end of the ad, saying, 'come see our line of Buicks at your local dealer,'" Mr. Mathis says.  News of that idea prompted some consternation yesterday at Buick's advertising department in Flint, Mich.  "With the national ad, we're trying for an upscale look from the Buick motor division overall," says Jay Qualman, general director of advertising.  He says a loud dealership pitch would ruin the effect of the national ad, which quietly promotes Buick's heritage and ends with an invitation to sit back and enjoy the movie.  "It seems to me this would be sort of a non sequitur," he says.  ---  Ad Age Defections  David Persson and Lawrence Oliver, publisher and associate publisher, respectively, of Advertising Age, have resigned to join competing media company, Act III Publishing, New York.  Mr. Persson was named to the new post of senior vice president of Act III's media and television groups and will hold overall responsibility for its Channels and Marketing and Media Decisions trade magazines.  Mr. Oliver will be publisher of Marketing and Media Decisions, succeeding David Bentley, who is leaving to become publisher of Adweek and six related titles.  Act III was founded in 1986 by producer Norman Lear.  Adweek is published by A/S/M/ Communications Inc. Ad Age is published by Chicago-based Crain Communications Inc. Joseph Cappo, group publisher in Chicago of six Crain publications, will take over as publisher of Ad Age.  ---  Ad Notes. . . .   EARNINGS: Omnicom Group, New York, reported second-quarter net income rose 14% to $14.1 million, or 58 cents a share, from $12.4 million, or 50 cents a share, in the year-earlier period.  ACQUISITION: Rosenfeld, Sirowitz, Humphrey & Strauss, New York, acquired Glick & Lorwin, New York, from WCRS, the British communications company.  Terms weren't disclosed.  SUIT: DDB Needham Worldwide Inc., Stackig, Sanderson & White Inc. and KSK Communications Ltd. filed suit in federal court in Virginia to block a retroactive Fairfax County tax increase that they say is erroneously applied to funds that pass through the agencies to the media.  DDB says it got a tax bill for nearly $400,000; Stackig Sanderson's exceeded $250,000 and KSK's was more than $22,000.  WHO'S NEWS: CBS Inc. named Rod Perth, former station manager at WBBM-TV in Chicago, to become vice president of late night programs at the network's entertainment division.  Regarding your July 20 article on presidential appointments ("Bush's Roster of Top Aides, Two-Thirds Filled After First Six Months, Is Mostly White and Male"):  Less than 20% of the 318 presidential appointments in the cabinet departments remain to be nominated, and most of these have been decided between the White House and the agencies.  President Bush's record on appointing women and minorities is more outstanding than the article states.  Women and minorities constitute 29% of the president's personnel selections.  More such appointments are forthcoming.  The president has chosen 56 women for positions within his administration in just the first six months.  This is more than was done in all of 1981 (45).  It is also within striking (and surpassing) distance of the most nominations President Carter made in any year of his administration (72 in 1980).  Another point of comparison is to look at the numbers for the Senior Executive Service -- the top ranks of the career civil service, which has been choosing people for years, not just six months.  In 1988, women constituted only 8.7% (vs. 20% for President Bush) and minorities only 6.2% (vs. the president's 13%).  We do not believe in quotas or judging people merely as numbers.  This is dehumanizing.  What matters about President Bush's appointments is not the percentages but the responsibilities he has entrusted to his appointees.  Women and minorities are confirmed or pending confirmation to such important and responsible position as cabinet and deputy-cabinet posts; the Federal Trade Commission; the Federal Communications Commission; general counsel of the National Labor Relations Board; general counsels of cabinet departments; the commissioner of Social Security; and such other "nontraditional" jobs as ambassadors and top-line Defense Department positions.  Chase Untermeyer  Assistant to the President and  Director of Presidential Personnel  Washington  Paul A. Gigot's July 14 Potomac Watch column, "The Bad News Is the U.S. Economy Keeps Humming," characterizes my colleague, Stephen Marris, and me as "doomsayers" for suggesting as far back as 1984 that the trade and budget deficits were unsustainable.  He is precisely right.  Just such a scenario has unfolded on the twin deficits.  Treasury Secretary James Baker and the Group of Five accepted our analysis in 1985, reversed prior U.S. and international policy, and negotiated the Plaza Agreement to bring down the grossly overvalued dollar (Mr.  Marris predicted the yen would rise from about 250:1 to 128:1; it rose to 120:1).  The budget deficit fell sharply in fiscal 1987 and is now less than half as large as a share of gross national product.  Japan and Europe stimulated domestic demand.  The trade deficit was headed toward $300 billion to $400 billion before these steps were taken but now has been cut to about $120 billion.  The worst of our prophecies thus have been denied to date largely because our proposed policy changes have been adopted, and we are most grateful that Mr. Gigot still can cite us as an "inverse indicator."  However, the steady rise of protectionism and Black Monday still have borne us out to an uncomfortable degree.  Moreover, the improvement in both deficits has stalled.  The trade imbalance is likely to rise again in 1990.  Hence a new set of policy actions will be required soon, along the lines of the "second Plaza Agreement" that I proposed in the Journal on May 15.  Failing such measures, our prophecies may yet be fulfilled rather than denied -- an outcome we fervently hope to avoid.  C. Fred Bergsten  Director  Institute for International Economics  Washington  "We still have the army," Deng Xiaoping said, with obvious relief, after the bloody clearing of Tiananmen Square.  Having the army, of course, is nothing new for communist governments.  In China and elsewhere, armed force has often been the party's insurance against reforms that spin out of control.  Yet no insurance policy lasts forever.  A look at several key communist countries, in fact, shows a pattern of party-military estrangement that may soon come to dominate their politics.  Military men are having to position themselves between restive societies and embattled leaderships, and they have not found it particularly easy.  Soviet Gen. Igor Rodionov has been called a murderer for his part in the April massacre of demonstrators in Georgia, and faces demands that he be expelled from the new Congress of People's Deputies.  Asked whether his own men would implement a crackdown, Hungarian Gen. Janos Seboek insists that they are no longer a "party army," and that orders to fire on an unarmed crowd would be disobeyed.  The Polish example shows that soldiers who come to the party's rescue have not one but many decisions to make.  Although Gen. Wojciech Jaruzelski and his lieutenants imposed martial law in 1981 to uphold communist rule, since then the strength of their commitment has come into question.  Already a handful of military men control the central political authority in Poland; they take civilian party officials into their inner circle, not the other way around.  When strikes threatened public order last year, Gen. Jaruzelski authorized Gen. Czeslaw Kiszczak, then the interior minister (and now the Communist Party's prime minister-designate), to open talks with Solidarity.  The government agreed to recognize the union as a legitimate party and to hold elections in which, even though ultimate political control would not be at stake, many party leaders were certain to be humiliated.  Gen. Jaruzelski made it known that he would resign if the communist hierarchy rejected the deal.  In the end, the electoral experiment humiliated the party and the military leadership alike.  Generals were swept aside with others on the Communist Party slate, and Gen. Jaruzelski had to lobby for support among both Solidarity moderates and disaffected communist hard-liners before becoming president.  He has since resigned all his party posts.  The episode carries a chastening message: To make the new system work, the Polish military needs greater popular loyalty than it has been able to regain since martial law.  The generals' own reforms have put them under intense pressure to show which side they are really on.  The Polish pattern, like the Chinese, puts enormous responsibility on the military.  Politically exposed and disliked, generals become a symbol of the old order just as it seems to be giving way.  This is why, in several other communist countries, military officers have sought to keep themselves on the sidelines as the regime copes with popular challenges.  In Hungary, the army seems to be taking itself successfully out of politics.  Since the end of last year, the Central Committee department overseeing the army has been abolished; "comrade" is no longer to be the standard form of address among officers; the institution of party commissars in military units is also under challenge, with some suggesting that as Hungary moves toward pluralism soldiers should be allowed to join rival parties.  Because Hungary faces no imminent threat of disorder, its reformist leadership can quite easily accept the weakening of party control over the military.  In the Soviet Union, by contrast, Mikhail Gorbachev faces near weekly outbreaks of violence, and the military's role in containing them has become a highly charged issue.  Early sessions of the new legislature were devoted in considerable part to debating who was responsible for the deaths of 19 Georgian demonstrators last spring, and Gen. Rodionov, who commanded the troops in Tbilisi, had to take the podium to rebut the charges against him.  Oddly enough, his defense echoed the anti-military rhetoric of the reformers.  Keeping the peace at home, he said, is not the army's job, and he claims to have resisted repeated efforts by local party officials for an even earlier crackdown.  Mr. Gorbachev himself has agreed that the army should be allowed to "do its own job" -- that is, assuring security from external, rather than internal, threats.  According to Vladmir Lapygin, chairman of the new Supreme Soviet committee overseeing the armed forces, draft legislation has been prepared to confirm this assignment of duties.  Already the Georgian affair has had an impact.  When ethnic violence broke out in Uzbekistan and Kazakhstan in June, Moscow avoided calling out any regular military units to handle it, staging a large airlift of police troops instead, even though soldiers from local army garrisons might well have gotten to the scene earlier.  The trend toward violence in the Soviet Union means Mr. Gorbachev cannot afford to absolve the generals of all responsibility for maintaining public order.  As his unusual nationwide TV address of July 1 made clear, violent incidents are spreading and can no longer be considered wholly isolated.  Food shortages and worker unrest, moreover, mean that violence may not be confined to areas of ethnic tension.  Meanwhile, the charge that "perestroika" is creating chaos has become the principal conservative critique of reform (more so than questions of ideological purity).  With this complaint in mind, Mr. Gorbachev told the new Congress that the army must be available as a crowd-control tool of last resort: "To maintain stability when necessary, we will employ all forces: political, organizational, the militia, {party} activists, the people -- all of them."  Because he may have to turn to the military in a future crisis, letting a general be made the scapegoat for the Georgian massacre is risky for Mr. Gorbachev.  The high command has begun to say as much.  The new commander of Soviet ground forces, Gen. Valentin Varennikov, expressed support for Gen. Rodionov at the Congress and added that "no one can say for sure how events would have turned out" without the army's help in a series of hotspots -- Kazakhstan in 1986, Armenia and Azerbaijan in 1988, Georgia in 1989.  More pointedly, Gen. V.K. Pankin of the Interior Ministry claimed after the Uzbek riots in June that some of his men hesitated to use force because they worried about whether they would enjoy "legal protection" for their actions.  They were "scared" to shoot.  "We totally lack the necessary legal norms," he said, "in cases where it is necessary not only to display courage and resolve but also to employ the most extreme means."  Translation: We suspect Mr. Gorbachev won't stand behind those he assigns to keep order.  Andrei Sakharov and others have raised the specter of a military takeover in the Soviet Union, and the possibility should not be laughed off.  Mr. Gorbachev has done very little to win the generals' loyalty and much to diminish their prestige in popular eyes.  He has cut their budget, re-written their doctrine, interfered with promotions, and subjected them to civilian harassment.  Most recently he publicly overruled Defense Minister Gen. Dmitri Yazov by granting new draft deferments.  In reply, military officers have regularly taken advantage of the new openness of Soviet debate to voice law-and-order positions that are implicitly critical of Mr. Gorbachev.  Yet these criticisms don't mean the army is eager for a larger role.  To the contrary, they are the complaints of a group that is reluctant to take responsibility, wary of further damage to its prestige, and resentful of Mr. Gorbachev because he has created conditions in which too much may be asked of it.  These are not the classic grievances of coup-makers.  Elsewhere in the communist world, there are traces of the Soviet military's outlook: concern over the disorder that reform has created but reluctance to deal with it.  Yugoslav military men have warned the country's fractious political leadership to get its house in order, but they are also said to want relief from their largest current assignment -- policing nationalist unrest in the largely Albanian province of Kosovo.  Even in China, party-military cooperation may start to show some strains.  Western analysts seem to have exaggerated the danger of open warfare between military units after the June 4 crackdown, but there is no question that beforehand military leaders were divided about how to handle the unrest.  Many active and retired officers signed a declaration opposing the use of force in Tiananmen Square, and this group will in all likelihood be the target of a purge in military ranks.  Because Deng Xiaoping's modernization strategy -- economic reform without political freedoms -- virtually guarantees cyclical blow-ups, he needs to be sure that next time around the army will again stand firm and do its brutal work if needed.  As the foundations of communist power begin to crumble world-wide, it is hardly surprising that party leaderships should hope that military force can shore them up.  Sometimes it clearly will.  Yet it would be even more surprising if the system's broader crisis were not also taking a toll on relations between politicians and generals.  The growing estrangement between them is, in fact, one of the most striking features of contemporary communism.  Military men are being pulled into the turbulent process of reform politics, and they don't like it.  In the future, they will probably like it even less.  What is asked of them will vary, as will their willingness to comply.  But their unhappiness with the role of enforcer has already become an important new element in the effort of party leaders to modernize the communist system of power.  ---  Mr. Sestanovich is director of Soviet studies at the Center for Strategic and International Studies.  For the first time in 20 years, Congress is seriously interested in fighting crime with federal money.  The plan is to add as many as 100,000 state and local police officers to the 550,000 or so currently employed.  Cost estimates range from $290 million to $1.4 billion a year, depending on the success of the program.  The method would be a kind of ROTC for police, with $40,000 in college loans forgiven for graduates completing four years of service.  Skeptics might remind Congress that the 1988 legislation to fight drugs has not yet been fully funded.  Nonetheless, there seems to be serious support in both houses, from both liberals and conservatives, for the national Police Corps plan, developed by New York attorney Adam Walinsky and Jonathan Rubenstein, a respected author on police issues.  The congressional proposals come at a time of a national crisis in recruiting police personnel.  In one department after another, massive retirements are expected in the next three years.  The seeds of this crisis were sown in the late 1960s, when race riots and rising crime spurred many cities to hire more police officers.  As the World War II generation retired, the Vietnam generation replaced it in even greater numbers.  But with police officers typically eligible for pensions after 20 to 25 years of service, the Vietnam era officers will soon be gone.  Many police departments already are scrambling to replace the retirees.  The congressional goal of increasing total strength by nearly 20% seems almost impossible, absent radical changes in recruiting practices.  Recruiting college students with generous scholarships is certainly a radical change.  But it is hardly the best way to spend hundreds of millions of dollars a year to fight crime.  -- There are good reasons to stop recruiting young men as police.  One major cause of the police recruiting crisis is the same as that of some other industries: "baby bust" reductions in the number of people turning 21.  The current options are either to lower personnel standards, or to expand the range of recruitment targets to include older men and more women.  Male officers under 25 shoot their guns and use other physical force significantly more often than older officers, who appear more adept at talking suspects into cooperating.  Younger officers also have more traffic accidents.  It is possible these traits are linked to inexperience at any age; since police departments prohibit hiring older people, it is hard to get valid comparisons.  But as criminologist James Q. Wilson and others note, most violence, in most societies throughout history, has been committed by young men.  By age 25, "testosterone poisoning" generally starts abating substantially.  Hiring more young women might be one way around this problem.  But for whatever reasons, police departments have not been able to hire more than a relative handful of women since the legal barriers to their equal employment fell in the mid-1970s.  They have been only slightly more successful in hiring minorities, leaving policing primarily to young white men.  -- Mid-career recruitment could diversify police more.  By shifting the recruitment focus to ages 25 to 45, departments would enjoy a much broader recruitment pool.  Minorities retiring from 20 years of military service would be a highly qualified pool, for example, as would women returning to the work force after raising children.  College graduates in a wide range of fields, looking for more secure or interesting work, would also be attracted.  Some have claimed the Police Corps could reinvigorate burnt-out police departments.  But people who know the drawbacks of other jobs might be more enthusiastic about -- and adaptable to -- the freedom and responsibility of police work than are 21-year-olds with no other experience.  -- Police work is too complex for the inexperienced.  The Police Corps plan is to release officers from service after four years.  This makes as much sense as paying surgeons to go through internships and residencies only then to abandon the practice of medicine.  Congress would encourage police departments to squander as much as six months of classroom training and the human capital of experienced officers just to have a continuous supply of inexperienced college graduates.  -- There are better ways to fight crime with federal dollars.  Many voters would prefer federal support for prison and jail construction.  Others would invest in more prosecutors and judges, now forced into assembly-line justice and lengthy delays.  Some criminology professors may benefit from a Police Corps through larger enrollments, but my own preference (as a National Institute of Justice grantee) would be to put the same dollars into research and development.  Federal spending for research on health is $35 per American per year.  We spend eight cents per person for research on crime control.  We spend 10 times more on the National Institute for Dental Research than we do on the National Institute of Justice, the primary federal agency for crime-control research.  We have never grasped the idea that police work needs more brains than brawn, and that controlled experiments in police methods could help to fight crime.  Police chiefs around the country are eager to conduct such experiments, but there is enough funding available for only a handful of them each year.  -- If we must spend the money on a Police Corps, we can spend it more wisely.  We can use the money for actual police salaries of newly recruited college graduates of all ages, rather than educational loans for the young.  This would encourage cities to raise their archaic educational requirements for police (high school or less) and drop their age discrimination in police recruitment.  The war on crime is too complicated to be left to the rookies.  We need more veterans to help turn the tide.  ---  Mr. Sherman, a University of Maryland criminology professor, is president of the Crime Control Institute in Washington.  For at least two reasons, the American people are entitled to be terribly confused about their country's reaction to the presumed execution of Marine Lt. Col. William Higgins by Moslem fanatics:  -- Every year the U.S. spends about $290 billion on what it calls "defense," and invariably when a terrorist group kills Americans, the country's leadership delivers the same Hamlet-like soliloquy on how little is known, can be done, etc.  -- The government of Israel captures Sheik Obeid, a self-admitted leader of a group that for years has been torturing and killing hostages, and many in the West, led by the President of the United States, take Israel to task for contributing to the problem.  What are the sources of this confusion and paralysis over terrorist atrocities?  While human decency requires sympathy for the hostages and their families, it has to be said that for years the hostage tail has wagged the larger dog of policy.  The world's terrorists know that photographs and TV images of American or European hostages in captivity can neutralize their adversaries' options.  Jimmy Carter's presidency shattered from its obsession with the concern-for-the-hostages factor.  No doubt humanitarian concern and the public melodrama of the first days after these incidents pose severe problems for decision-makers.  But if that is so, one wonders why the U.S.'s political and military leadership resigns itself to a status quo that allows these situations to recur.  The status quo we have in mind is the confident belief, held by the terrorist groups and their client states, that the West will exact little price for their awful acts.  Instead of this policy of irresolution, the U.S. could better protect its people and its interests from future assaults if it periodically held accountable -- with bombs or their equivalent -- the people who by common agreement commit or support terrorism.  Ronald Reagan's bombing of Libya is a paradigm of using military force to deter future assaults on the West and its people.  So was Israel's bombing of Iraq's nuclear reactor in 1981.  No deterrent action will foreclose all terrorist initiatives, but it places a clear disincentive in the minds of terrorism's planners.  If active deterrence didn't work, Israel would be under nonstop terrorist assault.  Western leaders, their own countries in conditions of peace, may flinch from using military assets as a generalized deterrent.  But surely the people of the West, if not their leaders, harbor few illusions about the nature of the political actors who need to be deterred.  Iran and Iraq's leadership sacrificed hundreds of thousands of lives in their recent war.  Iraq's Saddam Hussein then used poison gas on his own Kurdish villagers.  Hafiz al-Assad in 1982 leveled the Syrian city of Hama and killed at least 10,000 inhabitants.  The terrorists who took TWA flight 847 shot Robert Stethem and threw him on the tarmac.  Last December, they blew up 270 people on a Pan Am flight over Lockerbie, Scotland.  Col. Higgins's captors gave the world a videotape of a man bound and hanged.  What is supposed to deter the next attack?  Israel, a democracy and Western ally living in the middle of all this violence, already has a policy of hitting back hard or launching pre-emptive strikes.  The capture of Sheik Obeid reflected that policy, a policy based on simple realism.  But we now have the bizarre spectacle of President Bush stating a simple equivalence between Israel's capture of a Moslem gang leader and the gang's constant -- and pointless -- kidnapping, torture and murder of what are ludicrously called "hostages."  It would not have occurred to us that the U.S. could so blithely and backhandedly dismiss a strong friend and ally.  We suspect that after many years of experience with these incidents, the American people are more than a little tired of their government's justifications, produced mainly by the State Department, for doing little or nothing in the face of such assaults.  Perhaps it's time for a U.S. administration to level with its own people:  If the State Department thinks it has some complex Middle East agenda that proscribes military strikes against terrorists, let it say so.  Since innocent people are being sacrificed to this agenda, most of us would like to know more about it.  Official charades of concern after the terrorists do their killing hardly suffice for that purpose.  Current U.S. policy -- mainly tough talk ("make no mistake," "let no one doubt," etc.) -- is unacceptable because it is so lacking in credibility.  The terrorists don't believe it.  Nor do their victims.  Or their future victims.  The local dance studio may be about to cave in to the Batman craze.  Joe Trammel, a Phoenix, Ariz., jazz-dance instructor and Batman enthusiast, is doing a booming business teaching a chest-puffing, arm-flapping style of terpsichorean endeavor called batdancing.  A longtime fan of reruns of the camp '60's TV series, the 23-year-old Mr. Trammel already was incorporating the Caped Crusader's moves into his repertoire when he heard about the dark, brooding film starring Michael Keaton and Jack Nicholson.  "It gave me incentive to add more batmoves," he says.  Since advertising of the batdancing classes began early last month, about 70 students in Phoenix have begun the $58, eight-session nocturnal course.  And about 30 new students a week are signing up, Mr. Trammel says.  All of them -- mostly in their teens or 20s, though there is a two-year-old in one class -- show up in various items of batwear.  "There's a lot of fashion involved," Mr. Trammel explains.  Batdancing is done solo or with a partner, to strains from Prince's movie sound track -- including the hit single, "Batdance," for which there were previously no "official" steps -- and other batmusic that now is popping up everywhere.  Another recent entry: Bose's "Batman: The Original Swing."  Batty dance moves include the "Joker Walk," "Cape" and the "Batmobile" -- in which dancers bounce into an imaginary car.  "It's not like getting into any car; you can tell it's a bat," Mr. Trammel says.  Although Mr. Trammel has won a Las Vegas dance contest with the dance and plans to perform his flashy routines in Los Angeles, batdancing doesn't appear to have spread widely yet.  Andrew Resto of Arthur Murray Dance Studio in Beverly Hills, Calif., who hasn't heard of the dance, says a craze needs to reach "several clubs" in the area before his studio starts teaching it.  "It would have to be something that caught on," he adds.  Mr. Trammel's batgarb, however, may get some attention from lawyers for Warner Bros., DC Comics and others who hold Batman-related rights.  "Even the 'bat' word is licensed," says Kristy Keefe of New York City's Roger Hess Productions, which controls public appearances of anyone dressed in a Batman costume for profit.  The Bush administration has all but scuttled Commerce Secretary Robert Mosbacher's initiative for federal aid for the infant high-definition television industry, according to administration officials.  "I don't know if it's dead, but it's not moving," one administration official said.  The initiative first ran into trouble when a Commerce Department draft proposal for a variety of government efforts to subsidize and give special treatment to the HDTV industry was soundly criticized by other agencies in May.  A promised revision of the proposal still hasn't surfaced.  In addition, an interagency working group on HDTV, a new generation of TV with unparalleled picture quality, hasn't met since the spring.  Then yesterday, a Commerce Department official told a congressional committee that the department's response to business and congressional HDTV proposals -- originally promised for July 1 and then delayed until September -- now has been put off until later in the year.  The issue requires "deeper evaluation and analysis," Juan Benitez, deputy assistant secretary for science and technology, told the Senate Government Affairs Committee.  The Commerce Department hasn't surrendered yet, however.  Wayne Berman, counselor to Mr. Mosbacher, said yesterday that he plans to circulate a substantially revised proposal inside the administration before the end of this month.  The proposal will be broader than the first, advocating policies aimed at a variety of technologies, including HDTV, he said.  "We've come to believe that HDTV is one piece of a puzzle in the range of technologies we need to be competitive in," he said.  These hitches aren't likely to affect the Pentagon's enthusiasm for funding research on HDTV technologies, particularly those relating to flat-panel displays.  Craig Fields, director of the Defense Advanced Research Projects Agency, said yesterday that the agency will announce new HDTV-related awards within a few days.  The agency has already allocated $30 million over three years for HDTV research.  Separately, a Congressional Budget Office study released yesterday concluded the HDTV market is likely to be too small to revitalize the U.S. electronics industry.  Testifying before the Senate committee, CBO Director Robert Reischauer expressed doubts about whether HDTV could be the kind of technology "driver" that its champions predict.  He said that HDTV's impact on the U.S. semiconductor industry is likely to be marginal.  The CBO study indicated that demand for TV sets with large, movie-quality pictures could be slowed by confusion over technical standards and the pace at which programming taking advantage of the technology becomes available.  Nevertheless, interest is keen in Congress.  "CBO's suggestion that America shouldn't develop HDTV -- with its implications for industry imaging, entertainment, education and computers -- is absurd," said Rep. Mel Levin (D., Calif.).  Sen. John Glenn (D., Ohio) warned, "We need to pre-empt our foreign competitors."  Several lawmakers have introduced bills that would provide $100 million a year for HDTV research.  In addition, the American Electronics Association is asking for $1.35 billion in federal grants, loans and guarantees from the Pentagon and other government agencies.  The Commerce Department initiative ran into trouble within the administration -- from the Office of Management and Budget, the Council of Economic Advisers, the Treasury and key White House staff, among others -- because it called for government equity investment in joint ventures, exceptions to government regulations exclusively for the HDTV industry and government-sponsored standards designed to aid U.S. producers without regard to the cost to consumers.  "It did more than flirt delicately with industrial policy, despite all the {Bush} campaign rhetoric against industrial policy," one administration official said.  The cabinet-level Economic Policy Council -- to which any HDTV proposal would normally be sent -- isn't likely to approve any plan targeted at only one industry.  "The point has been driven home completely that any proposal must be generic, across-the-board and good for all business -- and not directed toward HDTV," another administration official said.  Richard Urban, the company's scientific founder, resigned as executive vice president and a director to lead a new, research-only subsidiary of this biotechnology concern.  The company said Mr. Urban made the move because he is more interested in pure research than in the company's current emphasis on product development and analysis.  F. Duwaine Townsen, managing partner of an investment management company, was elected a director, succeeding Mr. Urban.  {Last of a Series}  WASHINGTON -- Curtis Eargle was a young man on the way up.  In 1985 he was working as the executive chef at a suburban Holiday Inn here.  He had a wife, a new baby and a dream of someday becoming a chef at the White House.  But he also lived with a secret he shared with no one, not even his wife: He was addicted to crack, the highly potent form of cocaine.  "I'm 6-foot-1 and weigh 250 pounds, and the first time I smoked crack, it brought me to my knees," Mr. Eargle recalls.  "I knew that I had found heaven.  Actually, it was hell.  My life started going downhill very quickly.  My heart started racing.  I started feeling paranoid.  I kept the curtains pulled because I thought people were looking in at me.  I started missing work.  I broke down crying at work."  And his $200-a-day habit was driving him deep into debt.  One night in 1986, when Mr. Eargle was only 28 years old, he experienced sharp chest pains that he quickly concluded were a reaction to the cocaine.  He dialed the nationwide cocaine hotline that refers callers to treatment programs.  With that call, Curtis Eargle began a struggle to recover from his addiction.  As many as 50,000 cocaine users will begin such battles this year.  Many will fail, at least on the first try, because cocaine, and especially the highly addictive crack form of it, is a particularly difficult addiction to shake.  The rampant drug use of recent years has fueled an explosion in the demand for treatment.  Private centers are usually filled, even though they charge $15,000 or more a month.  For those who can't afford private treatment, public and other subsidized centers are even more overburdened.  At New York City's Daytop Village, the waiting list has doubled to nearly 2,000 people in the last year.  Addicts must wait four to five months just to begin treatment there.  What's more, many treatment centers for the poor "may not provide the level, type, or length of treatment best indicated for a particular abuser's needs," says Elaine Johnson, head of the federal Office for Substance Abuse Prevention.  The treatment of addiction is far from an exact science.  Some respected programs believe in outpatient treatment that provides extensive counseling while the addicts continue to work and live at home.  Other programs begin with a month in a psychiatric hospital or treatment center, followed by outpatient counseling.  Sometimes experts recommend residential treatment that removes addicts from their former environment for as long as 18 months.  "There are thousands of things out there called treatment programs," says Bush administration drug czar William Bennett.  "There are places that are fly-by-night operations that are taking in money and not doing a thing.  We need evaluation.  We need accountability.  We need to know what works."  The consensus among doctors who specialize in this field is that at least a year of treatment, starting with intense therapy for a month or more and continuing with weekly meetings and counseling sessions, is necessary to overcome an addiction.  The type and intensity of program needed, they say, depends on the addict.  The day after he called the cocaine hotline, Mr. Eargle started seeing a Washington psychologist, Ronald Wynne, three times a week.  Such treatment works for a small percentage of addicts, but most need more intensive therapy.  Mr. Eargle was one who needed more than outpatient counseling.  "I wasn't doing it for myself.  I was doing it to appease my wife," he recalls.  As a result, he continued to use cocaine while in treatment, and on July 25, 1986, Beverly Eargle caught her husband smoking crack.  She called Mr. Wynne, who had Mr. Eargle committed to Taylor Manor, a private psychiatric hospital in Ellicott City, Md.  For the first time, he faced the reality of dealing with his addiction and living without drugs.  "They took everything away from me -- wallet, keys, cigarette lighter, belt.  They locked me up in a room for three days until I detoxed.  In the detox room, your body goes through some changes," he says, recalling "weird dreams" and the shakes.  "It was scary.  But in a sense it was a relief that it was over.  For 14 years my life had revolved around drugs."  "In the early days of rehab your head is in a fog," Mr. Eargle says.  Although cocaine flushes out of the body in several days, the craving continues, producing depression, anxiety and lack of concentration.  Mr. Eargle began regular group therapy sessions at Taylor Manor.  These were difficult.  "Group therapy is like holding a mirror up to yourself," he says, and most dope addicts don't like what they see.  "We hated our therapist so much, we called him Dr. Dirt.  We were all good liars, but he made us tell the truth," Mr. Eargle says.  Drug addicts and alcoholics are masters of deception, particularly if they, like Mr. Eargle, manage to maintain a job and a marriage.  They lie to themselves, their families, and their employers about their addictions.  At Taylor Manor, Mr. Eargle also began attending Narcotics Anonymous meetings.  NA follows the same 12-step recovery process as Alcoholics Anonymous, the international self-help organization from which it emerged.  To overcome their disease, people admit they can't control their addiction, seek help from God or some other higher power, apologize to people they have harmed and help other addicts to recover by following the same principles.  Such meetings are crucial to almost all drug-addiction recovery programs, private or public.  "The first night they called on me.  I couldn't talk very well," Mr. Eargle says.  "I started crying.  Somebody smiled at me.  He said, 'You're going to be all right.' These people knew what I was going through.  These are the same people who had crawled around on the floor looking for that last piece of coke.  They were gamblers, alcoholics and drug addicts.  They understood.  There was love in that room."  Taylor Manor's program tries to teach its patients how to deal with anger, disappointment and other stress by showing them how to confront and express their emotions.  During addiction "ordinary coping mechanisms get put on hold because people are substituting drugs," says Joseph Chiarrocchi, Taylor Manor's director of addiction.  Mr. Eargle agrees.  "If you use drugs, and you feel unhappy, you take more drugs."  Mr. Eargle's choice of 28 days in a "crisis intervention" facility, followed by sessions with a therapist and AA or NA meetings, is fairly standard for patients with health insurance.  His insurance paid the $12,000 Taylor Manor bill and $25 of the $80 a session with Mr. Wynne, whom he saw for two years after he left Taylor Manor.  AA and NA meetings, which he continued, are free.  Mr. Eargle says he was fortunate: He was able to get on track after his relatively short treatment.  But his roommate at Taylor Manor reminded him of the fragility of recovery.  He had started drinking again after 18 years of no liquor.  But his attempt to recover again failed, and he died two years later.  "The big thing that helped me was that when it was all over, I didn't have to cheat, I didn't have to lie, I didn't have to steal anymore," Mr. Eargle says.  "When the pain to quit is less than the pain to keep going, then you stop."  But his problems didn't end when he left Taylor Manor.  Four months after he got home, he and his wife separated.  "When I got out I was 13 or 14 years old emotionally," says Mr. Eargle, who began drinking at age 12.  His psychologist, Mr. Wynne, says that such arrested development is fairly common among longtime drug users.  "To some extent your job as a teen-ager is to learn to deal with emotion.  If you find a chemical that makes your emotion go away, you haven't done your job," he says.  Several months later, Mr. Eargle and his wife got back together.  Mr. Eargle has been off drugs for nearly three years.  "Not every day is great now," he says.  "But it's better than it was.  I remember where I was last night.  I know how much I have in my wallet.  I have two kids now.  I own a house.  I own stocks now.  I have a 401k" retirement plan.  But "My addiction still haunts me," he says.  "I try to buy life insurance, and I can't; the price is exorbitant.  When I go to the dentist, I have to tell him that I'm an addict so he doesn't give me too much Novocain."  Mr. Eargle currently works as the executive chef in a large private club, where he supervises 33 people and the preparation of about 1,000 meals a day and where his employer knows that he is in drug rehabilitation.  But his past drug use has shattered his dream of a job at the White House, he says.  "I guess that's out."  To stay clean of drugs, he attends NA and AA meetings regularly, sometimes several times a week.  On Monday nights, he frequently goes to an NA meeting at Montgomery Hills Baptist Church in suburban Silver Spring, Md.  This gathering has grown from about 30 people a year ago to 100 on an average night.  The group has the air of a revival meeting.  People greet each other with hugs as they crowd into a room filled with rows of folding chairs arranged around a table in the middle.  Throughout the meeting, people volunteer accounts of their efforts to deal with stress and other problems and to stay drug-free.  During a section when buttons are handed out to people who have been clean for a month, 90 days, a year, the wildest applause and loudest shouts rise for people who have just decided to give up drugs and made it through the first 24 hours.  The meeting closes with a prayer and the chant: "Keep coming back.  It works."  Mr. Eargle says he delights in helping new members by showing them that it's possible to stay clean.  "You have to give it away to keep it," he says, repeating an NA maxim.  "When a new person comes, we need him," Mr. Eargle says.  "We need to remind ourselves of what it was like."  Even so, he finds the meetings difficult because they often trigger a craving for crack, a craving that he finds the group also helps him resist.  A number of studies under way show that there is no easy cure for cocaine.  To remain clean, many addicts, like Curtis Eargle, may have to be in treatment for life.  "It's not hard getting clean and sober," he says.  "What's hard is staying clean and sober.  We're all one drug away from going out again.  It keeps me clean to be able to talk to other addicts -- to tell my hopes and fears and dreams.  I show them it can be done.  If you want it bad enough, you'll do it.  If you want new life, you'll find it."  ---  @ Calling for Help on Drug and Alcohol Problems  @ 1-800-COCAINE National Cocaine Hotline  @ 1-800-662-HELP National Institute on Drug  @ Abuse, Drug Information Service  @ 1-212-686-1100 Alcoholics Anonymous  @ (not toll free)  @ 1-800-ALCOHOL National referral helpline to  @ local AA and rehabilitation  @ groups  @ 1-800-NCA-CALL National Council on Alcoholism  @ Helpline  @ 1-800-344-2666 Al-Anon Family Support Groups  @ referral  @ 1-800-843-4971 Drug Free Work Place Helpline  @ 1-800-241-7946 PRIDE -- Parents Resource  @ Institute for Drug Education-  @ Drug Information Hotline  MAI Basic Four Inc. changed its offer for Prime Computer Inc.'s minicomputer business to a $525 million all-cash bid from a harder-to-value package of $450 million in cash and $150 million in debentures.  The amended offer replaces a plan MAI launched two weeks ago, when it vowed to wrest control of Prime's minicomputer business after dropping its hostile attempt to take over the parent company.  Analysts said MAI's new offer, however, isn't much different.  "As I translate them, (both offers) are basically equivalent," said Robert M. Johnson, a technology analyst at Rotan Mosle Inc., Houston.  "They just made the new one all cash so people would know exactly what it's worth."  In Natick, Mass., a Prime spokesman said the company's board will consider MAI's revised offer, which expires Aug. 9, when Prime's annual shareholder meeting is scheduled.  The offer will be extended if Prime accepts it on or before that date, or if MAI is successful in its attempt to unseat Prime's board in a proxy fight.  Prime had rejected MAI's tender offer and previous plan to acquire just the minicomputer business, however.  Instead, it favored a competing, friendly offer by J.H. Whitney for the entire company valued at $1.2 billion.  Last Thursday, however, Whitney said that its bankers had demanded "substantial additional" financing because of Prime's $19 million loss on a 6.5% decline in sales for the second quarter.  But despite its recent weak results, Prime's minicomputer business continues to generate cash for the company.  Whitney has said that the minicomputer business can again be profitable if costs are cut.  Venturian Corp. said it has been notified by the State Department that restrictions on the company's ability to receive export licenses have been removed.  The company also said that it and its Napco International Inc. subsidiary will continue to receive export licenses granted by the State Department.  Venturian, a maker of military parts and communications equipment, previously pleaded guilty to bribing officials of the Republic of Niger to get them to buy its defense-related products.  Venturian agreed to pay $1 million in criminal fines, penalties, taxes and restitution.  By pleading guilty to breaching the corrupt-practices law, Venturian could be barred from getting future Defense Department contracts and stripped by the State Department of export licenses needed to do business abroad.  Venturian said it is continuing discussions with the Defense Department to avoid potential debarment.  No action has been taken on the government's part that would prohibit the company from receiving new U.S. government business, Venturian said.  Dorsey R. Gardner, president of Kelso Management Co. in Boston, was appointed to the board of this services concern, filling a vacancy.  That there are few good comedy writers working in television should be apparent to anyone who watches it.  But this scarcity has reached new dimensions, giving rise to something that has the industry buzzing: the astonishing deal that two young comedy writers are reportedly about to sign with MCA Inc.'s Universal Television.  The husband-and-wife team of Neal Marlens and Carol Black, creators of the hit ABC series "The Wonder Years," will receive what is said to be $18 million over three to four years for writing TV sitcoms.  And that's a minimum guarantee -- payable even if nothing they write gets on the air.  While insiders differ over the precise figures, they agree that the contract represents a high-water mark for comedy writers and shows how far an entertainment conglomerate is willing to go to find prime-time hits.  Though relative newcomers, the two writers have their credentials: The 32-year-old Mr. Marlens created the hit show "Growing Pains," which will realize more than $100 million in its first phase of syndication this year for Warner Communications Inc.  "The Wonder Years," written with Ms. Black, 31, is one of the major assets of New World Entertainment Inc., which financier Ronald Perelman recently agreed to acquire for $145 million.  Nevertheless, the deal spins the salary structure into a dizzying orbit, and should further increase the already sky-high costs of producing TV shows.  "I don't understand it," moans one major talent agent.  "It's ludicrous."  But already, one agency is peddling two former "Moonlighting" writers for between $8 million and $10 million for three years.  "When you're wanted -- when you're one of the lucky ones -- there's no limit to what you can ask for," says agent Martin Hurwitz of Bauer-Benedek Agency.  And Mr. Marlens and Ms. Black were able to ask for a lot.  Their agents were able to decree which executives could negotiate the deal.  They stipulated that the couple wouldn't work on the Universal lot, instead maintaining offices in Santa Monica near their home; similarly, they want their shows to be produced nearby, not at Universal.  The team also will share in profits in any successful show they create, perhaps 30% of the adjusted gross and will have the right to make a feature film.  The couple and their representatives declined to comment, as did Universal.  Though larger than others, the Marlens-Black deal is the latest example of a feeding frenzy for comedy writers among major studios.  Columbia Pictures Entertainment Inc.'s TV arm signed huge deals with veteran writers Hugh Wilson and Ed.  Weinberger.  Then Walt Disney Co.'s network television division upped the ante by paying an estimated $2 million or $3 million a year for an overall deal with Matt Williams, the creator of last season's big hit "Roseanne."  More than any other major studio, Universal then needed to prove it was in the comedy game.  For years, Universal was the king of the TV drama, with shows such as "Kojak" and "Baretta," then "Magnum, P.I." and "Miami Vice."  Then, on the coattails of "The Cosby Show," comedies came into demand.  The syndication market has since softened slightly, but comedies are still considered the business to be in, and Universal is trying to make the transition.  It needed to send a message to the Hollywood community, so it outbid News Corp.'s Fox Inc. to make the Marlens-Black deal.  "What bothers me is that Universal did it," says Leslie Moonves, executive vice president of network development for Warner's Lorimar unit.  "This is like some conservative Republican voting for a whacked-out bill."  Universal is betting that Mr. Marlens and Ms. Black can spin their magic again: "They're two for two" with their hits so far, says Larry Lyttle, an independent producer formerly with Warner Television.  All they have to do now, Mr. Lyttle says, is get one hit show out of a three-series commitment they have with ABC.  If they do that, Universal will look like it got a bargain.  ABC, which prospered from both of the team's shows, previously had given Mr. Marlens and Ms. Black three "on-air" commitments -- guarantees that if they create three shows, 13 episodes of each would be put on ABC's schedule.  Universal is in essense buying the commitments.  If ABC for some reason doesn't air any of the three programs, it must pay Universal a more or less standard penalty of around $1 million per show, industry insiders say.  Some observers play down the importance of the ABC commitments in relation to Universal, saying the team would have landed network commitments regardless.  Others argue, though, that the commitments were a big part of what lured Universal.  When there are only 66 hours total on the prime-time schedules of the three major networks, having three slots cornered means a lot.  The more shows on the air, the more the studios can leverage the networks on other issues, like renewing more marginal shows.  And studios are more desperate than ever as the U.S. comes closer to lifting restrictions on how many shows the networks themselves can produce.  Indeed, ABC tried to get Mr. Marlens and Ms. Black to work directly for their own production arm, but the price was too high.  Some studio officials blame the networks themselves for skyrocketing prices because they in effect dictate which writers must be hired.  In the film world, on the other hand, "no one tells Jeff Katzenberg, {Disney's movie chief,} what writers he has to use," complains one executive.  The riskiest part of Universal's gamble is that Mr. Marlens and Ms. Black haven't yet proved themselves as "show-runners."  Mr. Marlens lasted only a handful of episodes of "Growing Pains" before departing; the pair left "The Wonder Years" after 19 episodes.  "It's very difficult to maintain quality on situation comedies on a year-to-year basis," says NBC Entertainment President Brandon Tartikoff.  "You have to wonder whether somebody can get up to stay that extra hour late at night to do that one last rewrite when they're getting $18 million."  First American Corp. said its president and chief operating officer, Andrew G. Higgins, resigned.  Also, the company revised its second-quarter earnings sharply downward.  The regional banking company, which released the news after the markets closed yesterday, wouldn't comment on the resignation of Mr. Higgins, who had held those posts since August 1986.  It didn't name a successor to Mr. Higgins, who couldn't be reached for comment.  First American said it increased its allowance for possible loan losses by $17.1 million after re-evaluating the potential exposure on loans to a Memphis real estate developer, which it wouldn't identify.  As a result of the increase to reserves, First American revised its second-quarter earnings to $3.2 million, or 14 cents a share, from $14.3 million, or 62 cents a share, a year earlier.  Six-month earnings were revised to $18.6 million, or 81 cents a share, down from $29.7 million, or $1.29 a share, a year earlier.  First American fell 37.5 cents to $23.875 a share in national over-the-counter trading.  HomeFed Corp. said the Federal Home Loan Bank Board approved its main unit's application to exit the bankrupt thrift deposit insurance fund.  The approval would mark a major advance in HomeFed's plan to convert to a bank and leave the savings and loan industry's woes behind.  HomeFed's motive is to escape thrift insurance premiums, which are much higher than those charged by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corp., which regulates banks.  HomeFed still needs approvals from the FDIC and from California's banking and S&L departments.  Moreover, the massive thrift-bailout bill, which may pass Congress this week, allows thrifts to convert to banks under certain circumstances, but requires them to pay the higher thrift premiums for five years.  Nonetheless, HomeFed's Home Federal Savings & Loan unit is by far the largest thrift that the Bank Board has allowed to bolt the insolvent Federal Savings and Loan Deposit Insurance Corp.  Several other big, healthy thrifts want out because of the FSLIC's higher premiums -- which will rise further under the bailout plan -- but the Bank Board has been cool to their attempts, fearing that an exodus of strong S&Ls will further undermine the thrift system.  In June, a federal judge in Los Angeles upheld the Bank Board's denial of a similar application by Great Western Financial Corp.'s Great Western Bank.  Last year, HomeFed paid $23.3 million to the FSLIC in premiums and special assessments; its contributions to the fund would have been higher in the next several years under the bailout proposal.  The Bank Board has approved 13 previous applications by thrifts to switch insurers, but all were tiny compared with HomeFed and Great Western.  It wasn't clear why the Bank Board approved the HomeFed application and rejected Great Western's.  In denying Great Western's application, the Bank Board said Great Western hadn't filed an appropriate application by the March 31, 1987, deadline for seeking an exemption from a federal law blocking departures from the FSLIC.  The Bank Board couldn't be reached for comment yesterday.  Home Federal applied to California regulators and the FDIC for conversion to a state-chartered bank shortly before the deadline.  But the Bank Board later asserted that it had jurisdiction over any departures from FSLIC, and the application has been stalled since.  Last month, Home Federal sued the Bank Board over the issue; a Home Federal spokeswoman said Home Federal will drop that lawsuit.  The Bank Board placed conditions on its approval of HomeFed's application.  In addition to requiring HomeFed to get approvals from other regulatory bodies, it said the thrift must meet with a community group that complained recently about HomeFed's alleged noncompliance with laws requiring financial institutions to meet local community credit needs.  HomeFed also must preserve an existing $20 million pool of funds that belongs to people who were the owners of the thrift when it converted to a stock institution from a mutual institution.  Mutual institutions are owned by their depositors.  Ray Mercado, HomeFed's counsel, said it already has plans to meet with the community group and had promised in its original application to regulators that it would preserve the $20 million pool of funds.  He said HomeFed is in "ongoing" discussions with the FDIC and state regulators.  Teledyne Inc. reassigned Harry Halamandaris, president of the company's Teledyne Systems division, to a corporate staff position in the wake of a federal probe at the division.  In a recent filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission, Teledyne disclosed that agents of the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the Defense Criminal Investigative Service searched the division offices in May and "removed a number of documents relating to contracts and pricing."  The investigation isn't related to "Operation Ill Wind," the government's sweeping inquiry into Pentagon procurement fraud, said a Teledyne spokesman.  He declined to answer other questions about the probe.  Mr. Halamandaris was named an assistant to Teledyne's executive vice president in June.  "We thought it was a prudent thing to do and in his and Teledyne's best interest," the spokesman said.  "In his new position he will be able to assist in the company's internal investigation."  Several employees of Teledyne Systems, which makes navigation computers used in military aircraft, have received subpoenas to testify before a federal grand jury, the filing said.  Teledyne is conducting a "preliminary investigation to determine the extent of its potential liability, if any, and is currently unable to determine whether or not there is likely to be a material effect on its financial condition," the filing said.  Last month, a federal agency lifted a six-month suspension of Teledyne's defense electronics unit from receiving new government contracts.  In March, Teledyne Electronics agreed to plead guilty to three felony charges that it conspired to defraud the government and filed false statements with the Pentagon in connection with a contract to supply radar testing equipment to the military.  The average interest rate fell to 8.064% at Citicorp's $50 million weekly auction of 91-day commercial paper, or corporate IOUs, from 8.538% at last week's sale.  Bids totaling $595 million were submitted for the 91-day paper.  Accepted bids were at 8.064%.  Citicorp also said that the average rate on 182-day paper hit its lowest level since July 1988, falling to 7.80%, from 8.214% last week.  Bids totaling $555 million were submitted.  Accepted bids were at 7.80%.  The bank holding company will auction another $50 million of each maturity next Tuesday.  California's insurance commissioner tentatively ordered seven major insurance companies to refund $305.3 million to consumers, the first shot in the battle to implement the state's rate-slashing Proposition 103.  But the commissioner, Roxani M. Gillespie, also said she was basically powerless, absent further changes in state law, to order major refunds by the state's money-losing automobile insurers.  Some industry officials, meanwhile, said her current approach toward computing the rollbacks, which vary depending on how profitable each line of insurance has been, could unfairly discriminate against efficient operators.  The seven insurers so far faced with the rollbacks, including Allstate Insurance Co. and State Farm Fire & Casualty Co., will soon have a chance to dispute them in public hearings, Ms. Gillespie said.  A state-insurance official said "many" other carriers would soon be targeted for rollbacks, but it wasn't clear exactly how many of the state's 700 or so property and casualty writers subject to Proposition 103 would ultimately be affected.  The timing of any final rollbacks also is uncertain because the industry will likely challenge them in court.  Eventually, yesterday's proposal alone could bring some money to "tens of thousands" of policyholders, the state official said.  Approved by voters last November, Proposition 103 ordered a 20% reduction in property and casualty rates throughout California.  But in June, the state's supreme court essentially voided the rollback in cases where it deprived a company of a chance to earn a "fair rate of return" on its investment.  In figuring the rollbacks for the seven, the commissioner said she gave the companies the benefit of an 11.2% return on equity, which she said is the average return for property and casualty writers nationally over the last 15 years.  But Ms. Gillespie said her analysis essentially confirmed many insurers' longstanding contentions that they have been losing vast sums on writing auto policies in the state, and indicated that refunds in that area, which has been at the forefront of the recent insurance-reform debate, may be quite modest.  For one, State Farm Mutual Automobile Insurance Co., the state's largest auto-insurance writer and an affiliate of State Farm Fire & Casualty, "is not profitable," she said, and may be immune from the cuts.  Some industry officials, meanwhile, are worried that making rollbacks dependent on whether a company is profitable could be unfair to companies that are profitable because of superior operating efficiencies.  In a statement, Ms. Gillespie said, "As the first companies to be examined are among the most efficient producers, the rest of the industry should take heed, because this may lead us to very demanding standards of efficiency."  Some industry officials said it would be difficult to measure relative "efficiency," however, and the commissioner herself said she was open to suggestions.  "Our initial reaction . . . is one of disappointment," said a spokesman for 20th Century Insurance Co., Woodland Hills, Calif., whose rates are among those that the commissioner is challenging.  "For more than 30 years, we have utilized some of the most efficient and innovative methods, procedures and systems in the industry in order to keep premium costs low and affordable."  The other insurers targeted yesterday include California State Automobile Association, Progressive Casualty Insurance Co., Safeco Corp., and United Services Automobile Association.  Sears, Roebuck & Co. subsidiary Allstate, with $85.7 million in suggested rollbacks, and State Farm, with $83 million, were the hardest hit of those named.  Allstate and State Farm didn't have any immediate comment.  A federal judge ordered Cooper Cos. to postpone its annual meeting, which had been scheduled for today.  The judge also ordered that all proxies solicited by the contact-lens company and by a dissident shareholders' group be voided.  Both sides have sued each other over alleged problems with their proxy statements.  Judge David N. Edelstein, in issuing his preliminary injunction, said Cooper's proxy statement had failed to include up-to-date financial information.  He said the Palo Alto, Calif., company also had omitted important information about why two directors weren't nominated for re-election.  The judge also found fault with the dissident holders' efforts on behalf of their board nominees.  He said the dissident holders prematurely solicited proxies by making statements to the media before the time allowed by the Securities and Exchange Commission.  A Cooper spokesman said company officials hadn't seen the judge's order and thus couldn't comment.  An attorney for the dissident holders couldn't be reached to comment.  A federal judge threw out a lawsuit brought by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corp. to prevent New York City from collecting certain taxes from Bowery Savings Bank.  Judge John E. Sprizzo said the FDIC has no legal standing to bring the suit.  The judge's decision leaves unresolved the question of whether the city and state properly taxed Bowery Savings.  The suit involves efforts by the city to tax federal aid to savings institutions.  The aid was provided under the Garn Act from 1982 through 1987.  The Garn Act included a provision that exempted the aid recipients from state and local taxes on deposits and interest.  The FDIC and New York tax officials disagree on when the exemption applies.  The FDIC, which guarantees the deposits of savings institutions, says the exemption applies for the entire year in which the institution received aid under the Garn Act.  New York officials, however, argue that the exemption should apply only for the part of the year in which aid was received.  New York City collected $1.7 million from Bowery Savings Bank under its interpretation of the law.  New York State refunded the money it had collected after agreeing to the federal interpretation.  David Greene, an attorney for the FDIC, said the agency will appeal the judge's decision on the ground that it is the U.S.'s representative for dealing with the savings and loan industry.  The judge had ruled that while the U.S. itself would have had standing in filing the suit, the FDIC couldn't because it "isn't an agency which is an integral part" of the government.  Fears of another "squeeze" in soybean futures are easing, as Ferruzzi Finanziaria S.p.A. apparently has sold some of its holdings.  Traders affiliated with the big Italian merchant and soybean processor have been selling soybean futures for August delivery in recent days on the Chicago Board of Trade, traders and analysts said.  Ferruzzi is also believed to have made a major sale on the export market.  The sales have helped spur a decline of more than 40 cents a bushel in soybeans for August delivery on the Chicago Board of Trade in the past three trading days.  Soybean futures were mixed, with the contract for delivery this month tumbling 11 cents a bushel to $6.135.  Many traders anticipated another showdown this month between Ferruzzi and the Board of Trade.  The CBOT issued an emergency order last month forcing traders to close out positions in July soybean futures, saying later that Ferruzzi's big holdings on cash and futures markets threatened a default.  The Commodity Futures Trading Commission, the federal futures watchdog, also pressed Ferruzzi to close out its futures positions.  In a squeeze, one or a few traders holding a commanding position on cash and futures markets during a period of short supply can force prices sharply higher.  Soybeans are unusually scarce as a result of last summer's drought, which slashed the harvest by hundreds of millions of bushels.  It isn't clear that the problem has passed.  Contracts covering delivery of more than 70 million bushels of soybeans were still outstanding on the Chicago Board of Trade as of late Monday, according to the most recent figures available, and only 10.7 million bushels of soybeans are on hand in exchange-certified warehouses.  Nevertheless, the August soybean futures' former unusually wide price premium over other months has narrowed sharply in recent days, reflecting a widespread easing of tension in the market.  U.S. farmers have stepped up soybean sales recently, and beans from the Brazilian harvest have flowed onto world markets as well.  "We certainly don't believe there's going to be a problem with the August contract," David Swanson, a Ferruzzi executive and president of Central Soya Inc., Ferruzzi's U.S. soybean-processing arm, said.  "Of course, we don't think there should have been a problem with the July contract, either."  Ferruzzi has sharply criticized the Board of Trade's action, calling it unnecessary and prejudicial.  Mr. Swanson said Central Soya has been active on cash markets, both to feed its processing plants and to meet its export commitments.  The company needs about 40% fewer soybeans than it did during July, he said.  "We have crushed through {processed} our July needs and shipped our July export contracts," he said.  He reiterated that all of the company's activities on cash and futures markets have been aimed at meeting its needs as a processor and merchant, not at making a speculative profit.  In other developments, corn and wheat prices were mostly higher in a rebound from Monday's session, when corn set new life-of-contract lows.  Many traders bought contracts to cover short, or selling, positions.  Analysts said technical factors also played a part as prices "backed and filled" the gaps left on price charts by Monday's steep drop.  Weather conditions in corn and soybean-growing states continue to favor big crops.  The National Weather Service's outlook for the next six to 10 days, released late Monday, predicts mild temperatures in much of the Corn Belt, and state-by-state reports are showing general improvements in crop conditions.  If favorable weather continues, corn and soybean prices could decline going into the harvest, said Steve Freed, a senior analyst with Dean Witter Reynolds Inc., Chicago.  In other commodity markets yesterday:  ENERGY: Oil prices tumbled as the threat of a supply disruption from violent weather in the Gulf of Mexico subsided.  Hurricane Chantal, the first major storm of the season, hit the Texas coast yesterday but soon lost force.  It was quickly apparent that neither coastal refineries nor offshore production platforms suffered damage.  Meanwhile, concern over Mideast turmoil eased as the deadline for the threatened execution of a second U.S. hostage was extended.  Oil prices rose in early trading, then started to slip back.  By the close, crude oil was down 28 cents a barrel at $18.03, gasoline was off 1.27 cents a gallon, and heating oil fell 0.11 cent a gallon.  The price of gasoline took a beating when the hurricane-caused "buying hype" faded, said Stephen McKiernan, president of McKiernan & Co., New York.  Gasoline is currently the most market-sensitive of the oil products because U.S. refiners can't make enough of it to satisfy summer driving demand and so marketers depend on imports.  But the overall oil price outlook is expected to remain bearish.  Industry strategists say members of the Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries, despite recent agreements to control output, are collectively producing about two million barrels of oil more than their daily quota.  Even if the hostage situation resulted in some military retaliation against Iran that would limit its oil output, other OPEC members would probably step in and pick up Iran's share, one industry official said.  COFFEE: Futures prices rose in reaction to a prolonged decline that has cost them more than a third of their value since mid-June.  The September contract ended with a gain of 3.38 cents a pound at 82.37 cents.  Analysts had been saying the market was greatly oversold but that the pressure from producing countries selling green coffee was too strong for a technical recovery to take place.  Some of that pressure may have subsided.  When the September contract traded at a new life-of-contract low of 78.50 cents yesterday, some support buying appeared, one analyst said.  Increased buying by coffee roasters also was a factor, the analyst said.  A dealer said active demand appeared from an overseas fund and from two major New York trade firms.  Another dealer said great unhappiness about the severe drop in prices was expressed at a meeting last weekend in Colombia attended by representatives from that nation, Brazil and Mexico.  Those major coffee-producing nations reportedly tended to blame the U.S. and certain other countries for the collapse of talks on a new international coffee agreement.  As a result, the dealer said, rumors circulated early yesterday that Brazil and Colombia might close registrations of coffee sales.  This contributed to the market's firmness.  Brazil and Colombia later denied the rumors, the dealer said.  There also was a forecast of cooler weather in Brazil toward the end of the week.  Peter Leavitt, meteorologist and vice president of Weather Services Corp., Bedford, Mass., said: "Cooler temperatures are expected this weekend, particularly on Saturday, but they don't look dangerous for the coffee crops in Brazil.  This has been a season of mild temperatures which have lacked a major freeze threat."  It was too early to be more specific about the temperatures expected for the coffee-growing areas, he said.  PRECIOUS METALS: Futures prices were narrowly mixed.  Gold for August delivery ended with a gain of 30 cents an ounce at $370.80, while September silver was off two cents an ounce, to $5.293.  October platinum advanced $2 an ounce, to $504.70.  "It was a very anemic response to a weak dollar, particularly in gold," one analyst said.  He also said there was a drop in open interest for gold, while silver's open interest rose.  Open interest is the number of contracts that remain to be liquidated by delivery of the commodity or by an offsetting trade.  "It could be that the spread between gold and silver was getting a little too big and traders decided to get out of gold and into silver," he said.  Stock and bond markets were active, and this could have drawn away some trading, he said.  The analyst also said increased tensions in the Middle East may have stimulated buying of precious metals from that area.  Another analyst, however, said bullion market demand was practically nonexistent and that its weakness was the principal reason that futures prices failed to respond to weakness in the dollar.  "What we get is these little bulges of shortcovering that lack follow-through and extend the pattern of failed rallies," he said.  While the Middle East situation didn't trigger any significant demand in futures, it did contribute to a cautious mood that tended to moderate selling, he said.  Reliance Group Holdings Inc. reported a net loss of $6 million for the second quarter, after a charge of $8.6 million, or 12 cents a share, from legal settlements.  New York-based Reliance said it had $20.8 million of expenses related to settling litigation with Walt Disney Productions Inc., now Walt Disney Co., and $10 million of income from an unrelated lawsuit.  In the year-earlier quarter, the insurance, real estate and consulting company earned $13.1 million, or 18 cents a share.  Revenue rose 22% to $911 million from $749.1 million.  Saul P. Steinberg, chairman and chief executive officer, said pretax operating profit from the insurance group was about even with the year-earlier period.  A strong performance from life insurance operations offset weakness in property-casualty and title insurance operations.  At the same time, Reliance reported a $1.7 million pretax loss on its portfolio investments, compared with a $9.9 million pretax gain the year before.  Continental Airlines cut its fares for weekend travel to $75 to $100 each way.  Other airlines matched or were studying the move.  The Texas Air Corp. unit said the lower fares would be valid for the remaining five weekends of the summer -- including Labor Day weekend -- on flights in the mainland U.S. Travel must begin on Thursday, Friday or Saturday, with a return on Saturday, Sunday or Monday of the same weekend.  The $75 fare is good for travel on nonstop flights, the $100 fare on transcontinental and connecting flights.  Tickets must be purchased by Aug. 11, and are nonrefundable.  The fare cuts are certain to generate heavy traffic and cash flow for Continental in the remaining weeks of the summer, before traffic falls off after the Labor Day weekend.  Unlike its competitors, which reported record earnings in the second quarter, Continental posted a modest profit for the period.  NWA Corp.'s Northwest Airlines matched the Continental cut and UAL Corp.'s United Airlines matched it in most markets.  Pan Am Corp., USAir Group Inc., Delta Air Lines, Eastern Airlines and AMR Corp.'s American Airlines all were studying the move.  Dallas investor Harold Simmons raised his stake in Lockheed Corp. to 9.46% of the common shares outstanding.  It was the second time in the past few weeks that Mr. Simmons reported to the Securities and Exchange Commission that he had bought additional shares of the Calabasas, Calif., aerospace concern.  On July 18, Mr. Simmons reported boosting his holdings to 8.03% from 6.25%.  Lockheed said it didn't have any comment on the latest filing.  In the filing, Mr. Simmons said he and companies he controls, including Valhi Inc., NL Industries Inc. and NL Chemicals Inc., hold 6,007,200 Lockheed common shares, including 909,100 shares bought July 18 to July 31 for $47.50 to $49 each.  In Dallas, a spokesman for Mr. Simmons said Lockheed shares have traded in a fairly narrow range in recent weeks, and "we think that's a reasonable price."  Tuesday, August 1, 1989  The key U.S. and foreign annual interest rates below are a guide to general levels but don't always represent actual transactions.  PRIME RATE: 10 1/2%.  The base rate on corporate loans at large U.S. money center commercial banks.  FEDERAL FUNDS: 8 15/16% high, 8 7/8% low, 8 15/16% near closing bid, 8 15/16% offered.  Reserves traded among commercial banks for overnight use in amounts of $1 million or more.  Source: Fulton Prebon (U.S.A.) Inc.  DISCOUNT RATE: 7%.  The charge on loans to depository institutions by the New York Federal Reserve Bank.  CALL MONEY: 9 3/4% to 10%.  The charge on loans to brokers on stock exchange collateral.  COMMERCIAL PAPER placed directly by General Motors Acceptance Corp.: 8.40% 30 to 44 days; 8.25% 45 to 59 days; 8.15% 60 to 89 days; 8% 90 to 119 days; 7.80% 120 to 179 days; 7.40% 180 to 270 days.  COMMERCIAL PAPER: High-grade unsecured notes sold through dealers by major corporations in multiples of $1,000: 8.525% 30 days; 8.375% 60 days; 8.25% 90 days.  CERTIFICATES OF DEPOSIT: 8.50% one month; 8.44% two months; 8.40% three months; 8.20% six months; 8.13% one year.  Average of top rates paid by major New York banks on primary new issues of negotiable C.D.s, usually on amounts of $1 million and more.  The minimum unit is $100,000.  Typical rates in the secondary market: 8.45% one month; 8.25% three months; 8.10% six months.  BANKERS ACCEPTANCES: 8.35% 30 days; 8.17% 60 days; 8.02% 90 days; 7.87% 120 days; 7.77% 150 days; 7.70% 180 days.  Negotiable, bank-backed business credit instruments typically financing an import order.  LONDON LATE EURODOLLARS: 8 5/8% to 8 1/2% one month; 8 1/2% to 8 3/8% two months; 8 3/8% to 8 1/4% three months; 8 1/4% to 8 1/8% four months; 8 1/4% to 8 1/8% five months; 8 3/16% to 8 1/16% six months.  LONDON INTERBANK OFFERED RATES (LIBOR): 8 9/16% one month; 8 7/16% three months; 8 1/4% six months; 8 3/16% one year.  The average of interbank offered rates for dollar deposits in the London market based on quotations at five major banks.  FOREIGN PRIME RATES: Canada 13.50%; Germany 8.50%; Japan 4.875%; Switzerland 8.50%; Britain 14%.  These rate indications aren't directly comparable; lending practices vary widely by location.  TREASURY BILLS: Results of the Monday, July 31, 1989, auction of short-term U.S. government bills, sold at a discount from face value in units of $10,000 to $1 million: 7.65% 13 weeks; 7.35% 26 weeks.  FEDERAL HOME LOAN MORTGAGE CORP. (Freddie Mac): Posted yields on 30-year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days. 9.59%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 8.625%, 2% rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  FEDERAL NATIONAL MORTGAGE ASSOCIATION (Fannie Mae): Posted yields on 30 year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days (priced at par) 9.54%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 8.60%, 6/2 rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  MERRILL LYNCH READY ASSETS TRUST: 8.90%.  Annualized average rate of return after expenses for the past 30 days; not a forecast of future returns.  Tucson Electric Power Co. reported a 30% plunge in second-quarter earnings and disclosed an investigation by the Securities and Exchange Commission of insider trading in its stock.  The Arizona utility also said it expects to operate at a loss in the future.  Net income in the latest quarter totaled $20.9 million, or 76 cents a share, down from $29.9 million, or $1.15 a share, a year earlier.  Included in the latest period is an $8.1 million pretax charge for reserves against potential loan losses in the company's investment operations.  Revenue increased 1.3%, to $153.2 million from $151.2 million.  However, Tucson Electric said it made two important accounting changes, effective July 1, that would have changed the second-quarter results to a loss of $8 million.  Those changes will result in future losses, the utility said.  The company's announcement was made yesterday after the close of trading in its stock, which fell 12.5 cents a share to close at $26.625 in composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange.  Tucson Electric said it will cooperate with the SEC enforcement division in an investigation of insider trading.  A spokesman said the company was notified by letter on July 27 of SEC plans for what the letter called an "informal" investigation.  The SEC asked in the letter that details of the investigation remain confidential, the spokesman said.  However the investigation is presumed to center on stock sales earlier this year by four corporate officers disclosed by this newspaper.  That trading, reported on July 12, resulted in the resignation July 17 of Einar Greve, chairman, president and chief executive officer of Tucson Electric.  Mr. Greve sold more than 34,000 shares of Tucson Electric stock between June 28 and July 6 -- substantially all his holdings -- as a number of important corporate events were occurring, including important regulatory rate proceedings, steps in litigation, and an internal financial report.  Mr. Greve hasn't been reachable for comment since he resigned.  Also selling substantial blocks of stock earlier this year were Joe G. Coykendall, senior vice president and chief financial officer; J. Luther Davis, who retired earlier this year as the utility's chairman; and vice president Joseph B. Wilcox.  Mr. Coykendall, who resigned from the company effective July 1, said he hadn't been contacted by the SEC.  A special investigating committee of outside directors said last week that the transactions of Messrs.  Davis and Wilcox were part of annual sales by the two men at about this time of year and that the company didn't plan any action against them.  In reporting its results, the utility formally signaled for the first time that regulators are likely to slash its request for an annual rate boost of about $80 million.  It said "the tone" of a June 22 order denying it most of certain rate relief it sought "signals an increased likelihood of an adverse decision in the pending rate case."  And the company reiterated warnings that it expects that directors will reduce sharply, or eliminate, the current 97.5-cent quarterly dividend paid on common stock.  Tucson Electric said it ended, effective July 1, as ordered by the Arizona Corporation Commission, the accumulation of certain purchased power and fuel expenses,which has been counted as revenue.  Revenue in the latest quarter includes $15.8 million of such expenses.  Through June 30, Tucson Electric had accumulated a total of $70 million of the special purchased power and fuel expenses.  Arizona regulators on June 22 provisionally permitted recovery of only $3.1 million of that through higher electricity rates.  The company said it plans to appeal the order changing its accounting.  Also suspended effective July 1 was the company's accounting for funds used during construction of the its Springerville 2 generating facility.  The latest quarter's results include $20.7 million of these funds, which under conventional utility accounting are treated as revenue.  Tucson Electric said it made the change because of concerns raised by the commissioners and staff of the Arizona Corporation Commission in the current rate case.  The company expects the allowable costs for the new generating plant to be set in a so-called prudency review expected to start next year.  The utility added that the company itself, its directors, and several of its officers have been named as defendants in a number of lawsuits filed on behalf of investors who bought the stock in 1988 and 1989.  The lawsuits allege, among other things, violations of securities laws, including improper disclosure practices.  The Senate Commerce Committee approved the nominations of Alfred Sikes, Sherrie Marshall and Andrew Barrett to the Federal Communications Commission.  Confirmation by the full Senate is expected as early as today.  The 15-2 vote followed a hearing Monday that dealt with the topic of sex and violence on television, and several lawmakers expressed frustration with the current FCC's emphasis on deregulation.  Sens.  Albert Gore (D., Tenn.) and Jay Rockefeller (D., W.Va.) opposed the nominations.  Mr. Sikes, who would succeed Dennis Patrick as FCC chairman, is an assistant commerce secretary and head of the National Telecommunications and Information Administration.  Ms. Marshall, a partner in the Washington law firm of Wiley, Rein & Fielding, was the FCC's legislative liaison in 1987 and 1988.  Mr. Barrett has been a member of the Illinois Commerce Commission since 1980.  Chris-Craft Industries Inc. said it plans to expand in the media, entertainment and communications industries with the $2.6 billion it will receive for its 16.5% stake in Warner Communications Inc.  But Chris-Craft, which received $1.5 billion of that from Time Inc. as part of the first step of Time's $14 billion purchase of Warner, is still haggling with Warner over the fate of Warner's 42.5% interest in BHC, Chris-Craft's principal broadcasting subsidiary.  Chris-Craft has the option to decide whether to buy the stake back from Warner, have Warner sell it in a public offering or compel Warner to spin the shares off.  Depending on how their differences are settled, Warner could either spin the shares off to its shareholders or to Time's shareholders after the merger is completed.  Both Chris-Craft and Warner declined to comment on their attempts to settle the matter, which is currently the central issue in a lawsuit Chris-Craft filed against Warner in Delaware chancery court.  A settlement of the dispute would end the ties between the two companies, which have had an uneasy alliance for more than five years.  Warner acquired its BHC stake in return for Warner shares that at one point gave Chris-Craft more than 23% control of Warner's voting stock.  That stake has since been diluted to 16.5%.  Under the terms of an agreement, Warner had to get an independent valuation of the BHC stake, then offer it to Chris-Craft at that price.  Chris-Craft would then have the option to buy the stake at the price or compel Warner to sell it or spin it off.  According to Wall Street executives familiar with the talks, Warner came back to Chris-Craft with a valuation of about $725 million for the 42.5% stake, saying it could sell it at a discount to asset value of about $600 million.  The sources said Chris-Craft thought a more reasonable price for the minority interest was less than half that.  In any event, most observers expect Chris-Craft to elect a spinoff of the stake.  The issue the two have been haggling over on that front is how much of a stake in BHC Chris-Craft would legally own after such a spinoff.  Under an agreement made when Time and Warner planned to merge, Chris-Craft would have increased its stake in BHC to 62% from the 57.5% it currently owns.  Warner's position is that that agreement is void now that the transaction between Warner and Time has changed to a purchase of Warner.  Time recently completed its tender offer for $70 a share for 51% of Warner's shares.  Time has said it will acquire the remaining shares with a package of cash and securities valued at $70 a share.  Chris-Craft, through BHC, still owns about 15.7 million Warner shares.  BHC owns and operates seven television stations that make up the nation's ninth-largest broadcasting group.  ACQUISITION: Management Co. Entertainment Group Inc. completed its acquisition of Virgin Vision Ltd., an independent international distributor of filmed entertainment, from Virgin Group Ltd. for $83 million and about a 25% stake in MCEG.  WHO'S NEWS: Michael Wheeler was named president of Financial News Network Inc. and executive vice president of a new Media Networks group at Infotechnology Inc., FNN's parent.  He previously was executive vice president and general manager of the FNN: Business line of programming.  He succeeds David L. Meister, who will have new responsibilities for strategic planning at Infotechnology. . . .   Lamont Olson was named managing editor of Meredith Corp.'s Better Homes and Gardens magazine.  He had been managing editor of the magazine's Special Interest Publications.  He succeeds Kate Greer, who left to pursue other interests. . . .   Bill Kovach, former editor of the Atlanta Journal-Constitution and a former Washington bureau chief of the New York Times, was named curator of the Neiman Foundation at Harvard University.  He had been serving as acting curator.  China has banned imports of television sets, computer hardware, videocassette recorders and a variety of other electronic products to protect its domestic industry, the official China Daily reported.  Also banned is the import of assembly lines for products including televisions, picture tubes, resistors and microwave communication equipment.  China produced 14 million television sets in the first half of 1989, but a sales tax introduced early in the year has resulted in a reported surplus of some two million sets.  Housing Secretary Jack Kemp announced plans to overhaul the loss-ridden Federal Housing Administration, including plans to ask a major accounting firm to test the financial soundness of mortgage-insurance programs for single-family housing.  Accountants would closely examine the General Insurance Fund, which includes the coinsurance, Title X and retirement service-centers programs; and the Mutual Mortgage Insurance Fund, which supports single-family home mortgages.  These programs have been responsible for much of the $2 billion in estimated losses at the Department of Housing and Urban Development, which has been rocked by congressional and internal revelations of influence peddling, embezzlement, poor management and a lack of control over contractors.  HUD has already suspended the coinsurance program, which is responsible for losses of more than $1 billion, and the retirement service-centers program.  Mr. Kemp has also proposed the termination of the Title X program, where losses are expected to exceed $90 million.  In the coinsurance program, the government and private companies jointly insure mortgages for multifamily housing, with the government responsible for most of the claims.  The retirement-centers program provides mortgage insurance for housing developments for people over the age of 70, and the Title X program provides mortgage assistance for land development.  Although untouched so far by reports of scandal, the Mutual Mortgage Insurance Fund had a loss of $368 million in the fiscal year ended last September, the first deficit in its history.  A HUD spokesman attributed the losses "to defaults in regions where the economy is slow."  Mr. Kemp laid out his "FHA for the 90s" plan in a letter to the Senate Subcommittee on Housing and Urban Affairs, which yesterday opened hearings into housing programs.  He portrayed it as the first step beyond the "emergency actions" necessary to "stop the financial hemorrhaging" because of fraud and mismanagement.  Secretary Kemp outlined plans to revamp accounting and management practices, saying "FHA's technology and products are not current with today's changing housing and financial markets."  The current accounting systems may have underestimated HUD's losses, he acknowledged.  The changes also include provisions to attack the fraud that has crippled several HUD programs.  Mr. Kemp wants to contract with major accounting and auditing firms to step up monitoring of FHA programs, 90% of which depend on outside lenders.  "HUD's practices should not make such abuse too easy and tempting," Mr. Kemp wrote.  Mr. Kemp also sought to reassure senators that the FHA wasn't seriously threatened by the scandals, but would remain a "cornerstone of America's national housing policy."  "The Bush administration is committed to safeguarding FHA's financial health and continue its success at no cost to the taxpayer," he wrote.  The FHA insures the mortgages of more than nine million borrowers, according to HUD.  Every so often, Wall Street comes up with a deal so complicated that it sends the average investor bolting to the phone to sell the stock.  For each small investor who scratches his head in confusion and then sells the shares, however, there's a savvy player on the Street who has done the extra work -- and is buying up the stock.  One such deal is the recently proposed combination of Marion Laboratories and Dow Chemical's Merrell Dow pharmaceuticals unit.  Shares of Marion, based in Kansas City, Mo., soared on the announcement, with many small investors taking the easy route and selling their stock.  But some takeover-stock players took a day or so to study the terms of the deal, then bought the Marion shares.  A look at why they are still holding the stock gives some insight into how some of the smart-money folks on the Street make the extra buck.  And it offers some strong reasons why Marion shares still may be a good buy.  Under terms of the agreement, Dow will offer $38 a share for 39% of Marion's common shares in a tender offer set to expire Aug. 25.  That's pretty straightforward stuff: The cash offer is good enough that just about all shares will be tendered, according to takeover-stock players.  Then each remaining Marion share will be replaced by a package of one newly issued share of Marion Merrell Dow stock and one of what Dow is calling a "contingent value right."  That's a fancy name for an option that offers investors protection against a worse-than-expected performance by the new stock at least through the end of the third quarter of 1991.  The right has some analysts excited.  "It's a compelling story," says Wolfgang Armbruster, a special-situations analyst at PaineWebber.  "This is the only security out of the thousands on the Big Board that gives you protection on the downside."  Here's how it works: The contingent rights will guarantee shareholders that in the event a Marion Merrell Dow share is trading below 45.77 on Sept. 30, 1991, Dow will fork over to holders the difference between that level and the trading price.  Dow has the option to extend the rights to Sept. 30, 1992, in which case the "guaranteed" price level would rise to $50.23.  But to ease the calculations, take a look at the picture in 1991.  For instance, if the new company's shares are selling at 30, Dow will pay $15.77 for each right.  The $15.77 would shrink as the Marion Merrell Dow shares climb toward 45.77; if they close at or above that level, the contingent rights will expire worthless.  The one catch: Dow is capping its payment at $15.77 a share, so if the stock falls below 30 a share, the investor incurs any risk below that level.  All this may sound tricky to the average investor.  But Wall Street players, in their inimitable way, have brought it down to dollars and cents.  And having a good idea how much you can pocket makes tricky deals much easier to understand.  One takeover-stock player, Frank Gallagher at Phoenix Capital in New York, calls Marion shares "a unique, low-risk, high-return investment opportunity."  By buying Marion stock, tendering whatever Dow will accept in late August and holding the rest, investors can assume they'll get roughly a 14% annual return, while maintaining upside potential if the shares soar above the magic 45.77 level.  Mr. Gallagher's rate of return is based on yesterday's closing price for Marion shares of 35 3/4 in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  The 14% return is figured by calculating the difference between the current price of a Marion share and the $45.77 a share stands to be worth in 1991.  Mr. Gallagher cautions that Marion shares would be a better buy in the low 30s where the risk is lower, and the potential rate of return climbs near 20%.  PaineWebber's Mr. Armbruster has two scenarios for how to play the deal.  The firm is pitching them both to individual investors.  First, for conservative players, he uses the same approach as Mr. Gallagher -- buy the stock, tender in August, then hold the rest until the investment pays off in 1991.  A conservative rate of return of 14% isn't too bad, he contends.  For more fun and risk, though, Mr. Armbruster suggests this more aggressive strategy: After tendering the stock in August, sell the contingent rights, which will trade separately from Marion shares.  While many analysts expect the rights to sell at $8 apiece, Mr. Armbruster uses $7 as a conservative measure.  By taking in the $7, an investor's pershare cost would drop to 28 3/4 (the closing price minus the $7 for each right).  By holding the stock without the right, the investor has given away the downside protection on the stock, and is gambling that the shares will close above 45.77.  Mr. Armbruster contends that Dow Chemical already is projecting this outcome.  "There's a nearly $2 billion liability to Dow if the stock is at 30 or below" in 1992, he says; that liability gets smaller as the stock price grows.  "Dow is saying, 'We are putting up $2 billion in our own capital to prove to you that this is worth it.'"  The rewards under this scenario are huge, with compounded annual returns of as high as 29% if things work out as Dow has planned and the combined companies trade at 45.77 a share.  But valuing the combined companies in the next decade is the truly tricky part of the deal, and it's almost impossible to find an analyst willing to forecast a 45.77 stock price.  Indeed, some analysts think the combined company could wind up below the 30-a-share level.  "We think the stock today is fairly valued and possibly overvalued," argues Jonathan S. Gelles, who follows the drug industry for Wertheim Schroder.  He expects the stock to trade around 22 1/2, come September 1991.  But most analysts project share prices at least 10 points higher.  Mr. Gallagher, for example, estimates that the shares will trade at about 38 each if the combined company grows at the drug industry's annual average in the midteens.  Neil Sweig, who follows pharmaceuticals for Prudential-Bache, adds, "The magic words are critical mass.  The Marion Merrell situation does make sense in that one and one can make two and a half, and down the road may equal three."  Central to where the stock trades will be the products that the combined company can create and sell.  Marion currently derives about two-thirds of its profit from Cardizem, a hypertension and angina drug.  But that drug is set to go off patent in 1992, and generic competition is on the horizon.  Merrell's big seller is Seldane, a non-sedating antihistamine that is starting to face competition from new products by Johnson & Johnson and Schering-Plough.  The new entity must prove that Merrell's research department can create hot enough products for Marion's super sales force to pitch.  PaineWebber drug analyst Ronald M. Nordmann says that Marion has the highest per-salesman revenue rate in the industry.  He contends that an over-the-counter version of Seldane could become a huge seller, and he anticipates a skin-patch version of Merrell's stop-smoking product Nicorette.  Moreover, Marion is expected to come out with a second-generation version of Cardizem.  But Wertheim's Mr. Gelles is doubtful.  "Generally, line extensions just prolong the agony by increasing the reliance on those products, which don't grow as fast as their precursors," he says.  Counters Mr. Nordmann: The combined company will have a slightly below-average research effort, but "a very strong marketing organization and a fairly well balanced line of products.  We think it's a very attractive deal."  ---  @Marion Laboratories  @(NYSE; Symbol: MKC)  @Business: Pharmaceuticals  @Year ended June 30, 1989:  @Sales: $930 million  @Net income: $227.4 million*; or $1.46 a share  @Fourth quarter, June 30, 1989:  @Per-share earnings: 45 cents vs. 26 cents  @Average daily trading volume:  @1,111,612 shares  @Common shares outstanding: 149.9 million  @*Includes a $16.5 million net gain on sale of two divisions.  Malcolm Forbes, who owns the magazine nicknamed "Capitalist Tool," is going after a hipper audience.  Mr. Forbes, chairman, editor in chief and owner of Forbes magazine, said he plans to launch EGG magazine next spring, which will focus on "the vibrant culture of those alive to being alive," and "the zestful awake ones in New York, Los Angeles, and other major metro areas."  In a statement, Forbes said that Mr. Forbes developed an interest in starting EGG after an unsuccessful attempt to buy the late Andy Warhol's "Interview" magazine recently.  As editor, he named Hal Rubenstein, a writer for such magazines as Details, 7 Days, Elle and the New Yorker.  The Justice Department said International Paper Co. agreed to install air pollution control equipment at its paper plant in Jay, Maine, at a cost of about $4.2 million.  The department also said International Paper agreed to pay the U.S. and the state of Maine a combined penalty of $990,000 for violations of the Clean Air Act.  The proposed agreement was part of a consent decree filed in federal court in Bangor, Maine, which must approve it.  The settlement resolves federal and state allegations that International Paper violated air pollution laws in its operation of a wood-waste and oil-burning boiler at the Jay facility, the Justice Department said.  A spokesman for International Paper said the consent decree "settles a longstanding situation" and that "there was no attempt to evade" regulations, nor was there an admission of wrongdoing.  He said the situation with the Maine facility goes back to the late 1970s, and the company "had carefully written down exactly what happened."  He added, "There was no intent to deceive."  The spokesman said he didn't know of any other International Paper mills where a similar situation existed, and that the cost of installing the air pollution equipment and the fines wouldn't materially affect the company.  Kevin Elster, a slick-fielding, light-hitting shortstop with the New York Mets, recently lamented that his manager doesn't appreciate defense enough.  Maybe Mr. Elster should be in the stock market.  Everybody in the stock market seems to love defensive plays these days.  A defensive play is a stock that's supposed to hold up well in economic slow downs or even full blown recessions.  The usual examples -- food, tobacco, utility and drug issues -- have all been popular with investors lately.  Most of the professional investors in this column's stock-picking contest this month say they're looking for defensive stocks.  But they aren't necessarily looking in the obvious places.  One pro likes razor blades, for example, while another likes computer software used to grade the Scholastic Aptitude Test.  In July, the contest's investment pros turned in a nice, but not stellar, performance.  For the seventh time in 10 months, the pros outperformed a random portfolio selected by Wall Street Journal staffers tossing darts at the stock listings.  But while the pros' 8.4% gain was way ahead of the dartboard portfolio's 5.5% advance, it didn't quite match the Dow Jones Industrial Average's 9% rise.  James H. Morgan, who won the contest five times in a row from December through April, returns to the fray this month.  Thermo Electron Corp., which he recommended in April at $20.75 a share, rose more than 47% to $30.625 at the end of July, earning him a return visit.  Meanwhile, Mr. Morgan has changed jobs.  Formerly director of investment policy for Interstate/Johnson Lane in Charlotte, N.C., he now is president of Morgan Investments Inc., a Greenville, S.C., money management firm founded by his father.  Mr. Morgan recommends the shares of Porta Systems Inc., traded on the American Stock Exchange.  Porta Systems makes devices to protect telecommunications equipment against electrical surges, such as those caused by lightning.  "If a piece of their equipment walked into the room with me, I wouldn't recognize it," Mr. Morgan says.  But he thinks the stock, now about $11, could climb to $16 or $17 within a year or so.  He likes Porta's foothold in Europe, which he thinks will pay off in 1992 when the European Community takes the next step toward economic unity.  He thinks Porta shares are modestly priced, considering that he estimates earnings at $1.10 a share this year and $1.30 a share in 1990.  And he regards Porta Systems' business as one "not generally subject to the whims and uncertainties of the economy."  As a kicker, Mr. Morgan says that Porta Systems' former chairman, who still holds a 10% stake, and some other investors have been talking up a possible takeover, introducing "the possibility of some sizzle."  Greta Marshall, a San Francisco-based money manager, won the contest for July with a 33% gain in Tyson Foods Inc.  She picked the stock because she thought it would be steady in a rocky market.  The strength of the market last month and Tyson's performance were a pleasant surprise.  Her only explanation: "Large food stocks were running like crazy."  Ms. Marshall says she still likes Tyson long term, but would wait for a price pullback before buying it now.  Her new pick is Fedders Corp., which she says has been gaining market share and now makes about 30% of the nation's room air conditioners.  Fedders's earnings and sales growth trends are strong, she says, and it "is recession resistant in that, if people are going to stay home, they may want to be in a cool house."  The shares have been selling lately for about $14, which is "near the bottom end of their trading range," Ms. Marshall says.  Joining the contest this month are two new players.  Theodore K. Levy is director of research for Sage Rutty & Co., a regional brokerage firm in Rochester, N.Y. Jack R. Orben is chairman and chief executive of Associated Family Services Inc., a money management firm in New York City.  Mr. Levy likes National Computer Systems Inc., which produces two kinds of computer software.  One is used in education, especially testing.  For example, the company makes the software used in many states to grade the Scholastic Aptitude Test taken by college-bound students.  National Computer Systems also makes asset-management software used by banks, insurance companies and mutual funds.  In each of its two niches, Mr. Levy says, the company is one of the two leading competitors.  Its chief rival in educational software is Scan-Tron Corp.; in financial software it goes up against SEI Corp.  Those rival companies sell for about 18 times earnings and about 1.5 times revenue, Mr. Levy says, much richer valuations than the market gives his favorite.  He admits that National Computer Systems has shown flat earnings in recent years.  But he argues that cash flow has been strong, dividends have increased steadily, and the company's accounting practices are conservative.  So he thinks the stock should sell for more than its recent price of $12 to $13.  Mr. Levy also thinks National Computer Systems is a good stock for an economic downturn.  After all, even in bad times, students have to take their exams.  Mr. Orben, who expresses pride that his firm once managed some of Ronald Reagan's money, made his pick using a computerized "expert system" developed by his partner, Andrew Beer.  The system, called the Starwood Strategic Program, evaluates about 35 stockpicking methods over periods extending back more than 20 years.  It gives the biggest weight to how well each method has done in the past month or so.  Only after "it gleans which strategy is the dominant strategy at the moment" does the system go on to select individual stocks.  Right now, Mr. Orben says, the system is looking for stocks that would "best resist a downturn in economic activity."  The system has no opinion on how serious the economic slowdown will be; it simply caters to investors' current taste for defensive issues.  This line of electronic reasoning leads the system to Gillette Co., which dominates the U.S. market for razors and blades.  Mr. Orben likes the choice, he says, because Gillette, recently trading around $46, has "a franchise with the consumer."  ---  @ Experts vs.  Darts in July  @ PERFORMANCE**  @ JUNE 30 -  @EXPERT AFFILIATION RECOMMENDATION JULY 31, 1989  @Greta Marshall Plan Buy: Tyson Foods + 33.3%  @Marshall  @Elliott Great Lakes Buy: Chempower Inc. + 14.3  @Schlang Review  @Thomas Blunt Ellis Buy: AmVestors - 3.6  @Czech & Loewi Inc. Financial Corp.  @Robert Oppenheimer Sell short: Honda - 10.5  @Doll Management Corp. Motor Co.  @Experts as a group - 8.4  @Dartboard Portfolio** + 5.5  @Dow Jones Industrial Average + 9.0  @*Capital gain or loss only  @**Four stocks picked by throw of darts: Allstate Municipal Income II, unchanged; Blue Arrow plc, up 18.9%; Carlisle Cos., up 7.1%; Sunshine Mining Co., down 3.8%  QFB Partners, a New York-based partnership formed by Quantum Chemical Corp. and CS First Boston Inc., said it completed the acquisition from Texas Eastern Corp. of Petrolane Inc. and Petrolane Partners L.P. for $450 million.  Texas Eastern is a unit of Panhandle Eastern Corp.  As part of the offer, QFB will receive all of the capital stock of Petrolane Inc. and certain related assets, as well as all of the limited partnership interests of Petrolane Partners.  Petrolane Partners is a master limited partnership.  QFB said that about 98.3% of Petrolane Partners' approximately 13.2 million depositary units outstanding were tendered.  In the generic drug business, being among the first to market means everything.  Vitarine Pharmaceuticals Inc. knows the stakes in the footrace, so when the company set out to introduce its own version of a hot-selling blood-pressure drug a couple of years ago, it took a shortcut -- and a radical one at that.  Vitarine was trying to get government approval for its generic form of a SmithKline Beecham PLC drug called Dyazide, one of the most widely prescribed medicines.  When a patent expires on a big brand-name seller, as it had with Dyazide, the field opens to the generic companies, and the first to concoct a comparable formula is virtually guaranteed a windfall.  But Vitarine wasn't taking any chances: Rather than risk having its own formulation rejected by the Food and Drug Administration, it says an employee simply cracked open some capsules of Dyazide, had the material tested for effectiveness, and sent along the results -- under Vitarine's name -- to the FDA for approval.  A short time later, the FDA gave the green light, and Vitarine was in business.  It was just one of at least five times in the last two years that Vitarine, one of the biggest generic drug makers, pulled a similar switch in an application to the FDA. Though Vitarine's version of Dyazide was the only one of the five proposed drugs to make it to market, it became one of the company's major success stories, helping propel Vitarine from a troubled research dud in 1984 to a company with $28.9 million in profit and $82.1 million in sales in 1988.  There were even plans to take the company public this year.  Then, in April, almost by accident, the scam came apart.  Vitarine's con was one of the biggest ever perpetrated against the FDA, and has sent shock waves through the generic drug industry and the federal government.  Investigators are now exploring whether others, too, got away with the same thing and are asking if, in light of the simple ruse, the FDA is capable of carrying out its chief mission: safeguarding the public.  One focus in the investigation will be a 1984 law -- passed in the era of deregulation -- that made FDA review of generic drug applications less stringent.  "The country can no longer be reasonably confident that the FDA is able to detect the entry of unsafe or inefficacious generic drugs into the pharmacies of the nation," contends Rep. John Dingell, a Michigan Democrat and head of a House Energy and Commerce Committee subcommittee investigating the FDA's handling of generic drugs.  The Vitarine scam is merely the latest embarrassment for the FDA. Already, the U.S. Attorney in Baltimore is investigating a series of payoffs made by generic drug makers to FDA chemists instrumental in approving drugs.  So far three FDA employees have been indicted and two have pleaded guilty.  Complaints by Mylan Laboratories Inc. of Pittsburgh, which suspected certain competitors were bribing FDA officials, prompted the investigation.  Moreover, Par Pharmaceuticals Inc. of Spring Valley, N.Y., last week said it was recalling its generic version of the anti-hypertensive drug Maxzide because it had filed false information with the FDA.  Dee Fensterer, president of the Generic Pharmaceutical Industry Association, a trade group, says events such as this have given the industry "a black eye.  Our industry depends on having the public confidence, we know that."  However, she says none of 24-or-so companies that are members of her association has had a safety-related problem with its drugs.  For its part, Vitarine, based in Springfield Gardens, N.Y., has suspended its two top researchers and an associate, and says it suspects them of pulling off the switch.  In letters to the FDA, the company contends that the employees have said little to explain the fraud and that many research materials and products apparently were destroyed several months ago.  The FDA referred the matter to the Justice Department for criminal investigation.  "Almost overnight, things went from glorious to gory," says Roger W. Jordan, Vitarine's chief executive.  He insists top management didn't exert any pressure on its researchers to cheat.  "This whole thing's a mystery."  As a precaution, Vitarine has recalled nearly all of its various drugs produced since 1986, even though the company maintains the medicines are safe.  Evaluations of the Vitarine products continue, however.  The company says it is fairly certain that, excluding the Dyazide copy, other drugs it brought to market were properly approved by the FDA.  The normal process for getting approval of a new generic drug goes something like this: After examining the active ingredients of the brand-name drug, generic makers devise their own formulations and propose them to the FDA.  The recipes don't exactly match the original drug-maker's, since the specific mix of ingredients in the brand-name drug is proprietary information.  Still, the recipes come close.  The FDA doesn't do a chemical analysis of a proposed generic.  Instead, it relies upon the truthfulness of reports -- which indicate how the drug is absorbed into the body and its effect -- filed by the generic maker or by contract laboratories that do tests for the company.  The FDA's chief aim is to determine whether the generic is "bioequivalent" to the brand-name drug.  Notably, before the FDA's procedures were revised by the Waxman-Hatch Act of 1984, the agency made the generic makers go through a battery of additional chemical and other tests to prove their drugs' effectiveness and safety, not just bioequivalence.  But Congress wanted to create more price competition in many pharmaceutical lines, and therefore expedited the FDA's treatment of generic drug applications.  The effect was to cut down on needed tests, making it tougher to spot a fraud.  These days, once generic drugs are approved, they often hit the market at prices 50% below brand-name products, largely because they simply ride on the innovation -- and attendant costly research and development -- of the brand-name company.  FDA Commissioner Frank Young figures that the generics company that lands first approval for a popular pharmaceutical can snare up to 60% of the nonbrand market for that drug.  While Bolar Pharmaceutical Co. of Copiague, N.Y., was the first out with a generic Dyazide, Vitarine was close behind.  By substituting the brand-name product for its own in the application process, a company like Vitarine stands to get quicker approval than most of its competition -- after all, what can mimic the brand-name drug better than the brand name itself.  In Vitarine's case, once the company got approval, it manufactured the generic with its own, different recipe.  It was largely by chance that the FDA found out about Vitarine's switch.  In April, an FDA inspector paid a routine visit to Vitarine's St. Croix manufacturing plant in the Virgin Islands.  The company, which was already producing its version of Dyazide at its Springfield Gardens facility, had applied to make the medicine in St. Croix as well, and the inspection was part of the approval process.  What the inspector found was a research manufacturing process in disarray.  Records were out of order and materials were jumbled.  A batch of the Dyazide copycat had been mixed for testing purposes, but much of it hadn't been made into pills, as is customary.  "Ungranulated tablets were still in the building, all mixed and everything," says Mr. Jordan.  Company officials back in New York claimed they were as perplexed as the FDA, and invited the agency to its headquarters to continue what had now escalated to a major investigation.  Over a six-week period, two FDA inspectors from the Brooklyn district office and a Vitarine executive uncovered a pattern of missing and mismatched research documents for batch after batch of drugs.  In one instance, records for a batch of verapamul, a heart-treatment medicine, showed that the tablets should have been white.  But a bottle from the same batch actually contained dark-green tablets.  Vitarine's verapamul, which didn't get to market, is a version of G.D. Searle's Calan and was one of the five drugs Vitarine admitted had been switched in applications to the FDA.  In other cases, records showed that certain raw materials had already been used in test runs when, in fact, they weren't used until days later.  In a letter to the FDA, Vitarine added: "We believe that a number of products were destroyed by or under the direction of research personnel {since suspended} in early April 1989 without documentation."  During the investigation, the agency eventually discovered the Dyazide switch.  Vitarine's Mr. Jordan, while insisting the scam was the work of underlings, says he doesn't know what the suspended employees had to gain from it.  He claims they had only modest, if any, stock or stock options in the company.  "The whole thing is confusing right now," says Steve Colton, 39, the company's head of research and development before his suspension.  He refuses to comment further.  Lawyers for all three suspended employees also refuse to comment.  What is clear is that Vitarine's research and development costs have been relatively modest in contrast to its rocketing sales and earnings, and switching products could have been one way costs were kept down.  Mr. Jordan acknowledges that R&D costs generally represent 4% to 6% of sales at most generic drug makers, and that figure runs higher when a company is trying to duplicate a major brand drug.  Vitarine's research and development outlays, however, were just 3.4% in fiscal 1988.  Mr. Jordan says he doesn't consider that low.  He also bristles at the suggestion that Vitarine was unusually successful in getting FDA approvals.  "I don't think we did that well.  We did pretty well.  Others did as well as we did," he says.  When the company's troubles first erupted in April, Mr. Jordan and other officials were in the midst of a roadshow promoting Vitarine's initial public offering of common stock.  But the news put an end to the offering.  "I went from not being a millionaire to a millionaire on paper to a nonmillionaire again," says 55-year-old Mr. Jordan, who owns 1.3 million, or 7.4%, of Vitarine's common shares.  The FDA says it plans to step up surveillance to prevent future frauds like Vitarine's and is creating a new office with new management to handle generic drug applications.  It also says it wants to hire more people to do actual chemical testing and other work to verify the claims made in applications.  But, while the FDA says Vitarine's is the first instance of misrepresentation it knows of, FDA Commissioner Young acknowledged before a congressional hearing that his 7,000-person agency doesn't have the manpower to detect this type of fraud.  The agency's surveillance burden has grown in recent years.  While staffing levels have remained relatively constant, the number of generic drug applications has soared, largely because of the 1984 Waxman-Hatch Act.  In 1985, for example, applications jumped to 1,069, from 280 in 1984.  Last year, the number hit 2,700.  The problem is only likely to get worse.  Hemant Shah, a generic-drug industry analyst in Warren, N.J., estimates that patents representing prescription drugs with total annual sales of $1.6 billion expired in the 1983-85 time frame, driving the growth of the generic market.  But between 1990 and 1995, the industry expects patents will expire for drugs with annual sales totaling $8 billion.  That will prompt an even greater flood of new applications for generics, he says, and a greater burden for the FDA.  At Vitarine, meanwhile, things are practically at a standstill.  Since it recalled most of its drug products, sales have shriveled and the company fears that damage to its reputation may be beyond repair.  Already Mr. Jordan has laid off 96 employees, and the jobs of the remaining 660 are threatened.  The St. Croix plant has been closed.  "If we survive," says Mr. Jordan, "it'll be through the FDA's grace."  The Agriculture Department, citing a leak of market-sensitive information on Capitol Hill, canceled three offers to subsidize U.S. grain sales under the department's farm export subsidy program.  The subsidies had been approved by a Bush administration interagency task force but final arrangements hadn't been made and the subsidized sales hadn't been announced by the department, according to Richard Crowder, undersecretary of agriculture for international affairs and commodity programs.  Until the information was disclosed Monday at a congressional hearing on the so-called export enhancement program, the administration had planned to subsidize the sale of 100,000 tons of wheat to Yemen, 100,000 tons of barley malt to Brazil and 50,000 tons of barley to Iraq.  In a brief statement, Mr. Crowder said he had to cancel the subsidy offers "to maintain the integrity of the program with respect to market sensitivity" and to protect the nation's reputation overseas as a "reliable and trusted supplier."  Department officials treat the status of export subsidy proposals as insider information.  Leaks of such information could give traders an unfair advantage in the commodities markets and could enable foreign competitors, such as European Community nations, to undercut U.S. grain sales with lower prices.  "This information is market sensitive and was not authorized for release," Mr. Crowder said of a list of pending proposals that a General Accounting Office official gave to members of a House Agriculture subcommittee in responding to questions.  Mr. Crowder faulted the subcommittee for the leak, but Rep. Dan Glickman, the subcommittee chairman, countered that the GAO was to blame.  The GAO official shouldn't have passed the list out at a public hearing, the Kansas Democrat said.  "Once that happened, the document became public."  He and Rep. David Nagle (D., Iowa) said that Mr. Crowder should have objected to the list's release at the hearing.  Export subsidies are offered to counter what the administration regards as unfair trade practices, mostly by the European Community.  Under the program, private exporters can sell U.S. grain at prices below those in the U.S. to meet foreign competition, and they then collect government-owned surplus grain as so-called bonuses, or subsidies.  At the hearing, Mr. Crowder and GAO witnesses testified that the program has succeeded in boosting U.S. farm exports.  There have been $8.4 billion in subsidized exports since the program was established by the 1985 farm law, with the subsidies coming to nearly $2.6 billion.  About half of the $770 million alloted for this fiscal year, which ends Sept. 30, has been awarded, mostly for wheat sales.  Mr. Glickman pointed out that "the GAO came out with a glowing report on the program."  At the same time, because of its size, the program "deserves "good, solid oversight" by Congress, he added.  Mr. Crowder said that the canceled subsidy proposals can be resubmitted for review.  Yesterday's action won't affect subsidies that have been announced or the "overall functioning" of the program, he said.  The Chicago Mercantile Exchange restricted most reporters' access to its trading floor on the eve of indictments stemming from the federal investigation of futures trading fraud.  The exchange said reporters would only be allowed on the trading floor with an exchange employee as an escort, and wouldn't be able to speak with members who were trading.  In the past the Merc has had relatively open media access to its floor.  Excluded from the Merc restrictions are a handful of commodity wire service employees who file reports on the futures markets throughout the day, the exchange said.  A Merc spokesman said "we're restricting access for the time being.  We don't want to disrupt the markets."  The Chicago Board of Trade said it doesn't have any plans to restrict media access to its floor.  Paul E. Steiger, Wall Street Journal deputy managing editor, said in response to the Merc action: "We're studying what the Merc has done, but expect to protest vigorously.  This is a time when our readers need more, not less, information.  We hope the exchange will reconsider."  Figgie International Inc. offered to buy as many as 437,811 shares of its Class A common stock and 162,189 shares of its Class B common with prices to be determined by a Dutch auction.  Figgie said it will purchase the Class A common shares for $74 to $84 apiece and the Class B shares for $83 to $94 each.  The Willoughby, Ohio, company, which serves the consumer, industrial, technical and service markets, has about 5.4 million Class A common shares outstanding and two million Class B shares.  Directors said the repurchase will offset the dilution to per-share earnings during the past year that resulted from shares issued in connection with employee benefit programs.  In over-the-counter trading yesterday, the Class A common closed at $75, up $6, while the Class B stock closed at $82, up $3.  In a Dutch auction, the buyer sets a price range, and holders give a price at which they are willing to sell shares.  The buyer then picks a price and buys shares at that price from holders who offered to sell at that price or lower.  Companies facing damage claims from plaintiffs exposed to asbestos and other toxic products got some help from the New Jersey Supreme Court.  In a 5-to-1 ruling, the court limited the right of plaintiffs to seek damages based on an enhanced risk that cancer or some other disease might subsequently develop from exposure to toxic materials.  Such claims won't be considered, the court said, unless a plaintiff can show a "reasonable medical probability" that he will later contract the disease -- an extremely difficult standard to meet.  The New Jersey court, ruling in a case involving exposure to asbestos, joined a number of other state and federal panels that have restricted the right of plaintiffs to seek damages for increased or enhanced risk of disease.  Because some diseases don't show up for a long time after exposure to toxic materials, such claims have grown increasingly common in recent years, not only in asbestos cases but also in those involving exposure to various toxic chemicals.  "There isn't a toxic product case I'm aware of in which this claim is not raised," said Gita F. Rothschild, an attorney in the Newark firm of McCarter & English.  She argued the case for the defendants, Owens-Corning Fiberglas Corp., Pittsburgh Corning Corp., Eagle-Picher Industries Inc. and Keene Corp. Pittsburgh Corning is owned by PPG Industries Inc. and Corning Glass Works.  The case was brought by Roger Mauro, a former repairman and plumber-steamfitter who was exposed to materials containing asbestos made by the defendants.  A trial court permitted the jury to consider damage claims based on existing injuries, which included scarring of Mr. Mauro's lung lining, as well as his claim for emotional distress caused by fear of developing cancer.  The jury returned a verdict of $7,500 against Owens-Corning, Pittsburgh Corning and Eagle-Picher, but nothing against Keene.  But the trial judge wouldn't let the jury consider Mr. Mauro's claim of increased risk of contracting cancer, because his expert couldn't show that it was "probable" that he would contract it.  A state appeals court upheld the ruling and the Supreme Court affirmed the decision.  An attorney for Mr. Mauro couldn't be reached to comment.  In deciding to limit recognition of enhanced-risk claims, the court expressed concern that calculating fair compensation is already complicated enough without having to figure speculative damages.  "Inevitably damage awards would be rendered for diseases that will never occur, exacting a societal cost in the form of higher insurance premiums and higher product costs," the court said.  The court also asserted that such claims would increase the burden of litigating the already vast number of asbestos cases.  Some 80,000 claims, seeking billions of dollars in damages, are pending and new ones continue to pour in.  The court also concluded that plaintiffs in New Jersey can always sue for damages later on if a disease actually materializes.  Singer Co., the defense contractor controlled by the investor Paul Bilzerian, said it named three new directors: Walter A. Drexel, Joseph J. Campanella and David L. Redmond.  Alex G. Spanos, Arthur G. Cohen and Anthony Liberati resigned from the board.  Messrs.  Spanos and Cohen were among the limited partners who with Mr. Bilzerian acquired Singer in early 1988.  Most recently, Mr. Drexel was vice chairman of Burlington Northern Inc. Mr. Campanella recently resigned as president and chief operating officer of Singer to join a company that Singer didn't identify.  Mr. Redmond is senior vice president and chief financial officer of Singer.  A spokesman couldn't be reached to elaborate on a Singer news release.  In June, Mr. Bilzerian resigned as chairman of Singer on the same day that the Securities and Exchange Commission filed civil charges of securities violations against him.  The executive also was convicted of related criminal charges, stemming from certain unsuccessful takeover attempts he mounted.  A group with a 9.5% stake said it may submit a proposal to VSB Bancorp Inc., urging the company to sell its bank subsidiary.  In a Securities and Exchange Commission filing, the group, which includes Zohar Ben-Dov of Middleburg, Va., and Allen S. Greene of New York, also said it's considering soliciting proxies in support of a slate of directors to oppose VSB's management nominees.  The group said its members are "not satisfied with {VSB's} performance and do not perceive that management is fully committed to enhancing shareholder values."  VSB, the Closter, N.J., holding company for Valley Savings Bank, said in a statement, "Any speculation on selling our bank operations is premature."  Since VSB went public last October, its shares have risen about 20% above the offering price, "providing an excellent return to shareholders," the company said.  The investor group holds 217,000 VSB common shares, including 18,000 bought May 16 and 17 for $12.35 to $12.435 each.  In national over-the-counter trading, VSB closed unchanged at $12.50 a share.  Technodyne Inc. said its Action Drug Co. subsidiary filed a petition for protection from creditor lawsuits under Chapter 11 of the federal Bankruptcy Code.  Technodyne, based in Lake Success, N.Y., said in a statement that it hopes to confirm a plan of reorganization in a "relatively short period of time" and that it expects continued support from its major lender during the proceeding.  Under Chapter 11, a company is protected from creditor lawsuits while it works out a plan to pay its debts.  Although company officials couldn't be reached, an attorney for Technodyne said Action's major, and only secured creditor is Security Pacific Business Credit Inc., a unit of Security Pacific Corp. of Los Angeles, which is owed about $12 million.  Safeway Stores Inc. said net income in the fiscal second quarter fell 82% to $7.6 million from $41.1 million a year ago.  The Oakland, Calif., closely held grocery store chain said sales in the period ended June 17 rose 4.4% to $3.3 billion.  In the year-ago period, Safeway posted a one-time gain of $27.2 million from the sale of assets and benefited from a lower income tax rate.  Safeway said earnings in the most recent period were hurt by losses on its 33% investment in Vons Cos., another grocery concern.  In the first six months, net was $16.4 million, down 29% from net of $23 million.  Sales rose 6.2% to $6.5 billion.  Safeway went private through a $4.2 billion leveraged buy-out in 1986.  Xplor Corp. said its board authorized it to buy as much as 10% of the company's stock, bringing the number of shares authorized under the company's repurchase program to 480,000, or 10% of the total outstanding.  To date, Xplor has repurchased 227,000 shares.  The stock closed yesterday at $3.5625, up 6.25 cents.  Federal Paper Board Inc. said it arranged a $150 million long-term loan with seven institutional lenders to repay borrowings related to its capital expansion programs.  In addition, New York-based Federal Paper Board, a manufacturer of solid bleached paperboard, bleached market pulp, recycled paperboard and folding cartons, said it ended talks about selling a 25% working interest in Federal's Riegelwood, N.C., market pulp operations to a Far Eastern company.  Federal didn't identify the company and said it won't pursue this arrangement with another company.  Instead, Federal said it would expand the operations of its white-paper producer, Thomas Tait & Sons in Scotland, which it recently acquired.  Federal said it plans to more than double Thomas Tait's annual capacity of 125,000 metric tons.  In another move toward consolidation in the record industry, N.V. Philips's Polygram Records unit agreed to buy one of the industry's biggest closely held labels, rap and reggae music specialist Island Records Ltd.  The price that Polygram is paying for the U.K. company, estimated by analysts at roughly $300 million, stunned many in the record industry, who said the figure is about 25 times Island's earnings.  But Island is a rapidly vanishing commodity, an independent record company with a small but respectable market share, and Polygram is apparently willing to pay top dollar to grab those crucial share points in the U.S. market for records, tapes and compact disks.  Island, which is distributed by Warner Communications Inc. in the U.S., has about 1.4% of the U.S. market for pop albums, which would boost Polygram's share to about 9% from 7.6% currently.  In addition to such big reggae artists as the late Bob Marley and Jimmie Cliff, Island's musicians in other fields have included Cat Stevens, Jethro Tull, U2 and, recently, a gaggle of U.S. rap musicians including current hit-maker Tone Loc.  The price Polygram is paying "is a lot of money, and it indicates how important the record business is becoming," said David Geffen, chairman of Geffen Records Co., Los Angeles, one of the only remaining independent record concerns.  He added that "record companies are becoming as rare as hen's teeth, and by the end of the decade, there probably won't be anybody left except the five international distributors (Warner, CBS Records, Polygram, Thorn-EMI PLC and Bertelsman Music Group) and one domestic distributor (MCA Inc.'s MCA Records).  Indeed, in recent years, even giants have been gobbled up.  Warner's dominant record unit was one of the main attractions for Time Inc., which agreed to buy the parent company for $14 billion last month.  Two years ago, Sony Corp. bought CBS Records, and Bertelsmann AG bought RCA Records.  The Island purchase will cap a series of acquisitions of smaller companies by the world's recording giants.  Recently, Thorn-EMI paid about $80 million for a 50% stake in Britain's Chrysalis Records, and a group including MCA bought Motown Records for $61 million.  Like Island, most "independents" already rely on industry giants to manufacture and distribute their records globally.  But their ever-growing thirst for cash in bidding for big-name musicians has driven them to seek financial ties -- including outright ownership -- with the industry majors.  And the larger companies are all too eager to buy in their quest to expand market share.  Industry executives said Warner had considered buying Island, but at only a fraction of the price Polygram paid because it didn't badly need the market share.  According to Billboard Magazine, Warner's pop music share, which includes Island's tiny share, was 44.4% in the six months ended July 1, up from 33.2% a year earlier.  By contrast, one record industry executive said, "Polygram is looking at it from a different perspective -- for the first time they clearly have a shot at being No. 2 or 3 in the record business, and it's clearly worth more to them to take that shot."  While Polygram's market share slipped to 7.6% in July from 8.8% a year earlier, its larger rivals have lost share as well.  CBS Records' share dropped to about 14.2% of the market from 18.2% in the same period last year, while the third-ranked company, Bertelsmann Music Group, dropped to 10.8% from 17.6%  Rapid U.S. expansion is a prime goal of Polygram, which on a world-wide basis ranks third in the industry.  Polygram's Deutsche Grammophon, Decca and Philips Classics labels already command more than half the U.S. market for classical recordings, but in the bigger, more-lucrative pop and rock field, Polygram is an alsoran.  Jan Cook, Polygram's chief financial officer, said the unit of Philips, an Anglo-Dutch concern, plans further U.S. pop and rock expansion by buying other small labels and boosting investment in its current U.S. operations.  Island, which grew on the reggae-music boom from Jamaica, said its annual revenue is about $200 million.  The need for a powerful backer drove Island to Polygram, Island founder and Chairman Chris Blackwell said yesterday.  As Island grew, it found itself competing more often with industry giants for high-priced talent, yet lacked the cash to outbid them.  "We were too big to be small, and too small to be big," Mr. Blackwell said.  He added, however, that he doesn't expect all the industry's independents to be bought up by giants.  "Independents are the lifeblood of this business," he said, and are the source of most new trends in the music business.  Mr. Blackwell, 52 years old, started producing records in the late 1950s in Jamaica, where his family had been part of the British colonial establishment for generations.  His first recordings, which he produced and peddled to specialty music shops, were of the island's emerging reggae music culture.  As the reggae beat spread through Britain and the U.S. in the 1970s, his roster of reggae musicians grew to include its biggest stars.  Terms of the transaction weren't disclosed, but Mr. Blackwell said he will receive about 30% of the purchase price.  The remainder, he said, goes to Island's two other, undisclosed investor groups.  Polygram's Mr. Cook said Island will be run as a separate Polygram division under Mr. Blackwell's management.  He added that Polygram, which already distributes Island recordings in Britain, will also handle the smaller company's distribution elsewhere when existing contracts expire.  Island's biggest contract, with Warner in the U.S., expires next year, he said.  Homestead Financial Corp. reported a $19.7 million loss for the second quarter, in part because of the sale of assets.  Last month, the Millbrae, Calif., savings and loan association said it expected to post a loss resulting from the sale of about $1.4 billion of assets.  A year earlier, it earned $807,000, or seven cents a share.  Homestead said it sold $1 billion of its fixed rate mortgage-backed securities, and plans to sell the controlling interest in its finance subsidiary, Homestead Mortgage Acceptance Corp.  The loss on the sale of the securities and the provision for losses related to its finance unit totaled $14.2 million, Homestead said.  The company said it plans to sell another $520 million of mortgage-backed securities in the current quarter.  It said it doesn't expect the sale to have a significant effect on earnings.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Homestead shares closed at $3.375, down 25 cents.  Ford Motor Co. doubled the rebates on its Ford Thunderbird and Cougar models as part of a new package of incentives that shifts away from cut-rate financing deals.  But Ford didn't offer any new money to its dealers, whose reluctance to order more 1989 models has forced the No. 2 auto maker to temporarily close several North American plants this summer for the first time in six years.  Ford is offering rebates ranging from $300 to $4,000 on most of its cars and trucks.  Ford said it is offering discounts of $1,000 or more on 21 different models.  The biggest change from the rebate program that expired July 31 is that buyers of 1989 Ford Thunderbird and Mercury Cougar models will get a $1,500 cash rebate, up from $750 in the earlier program.  The limited-production Thunderbird SC and Cougar XR-7 models aren't included.  The Thunderbird and Cougar are all-new in styling and engineering this year, and Ford started the year with high hopes for the two-door models.  But sales have lagged since January and as of June 30, dealers had enough Thunderbirds and Cougars to last 122 days and 112 days, respectively, according to Ward's Automotive Reports.  A 60 to 65-days' supply is considered desirable, particularly with less than 60 days remaining in the model year.  The other major change in Ford's sales incentive strategy was a decision to increase by one percentage point the interest charges on the most popular loans available through the company's finance arm.  A 36-month loan will now carry an annual interest charge of 6.9% up from 5.9% under the program that ended July 31.  The new rate on a 48-month contract is 7.9%, up from 6.9%.  Ford will still offer a 2.9% rate on two-year loans, but most buyers can't afford the monthly payments on a two-year contract even at no interest.  Ford officials said that as interest rates decline, car shoppers will be more interested in big cash rebates that can be used to boost down payments.  "There's a ton of people out there selling financing," said Lincoln-Mercury general manager Ross Roberts.  "So it's more appropriate for us to give people a lot of dollars."  However, there's an important group of people who aren't getting a lot of dollars from the new program: Ford and Lincoln-Mercury dealers.  Unlike General Motors Corp., which recently began offering dealers big cash bonuses for selling 1989 cars, Ford isn't offering so-called dealer incentives, and still hasn't told dealers whether they will get a 5% discount on leftover 1989 models that they have traditionally recieved in years past.  As a result, many Ford dealers have cut year-end orders to avoid getting stuck with leftover 1989 models.  In addition, Ford has had to idle several plants in recent weeks because of a "lack of dealer orders."  In the latest such move, Ford said it will idle the Atlanta facility that builds mid-sized Ford Taurus and Mercury Sable-cars from Aug. 7-16.  Separately, GM's Cadillac division said yesterday it is raising the rebates on its 1989 Fleetwood and DeVille models to $1,500 from $1,000.  The offer is good until Sept. 27.  Cadillac is continuing to offer $1,000 cash rebates on its Eldorado, Seville, and Brougham models.  Pacific First Financial Corp. said its annual meeting will be postponed until Nov. 1.  In May, the bank-holding concern, based in Tacoma, Wash., said the meeting would be held sometime this summer while Royal Trustco Ltd. sought to meet certain requirements of the Federal Home Loan Bank Board.  Toronto-based Royal Trustco has agreed to acquire Pacific First for $212 million.  Pacific First said Royal Trustco is still seeking to resolve certain issues relating to the acquisition, and will soon resubmit its formal application for approval to the Bank Board.  Who's wrong?  The stock market has been soaring for months on the belief that the economy is headed for a "soft landing" -- slower growth and declining inflation and interest rates.  But the explosive bond market rally indicates a much harder landing -- a recession.  Since mid-May, bond prices have risen as much as 15 points, or about $150 for each $1,000 face amount, according to Technical Data Global Markets Group.  "If you look at the bond market, alone, it says recession," says economist A. Gary Shilling.  Rapidly rising bond prices mean that bond investors expect significantly lower interest rates.  That suggests tumbling inflation, typically a result of a recession.  Indeed, a growing percentage of economists now say a recession seems more likely than a soft landing.  Philip Braverman, executive director of Irving Securities Inc., says economic growth is "plunging more rapidly" than recent economic data suggest.  But looking at stocks, alone, the economy is doing all right.  Shares in cyclical industries such as steel, chemicals and technology -- which rise and fall with the economy -- have tumbled.  But stocks generally are climbing.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average is up 21.79% this year.  Even though news of slackening economic growth hits the papers and television daily, many analysts believe the Dow industrial average is positioned to top the all-time high of 2722.42 set in August 1987.  Broader market averages such as the Standard & Poor's 500-Stock Index already have set new records.  What's going on here?  The market puzzle has money managers worried sick.  Some believe that stocks should begin to tumble just about now and get back in line with economic fundamentals.  Yet many managers believe that other factors will propel stocks higher, at least in the short term.  Specifically, buy-outs, cash on hand, and speculation may be driving up stocks.  "The stock market rally is born of the capital that's flowing into leveraged buyouts and mergers," says Robert Brusca, chief economist for Nikko Securities Co., adding: "Stocks are trading off of liquidation values."  Since the early 1980s, the concept of a stock's value has been radically changed by the big takeover boom.  Only this week, many drug stocks took off on the announcement of the merger of Bristol-Myers Co. and Squibb Corp. Investors bought drug stocks such as Merck & Co. and Pfizer Inc., but not strictly because they are good defensive stocks to hold in a recession.  They bought them on speculation of additional mergers and acquisitions in the drug industry.  The same logic pushed up airline and media stocks recently.  "The market is resilient as long as speculation is there," says Chung Lew, head trader at Kleinwort Benson Inc.  "It needs constant feeding to continue its highs.  It's addicted to speculation, like an addict to drugs."  Mergers and buy-outs also have reduced the supply of stock outstanding, and that accounts for part of the market's gain, analysts say.  Buyers are chasing fewer stocks.  But speculation and takeovers can't totally explain why the broad stock market measures continue to post new highs.  Economist Edward Hyman of C.J. Lawrence, Morgan Grenfell Inc. looks for the answer to the puzzle in cash.  Consumers are spending less, while the Fed is cranking the money-supply pump again.  "When money grows faster than the economy, it goes into stocks," he says.  Meanwhile, money managers believe a verdict putting an end to the dual rally in stocks and bonds is overdue.  "I see this as a tug-of-war that's going to last six months," says James Wright, chief investment officer for Banc One Asset Management in Columbus, Ohio.  "The whole market wants to go up because of the trend of lower rates.  But if you are in the wrong stocks, you are going to get buried."  Dynascan Corp., Chicago, said it will report second-quarter earnings about 50% below its year-earlier profit of $1.1 million, or 16 cents a share, because of the weak performance of its two audio subsidiaries and a provision of $400,000 for the pending move of its Marantz division.  The maker of consumer and industrial electronic products said it expects its consumer electronics business to show continuing strong growth for its Cobra product lines.  However, it said the Marantz and Lloyd's units, which make up the smaller audio segment, will show a significant loss.  Marantz makes high-fidelity audio and video systems, and Lloyd's makes clock radios, personal and portable stereo products and compact audio systems.  Dynascan said that after the move of Marantz to the Chicago area from Chatsworth, Calif., is completed, it expects a pretax savings in excess of $1 million annually, based on lower staffing requirements, reduced occupancy costs and cuts in other expenses.  Graphic Scanning Corp. said it ended discussions to sell an 80% interest in its Digital Mobile Communications Ltd. subsidiary to Hutchison Telecommunications Ltd. for about $68 million.  A spokesman at Graphic Scanning was unavailable to say why the company, which has interests in radio paging, cellular phones and other communications services, ended the talks or what its next move might be.  Digital Mobile provides such services in the United Kingdom.  Hutchison is a subsidiary of Hutchison Whampoa Ltd., which is controlled by Li Ka-Shing, a Hong Kong investor.  Less than a year ago, a Burger King closed on the city's South Side after failing to attract customers from the surrounding black neighborhood.  Today there's a thriving Dock's Great Fish outlet on the site, one of three fast-food outlets recently franchised by Fishy Things Inc., Chicago.  Theda Moore, the franchisee, says sales of fish sandwiches have beaten her projections every month since opening in March.  She expects to post sales of $800,000 for her first year, and earn a profit as well.  "My friends at McDonald's and Popeye's are astounded at the numbers," she says.  Ms. Moore's success shows how fledgling franchise companies can build a niche by targeting low-rent, hand-me-down locations in black neighborhoods.  That concept helped Fishy Things build a chain of 19 company-owned Dock's outlets here and in Philadelphia, which it wants to expand through franchising.  The low-cost approach isn't exactly new among fledgling franchisers.  For years, franchisers across the country have grown by converting failed gas stations and fastfood outlets rather than starting from scratch.  By keeping investment in building, land and equipment to a minimum, "sales volumes required to make profits are lower," says Mort Fleischer, president of Franchise Finance Corp. of America, a Phoenix, Ariz.-based lessor of fast-food locations.  What's more, a new tenant can benefit from the costly market research done by the original franchiser who built the outlet -- assuming, of course, that the market hasn't changed substantially since the research was done.  What is unusual, however, is Fishy Things' strategy of concentrating mostly on urban black neighborhoods.  Thus far, all of the Wendy's, Kentucky Fried Chicken, Burger King and gas-station outlets it has converted have been in such areas.  And most of its future sites will be, too.  "We pick up sites where willing sellers want to find tenants and neighbors are tired of the blight associated with a closed store," says Dennis Robertson, the company's president.  To fast-food industry experts, the concept sounds risky -- but intriguing.  Ronald N. Paul, president of Technomic Inc., a restaurant consulting concern, says that Fishy Things' targeting of minority neighborhoods seems to defy basic retailing strategy.  "Normally you want people with high levels of disposable income, who'll generate lots of traffic, and feel comfortable spending their money," he says.  But minority neighborhoods tend to lack these attributes, he says.  Rather, disposable incomes are low, traffic light, and fear of crime can make people less likely to feel comfortable spending what they've got.  The trick is to judge what levels are still acceptable.  Fishy Things tries to find neighborhoods where traffic flows are high enough and where the Dock's menu is likely to be appealing.  They haven't always succeeded.  One outlet, situated amid closed factories and boarded-up homes in a depressed black neighborhood of Philadelphia, is expected to post sales of only $300,000 to $350,000 for its first year-half that of the average Dock's store in Chicago.  Mr. Robertson says people in the area don't have sufficient disposable income.  "It doesn't do us any good to be in a neighborhood that's 100% depressed," he says.  For the future, he's looking for areas where the average per-capita income is $10,000.  That compares with a national per-capita-income average of $12,287, according to Census Bureau data for 1987, the latest year for which figures are available.  Dock's appetite for cheap locations originated with the company's founder, Eugene S. Qahaar, a black entrepreneur who considers himself a creative sort in the kitchen but no great shakes on the management side of business.  He opened his first Dock's in an abandoned gas station in 1973, but he concedes that he often failed to make payments to his creditors on time.  In 1984, in a move that boosted Fishy Things' credibility with bankers so it could expand, Mr. Robertson, then a part-owner of several Sizzler restaurants, teamed up with Mr. Qahaar.  The company is now one-third black-owned (by Mr. Qahaar and a partner).  Mr. Robertson and two other investors hold the remainder.  Overall, Mr. Robertson says that the company's own stores turn an average operating profit of 15% to 16% of sales, not counting administrative expenses -- a good if not impressive return for the fast-food industry.  Last year, the company had sales of $9.86 million, up 39% from $7.1 million in 1987, and it expects sales to rise 5% to 10% this year.  But because of increased costs associated with its expansion drive, the company expects to post a loss of about $100,000 for this year.  That compares with a loss of $24,000 in 1988 and a profit of $457,000 the year before.  But the company forecasts a return to profitability in 1990.  A Dock's on Chicago's West Side, where the company is leasing a location formerly held by a Wendy's franchisee, shows how drastically costs can be cut by using second-hand locations.  The total budget for purchasing the old equipment and remodeling was only $90,000 -- half of the normal cost for such expenses.  Moreover, Mr. Robertson estimates that buying land and erecting a building, rather than leasing, would have cost as much as $300,000.  Some industry observers question whether Fishy Things' concept of focusing mostly on black neighborhoods and promoting spicy fish sandwiches and other ethnic foods may eventually limit its growth.  "The obvious risk is: Does the concept appeal to too narrow a group?" says Lewis G. Rudnick, a franchising lawyer who represents Fishy Things.  For example, Dock's ran into trouble in a 1986 foray into a white neighborhood in Joliet, Ill., where unemployment levels were high and Dock's name and menu were virtually unknown.  And the little that people in the area had to spend, they weren't spending at Dock's.  As a result, the store closed.  For the time being, though, Fishy Things is content to seek opportunities in its core market, where, Mr. Qahaar says, "We have a gold mine.  We haven't even dug the second tunnel yet."  Caprock Savings & Loan Association of Lubbock, Texas, was placed in receivership by federal regulators.  The thrift will be one of 254 insolvent savings and loans under federal control that will be merged or liquidated after Congress provides funds for the undertaking.  All deposits and certain liabilities of Caprock, which has assets of $457 million, were transferred to a newly chartered federal institution, which assumes no obligations to stockholders or subordinated-debt holders.  Federal prosecutors, on the eve of the first indictments in the massive commodities-trading investigation, struck a series of last-minute plea bargains with some traders.  Among those agreeing to cooperate was a major target of the federal inquiry, veteran grain trader John N. Eggum, who agreed to plead guilty to felony charges, testify against other traders and give up trading forever, an industry official said.  The deal was one of several cut in hopes of avoiding the harshest possible penalties, according to lawyers and industry officials.  The plea agreements should bolster the government's hand in the 2 1/2-year undercover investigation by turning some well-connected pit traders such as Mr. Eggum, 47 years old, into federal witnesses.  Mr. Eggum, who sold his Chicago Board of Trade seat in January after receiving a late-night visit and subpoena from federal officials, was most recently a soybean futures trader.  Other plea agreements were reached in recent days with targeted traders at both the Board of Trade, where soybean and Treasury-bond futures trading is under investigation, and at the Chicago Mercantile Exchange, where yen, Swiss-franc and stock-index futures trading is being probed.  Previously, only a handful of traders had been cooperating with prosecutors.  Separately, the Merc is bringing disciplinary charges against more traders than previously reported for suspect trades with FBI agents posing as traders.  Those exchange cases are likely to anger U.S. Attorney Anton R. Valukas, who has warned the Merc that its internal investigation could hamper his own.  The Merc and Mr. Valukas have refused to comment on the issue.  The Board of Trade hasn't begun any disciplinary cases against its members based on trades with FBI agents, a spokesman said.  "We have been requested by the U.S. attorney not to," the spokesman said.  A news conference is scheduled this afternoon to announce indictments.  Joining Mr. Valukas will be U.S. Attorney General Dick Thornburgh, Federal Bureau of Investigation director William Sessions and Wendy Gramm, chairman of the Commodity Futures Trading Commission.  More plea agreements could be reached before indictments are announced.  A person close to the inquiry said some defense lawyers were continuing to negotiate with assistant U.S. attorneys late yesterday.  Mr. Eggum declined to comment.  His attorney, Miriam Miquelon, also refused to answer questions.  As part of his agreement, Mr. Eggum won't be charged with racketeering, potentially the most ruinous allegation because it can lead to large-scale asset seizures by the government, the industry official said.  He is expected as of now to plead guilty to two counts of fraud, each of which could bring a maximum prison sentence of 10 years.  A judge will decide the length of any jail term and the size of any fine.  Mr. Eggum also reached an administrative settlement with the CFTC that covers his lifetime trading ban, but doesn't involve a fine by the agency.  A longtime wheat-futures trader, Mr. Eggum moved during last year's drought-inspired soybean rally over to the "bean pit," fellow traders say.  The exact trading abuses Mr. Eggum will plead guilty to weren't known yesterday.  Earlier, people familiar with the federal investigation said he was suspected of participating in so-called bucketing -- trades made to illegally enrich those in the pit at the expense of unsuspecting outside investors.  Aside from Mr. Eggum, it was learned that yen trader Brian E. Sledz at the Merc agreed to plead guilty to two felony charges and to cooperate with the government's investigation.  He also agreed to a separate administrative settlement with the CFTC that includes a three-year trading ban.  Mr. Sledz's cooperation with prosecutors predates the most recent round of plea agreements.  Like Mr. Eggum, Mr. Sledz won't be named in a racketeering conspiracy as part of his plea agreement.  Mr. Sledz is among the Merc traders facing exchange disciplinary charges for yen-pit trades with an undercover FBI agent.  Through his lawyer, Mr. Sledz declined to comment.  A lawyer said a soybean trader other than Mr. Eggum had entered into an agreement with terms similar to those accepted by Mr. Sledz.  The settlements and deals leading to them are in keeping with the carrot-and-stick approach the government has used all along.  According to one defense attorney, who asked not to be named, an assistant U.S. attorney told him that cooperation could help a trader avoid a lifetime trading ban from the CFTC.  Dennis Klejna, the CFTC's enforcement director, late yesterday said the enforcement division "would consider favorably" cooperation with the U.S. attorney's office in making recommendations on commission sanctions against traders.  "We do think it's valuable for people to cooperate," he said, but adding, "I don't want to suggest people are just going to walk away."  ---  Robert L. Rose contributed to this article.  B.A.T Industries PLC shares dipped below Sir James Goldsmith's offer price for the first time since the Anglo-French financier's investor group launched a #13.2 billion ($21.85 billion) takeover bid last month.  The shares climbed back above the offer price in late London trading yesterday, but still were down from Monday.  Yesterday's trading reflects growing investor doubts about Sir James's ability to settle a dispute with U.S. insurance regulators before an end-of-October deadline for the offer under British takeover rules.  Sir James is suing in U.S. federal courts to take away from nine states jurisdiction over the insurance issues in his bid for the London-based tobacco, financial-services, retailing and paper group, which owns Farmers Group Inc., a major U.S. insurer.  Some state insurance commissioners are fighting the suit.  "We don't believe it {the lawsuit} has any merit," said Pamela Scott, chief attorney for the Kansas Insurance Department.  "We believe our law is constitutional and we will defend it."  Insurance regulators in California, Arizona, Idaho, Illinois, Washington and Texas also have indicated they will oppose Sir James's lawsuits, which claim that the state insurance laws giving the commissioners authority to review his bid are unconstitutional.  Other states involved in the regulatory review are Ohio and Oregon.  Investors' concerns briefly pushed B.A.T shares about 17 pence below the bid price of 850 pence ($14.07) a share yesterday, though the shares rebounded.  In late London trading, B.A.T shares stood at 853 pence, four pence above the offer price but off 24 pence on the day.  B.A.T trading volume was a heavier-than-usual 6.5 million shares.  In a separate development yesterday, AIM Group Zurich AG, a mergers and acquisitions advisory group seeking institutional support for a counterbid, asked B.A.T Chairman Patrick Sheehy for a meeting to discuss its plans.  But B.A.T and some institutional holders played down the rival bidding group's prospects.  Bruce Davidson, an analyst at London stockbrokers Smith New Court, said some investors believe Sir James "has gotten stuck in America" and others are simply taking profits.  Other London analysts said Sir James's investor group may use the share-price weakness to boost its roughly 1.35% B.A.T stake.  But people familiar with the bidding group said it wasn't boosting its stake yesterday.  Some big B.A.T institutional holders said the price move doesn't affect their perception of the bid's future.  "I don't think we are making much of it," said Stewart Gilchrist, an executive at Glasgow, Scotland-based Scottish Amicable Investment Managers, a B.A.T holder.  He said most institutions won't make further moves until a formal offer document is produced, which is expected by next Tuesday.  The Senate, giving a strong bipartisan boost to President Bush's military spending priorities, approved funds for the mobile MX and Midgetman nuclear-tipped missiles.  By a 62-38 vote, lawmakers provided a crucial endorsement of Mr. Bush's arms-control strategy of simultaneously developing two new, multibillion-dollar intercontinental ballistic-missile systems.  The Senate went along with White House requests for $1.1 billion for the mobile MX and $100 million to proceed with design of the smaller Midgetman.  Partisan bickering prompted the House last week to gut Mr. Bush's missile proposals, making a resounding Senate vote essential in order to give the dual-track approach a chance to survive the House-Senate conference.  Yesterday's Senate action also breathed life into Defense Secretary Dick Cheney's effort to kill production of Grumman Corp.'s F-14 jet fighter.  But in an unexpected swipe at Northrop Corp.'s B-2 Stealth bomber, lawmakers voted overwhelmingly to distance themselves from the Pentagon's ambitious $70 billion plan for the radar-eluding planes.  The Senate voted 93-7 to adopt a non-binding resolution warning the White House that it isn't currently "prudent or possible to commit" to large-scale B-2 purchases.  The resolution also calls on the administration to consider whether "significantly fewer" B-2s should be built than the currently planned fleet of 132 bombers.  The fate of the MX and Midgetman missiles, the B-2 bomber and carrier-based F-14 fighters won't be decided until September, when Congress is scheduled to approve the final version of the $305 billion defense authorization bill for the fiscal year starting Oct. 1.  Work on the Senate bill, which authorizes military spending and funds the Energy Department's nuclear weapons-making operations, proceeded as the House Appropriations Committee adopted a separate measure determining actual outlays by the Pentagon.  By voice vote, the Senate also approved an anti-drug amendment giving federal law-enforcement officials additional authority to force down private planes suspected of being used to smuggle narcotics.  The measure authorizes officials, if all else fails, to fire at an aircraft if its pilot has refused to heed warnings to land.  As debate moved into the evening, there was widespread support for a trio of non-binding amendments intended to prod Japan, South Korea and Western European nations to shoulder a greater share of the allied defense burden.  On the MX issue, the Senate rejected an amendment, offered by Sen. Carl Levin (D., Mich.), that would have cut over $500 million from the White House's $1.1 billion request for placing the missiles on specially equipped railroad cars.  Sen. Levin proposed transferring most of the funds to keep open the F-14 production line on Long Island, New York.  Referring to a similar anti-MX amendment that passed the House, Senate Armed Services Committee Chairman Sam Nunn (D., Ga.) urged members to avoid "that kind of unraveling over here."  Knocking out funds to make the MX mobile would produce "a totally illogical, unsound program" of upgrading U.S. land-based missiles, he argued.  Despite shrinking Pentagon budgets, administration supporters contend that proceeding with both mobile missiles gives Mr. Bush maximum flexibility in arms-control talks with the Soviet Union.  But the White House has met with considerably less success in pressing its case for the B-2.  Just last week, senators appeared ready basically to endorse administration plans that, among other things, envisioned B-2 production soaking up fully one-third of the Defense Department's overall aircraft-procurement budgets in the mid-1990s.  But in the past few days, the mood in the Senate has changed.  During yesterday's debate, Sen. William Cohen (R., Maine) and others urged senators to go on record indicating that they haven't signed off on the full B-2 program.  Noting that "many Americans are understandably shocked" and have complained to lawmakers about the estimated $530 million price tag for each bomber, Sen. Tim Wirth (D., Colo.) said the Senate should carefully assess alternatives, including much less expensive, radar-evading cruise missiles.  The Democratic and Republican managers of the defense bill supported language indicating that the Senate hasn't committed to B-2 production beyond the two or three aircraft likely to be funded in fiscal 1990.  Apparently responding to the public outcry over the cost of the B-2, the House last week adopted more-stringent language intended to suspend production until the administration agrees to deep cuts in the bomber program.  The Senate's action comes on the heels of White House lobbying for the B-2.  Vice President Dan Quayle, for example, told reporters last month that U.S. arms-control positions would be jeopardized if the full B-2 fleet isn't built.  "Congress doesn't have any {other} game plan," Mr. Quayle said, to reach an arms-control agreement with the Soviets.  "They don't have anything better" than the B-2, he asserted.  Three of Malaysia's largest companies controlled by ethnic Chinese, with interests ranging from banking and property development to gambling and manufacturing, are moving to create one of Southeast Asia's most powerful corporate alliances.  But the plan faces daunting obstacles.  One is how to mesh the sizable egos of the three chief executives, as well as the diverse corporate styles they have fostered.  Perhaps more troublesome is a potential backlash from the politically dominant, majority Malay community.  The three publicly listed concerns -- IGB Corp., Malayan United Industries Bhd. and Inter-Pacific Industrial Group Bhd. -- plan to amass significant equity stakes in one another, and two of them have started doing so in the past few months.  They also are discussing collaboration in business ventures.  The proposed alliance marks a sharp departure from the low-key management style many Malaysian-Chinese businessmen have followed since the government acted to reduce ethnic Chinese and foreign dominance in the economy by instituting the New Economic Plan nearly 20 years ago.  One of the plan's goals was to increase Malays' share of the country's corporate wealth; that has kept many Malaysian-Chinese businessmen aware of their vulnerability to politically motivated raids on their shares.  Analysts and executives say IGB feels particularly vulnerable because a nearly 20% stake in the company is held by government-controlled investment agencies charged with acquiring corporate holdings on behalf of "bumiputras," or indigenous Malaysians.  Analysts note that with a strong network of cross-holdings, the three companies would be better able to defend against a takeover attempt aimed at any one of them.  But a financial analyst at a Kuala Lumpur-based stockbrokerage firm adds that the protection offered by such alliances wouldn't be enough to block a concerted takeover bid, especially with the full force of the Malay-dominated goverment behind such a move.  The government also could hinder the three companies' development plans if the alliance were considered a threat to the state's own business interests or to the spirit of the New Economic Plan.  Such moves might be counterproductive, however.  A new aggressive business posture by highly regarded, Chinese-controlled companies could spur lagging domestic investment in Malaysia at a time the government has vowed to reduce its interference in the economy and rely on private enterprise to pace economic growth, analysts say.  If the alliance proves a success, it may act as a catalyst particularly for renewed investment by the country's wealthier ethnic Chinese, disgruntled for some time by what they perceive as dwindling business opportunities and discrimination, analysts add.  In recent years, larger Chinese-controlled companies -- including IGB and Malayan United -- have expanded their overseas operations on the assumption that opportunities at home were limited and their corporate control in jeopardy.  The three companies already have formed some equity links.  Malayan United holds 11.68% of IGB, which in turn holds 20% or more of Malayan United.  IGB recently contracted to buy a 20% stake in Inter-Pacific's publicly listed Berjaya Corp. Bhd. subsidiary.  IGB plans to take a stake in Inter-Pacific itself, and Malayan United may follow suit.  Canadian Occidental Petroleum Ltd. said it plans to build a 60 million Canadian-dollar (US$50.8 million) sodium-chlorate plant near Edmonton in Canada's province of Alberta.  Canadian Occidental, an oil and gas concern 48%-owned by Occidental Petroleum Corp., Los Angeles, said the project would produce about 50,000 metric tons of sodium chlorate a year and could be expanded to 100,000 metric tons.  The plant, to be completed in late 1991, would be the first of its type in Alberta, Canadian Occidental said.  Sodium chlorate is used as a bleaching agent in the manufacture of certain types of wood pulp.  Initial reaction to Rep. Dan Rostenkowski's new tax proposal, which includes an inflation-related cut in the tax on capital gains, indicates he has an uphill fight.  The Illinois Democrat is trying to derail a plan that would reduce the tax rate on capital gains.  But when he showed his plan yesterday to Democrats on the Ways and Means Committee who favor that reduction, no one said he had changed his mind.  Today, Rep. Rostenkowski goes before the House Democratic Caucus, where he is likely to find another kind of disagreement.  Some liberals in the party are likely to oppose any change in capital-gains taxes.  Rep. Rostenkowski, who chairs the tax-writing committee, met for more than an hour last night with the moderate-to-conservative Democrats on the panel who favor the rate cut.  There was no change, Rep. Michael Andrews (D., Texas) said afterward.  "There were no agreements made, (no) commitments given," he said.  Chairman Rostenkowski emerged from the meeting and said, "I'm not optimistic."  Mr. Rostenkowski is seeking to beat back a proposal, authored by Rep. Edgar Jenkins (D., Ga.), that would, in effect, lower the top tax rate on capital gains to 19.6% for two years and to 28% thereafter, indexed for inflation.  The current top tax rate on gains from the sale of capital assets is as much as 33%.  As an alternative to Mr. Jenkins's provision, Mr. Rostenkowski yesterday proposed a version of a plan first suggested by House Speaker Thomas Foley of Washington state.  This indexing plan would remove from taxation that part of the gain that is attributable to inflation.  "If it had been (offered) at the beginning, I could have been supportive," said Rep. Beryl Anthony (D., Ark.).  But he added, "All six are still committed to Mr. Jenkins at this time."  Six Democrats are standing with all 13 Republicans on the committee to form a one-vote majority for the Jenkins proposal.  In addition to meeting with the House Democratic Caucus, Mr. Rostenkowski said he intended to meet with the Republicans on his committee today.  But many of them already had met in private yesterday and decided to remain committed to the Jenkins proposal.  "They're still solid," said a spokesman for Rep. Bill Archer of Texas, the senior Republican on the committee.  Mr. Rostenkowski entered the meeting without the backing of the Bush administration for his proposal.  And, according to participants in the meeting, the chairman said he was unlikely to get it.  Administration officials continue to insist that they won't accept indexing alone.  "Indexing benefits conventional, low-risk investors," says Budget Director Richard Darman.  "We want something that would also reward the true job creators and innovators, the risk-takers and sweat-equity people who are key to keeping America No. 1."  Mr. Darman's comments suggest the administration may try to change the politics of the capital-gains debate so that it no longer pits rich against poor, but rather entrepreneurs against ordinary investors.  Indexing the tax system to inflation, proposed by Mr. Rostenkowski, provides relatively greater benefits to investors who earn small returns over many years.  A rate differential, pushed by the administration, provides more benefits to venture-capital investors who may earn large returns in a short period.  ---  Alan Murray contributed to this article.  Apple Computer Inc. said it cut the price of its Macintosh SE computers by $300 in the U.S.  The maker of personal computers also said it will include additional floppy-disk storage capacity on Macintosh SE models.  The price cut reflects Apple's desire to boost sales of its lower-priced computers, which have been lagging behind sales of its high-end models.  The cut brings the price of a one megabyte Macintosh SE to $2,869.  That price, however, is still $100 higher than the price at which the machine was first offered.  Last September, Apple raised the price of the Macintosh SE about 14% to $3,169.  Kraft General Foods is so eager to make foods containing fat substitutes that it has ordered a rival's replacement -- even though it is developing a substitute of its own.  Kraft, the nation's largest food company, placed an order for Simplesse, a NutraSweet Co. product not yet approved for human consumption.  The order is the first NutraSweet has received for Simplesse, one of several fat substitutes long awaited by the food industry.  Kraft General Foods, owned by Philip Morris Cos., recently acknowledged that it is developing a similar product, but the company apparently believes that any substitute would be a powerful marketing tool, particularly to regain lost ground in its mayonnaise war with CPC International Inc.'s Hellman's brand.  Initially, Kraft would use Simplesse only in mayonnaise-type products, which include its Miracle Whip salad dressing.  But many other Kraft products -- from salad dressing to ice cream, cheese and yogurt -- also are likely candidates for fat substitutes.  Neither company would say when shipments to Kraft would begin, or give other terms of the agreement.  NutraSweet trumpeted Simplesse's development in January 1988.  Last fall, the Monsanto Co. unit asked the Food and Drug Administration to clear Simplesse for use in frozen desserts.  That request, known as a "generally recognized as safe" petition, still is awaiting FDA action.  One FDA source expressed surprise at the NutraSweet-Kraft announcement and speculated that both companies might be seeking an edge on competitors -- NutraSweet by attracting orders and Kraft by obtaining a substitute before rivals.  But another official said NutraSweet had told the agency several weeks ago to expect a supply agreement soon.  Procter & Gamble Co. also has filed for approval of a fat substitute product, called Olestra, a synthetic combination of sugar and fatty acids.  Simplesse, like Kraft's substitute, is a natural mixture of egg whites and milk.  A NutraSweet spokeswoman said the company wasn't trying to pressure the FDA to speed the approval process on Simplesse.  "We're going to work closely with the FDA and will make sure if they require review for use of Simplesse in mayonnaise products that we will comply," she said.  While awaiting government approval, NutraSweet also has been calling on other prospective customers.  Yesterday a spokesman for Borden Inc., the nation's largest dairy company, said it plans to meet with NutraSweet representatives later this month.  The spokesman wouldn't say which products were candidates for the fat substitute.  "Monsanto may be a little bit distressed on how long it's taken to get approval of what they view as a natural product," said John McMillin, food analyst at Prudential-Bache Securities Inc.  He noted that Kraft has been losing market share to CPC's Hellman's brand in the $660 million mayonnaise market, where he said Hellman's has a 53.3% share and Kraft has 23%.  Kraft has lost three percentage points in the past two years, while Hellman's has gained more than four points, Mr. McMillin said.  "Kraft feels like this product might give it a competitive edge," he said.  Kraft acknowledged the possibility that the FDA may have questions about the use of Simplesse in mayonnaise and related products, but indicated that the agency may give broad approval when it rules on NutraSweet's pending petition.  A Kraft spokesman noted that NutraSweet has promised to work closely with the agency on any review of mayonnaise-type items and likened the situation to the "budget approval for the B-2 bomber.  No one knows whether it will happen or how long it will take."  Pantera's Corp. said its secured lenders agreed to waive for 30 days any default caused by the company's inability to pay principal and interest due yesterday.  For the loss-troubled operator of Pizza Inn restaurants, the waiver provides additional time to attempt to restructure its $36 million in senior debt.  The company has said that it is exploring all available options, including the private placement of equity and the sale of assets.  Rio Algom Ltd. said it completed the sale of its specialty and stainless steel manufacturing operations to Sammi Steel Co. of South Korea for about 250 million Canadian dollars ($211.7 million).  Rio Algom is a mining and specialty steel producer 51.5%-owned by RTZ Corp. PLC of London.  SOME FUTURES TRADERS have agreed to plead guilty and cooperate with prosecutors on the eve of the first indictments in the Chicago commodities-trading probe.  The plea bargains should bolster the government's hand in the 2 1/2-year-old inquiry.  Among those said to be striking deals is a major target of the investigation, grain trader John Eggum.  ---  HomeFed's main thrift unit won Bank Board approval to leave the bankrupt FSLIC. Other big thrifts have been unable to quit the insurance fund because of fears an exodus will undermine the S&L system.  ---  Fed Chairman Greenspan said the nation won't know until "well into next year" whether the Fed has managed to slow the economy without a recession.  "I think we will make it," Greenspan told a Senate panel.  Purchasing agents said their index of economic conditions declined to a six-year low in July.  Also, construction spending fell 0.8% in June.  ---  Rite Aid has been indicted along with President Martin Grass for allegedly trying to bribe an Ohio pharmacy regulator in April.  The case has already hurt the reputation of the nation's largest drug-store chain.  ---  Seven major insurers were tentatively ordered by California to refund $305.3 million to consumers, the first such move since the state's Proposition 103 was approved in November.  ---  Toyota plans to revamp management as part of an effort to grab a bigger share of the world auto market.  The company also will spend $730 million on amenities for workers.  ---  Rostenkowski's new tax plan ran into opposition among Democrats on the Ways and Means panel, indicating the proposal faces an uphill fight.  ---  Tucson Electric Power said second-quarter profit plunged 30%.  It also disclosed an SEC investigation of insider trading in its stock.  --- Kodak's profit plunged 85% in the second quarter, mainly because of an expected restructuring charge of $227 million.  The company expects second-half earnings to be flat.  ---  J.P. Morgan hopes to cut about 10% of its work force, or about 1,500 employees, over the next 18 months.  ---  Philips' Polygram Records agreed to buy one of the biggest privately owned labels, Island Records of Britain, for an estimated $300 million.  ---  Walt Disney plans to double the size of its new Disney-MGM Studios Theme Park in Orlando, Fla., because crowds have far exceeded capacity.  ---  A group including U S West won a lucrative 15-year franchise to develop Hong Kong's first cable TV system.  ---  Loral Corp. has been sued by angry shareholders and a losing bidder for selling two divisions to Chairman Bernard Schwartz for $455 million.  ---  Markets --  Stocks: Volume 225,280,000 shares.  Dow Jones industrials 2641.12, off 19.54; transportation 1278.98, up 1.24; utilities 220.45, off 0.75.  Bonds: Shearson Lehman Hutton Treasury index 3398.84, up 26.82.  Commodities: Dow Jones futures index 128.47, up 0.35; spot index 128.58, up 0.10.  Dollar: 135.90 yen, off 1.05; 1.8510 marks, off 0.0138.  Boosted by strong results in its life insurance, consumer lending and leasing operations, Transamerica Corp. said net income rose 13% in its second quarter.  Net was $91.3 million, or $1.15 a share, compared with $80.5 million, or $1.03 a share, a year earlier.  The year-ago figures were restated.  Transamerica said its consumer lending business achieved record results in the quarter, with consumer loans secured by real estate growing to $2.5 billion.  Its leasing business also posted record results.  Demand for standard containers was high because of strong world trade, Transamerica said.  However, the San Francisco-based company said its real estate operations reported lower earnings.  In the first six months, net was $162.1 million, or $2.04 a share, compared with $111.3 million, or $1.39 a share, a year earlier.  The year-ago first half included a $36.9 million one-time charge to reflect the effects of an accounting change.  The dollar sagged as a report on U.S. economic activity fueled speculation that the Federal Reserve will ease credit in the near future.  Technically motivated dollar sales accelerated the U.S. currency's decline in afternoon trading in New York, when the dollar sank below an important support level against the mark, foreign exchange traders reported.  The July U.S. purchasing managers' report on manufacturing reflected the third straight decline in activity and helped confirm that the economy is slowing, meaning that the Fed may ease credit further, traders said.  "By and large, the interest-rate differential and the slowing economy continue to weigh on the dollar," said Susan Babcock, vice president of corporate foreign exchange at Hong Kong and Shanghai Banking Corp.  In late afternoon New York trading, the dollar was at 1.8510 marks, down from 1.8648 marks Monday, and at 135.90 yen, down from 136.95 yen.  The pound was at $1.6650, little changed from $1.6651.  In Tokyo Wednesday, the dollar opened for trading at 135.58 yen, down from Tuesday's Tokyo close of 136.65 yen.  The purchasing managers' index declined to 46.0% in July from 48.8% in June, hitting its lowest level since January 1983.  A reading below 50 indicates that the manufacturing segment of the economy is generally declining; above 50 indicates that it is generally expanding.  The dollar was confined to fairly narrow ranges in Asian and early European trading as market participants concentrated on mark-yen trading.  The German currency traded in a range between 73.30 yen and 73.65 yen through most of New York trading.  At the New York finish, the mark was unchanged at 73.46 yen.  The mark's intraday highs against the yen added to the dollar's troubles as the U.S. currency fell to a critical level at 1.8550 marks.  The dollar's penetration of the support level prompted a wave of stop-loss dollar sales that sent the dollar to 1.85 marks.  Traders also noted that the mark posted gains against the pound as the perception grows that the Bank of England is uncomfortable about sterling trading above 3.10 marks.  Above that level, the pound could undermine tenuous progress in the U.K.'s trade adjustment process, they said.  The pound finished New York trading at 3.0807 marks, down from 3.1062 marks Monday.  The pound surged about two weeks ago when British Chancellor of the Exchequer Nigel Lawson predicted that inflation had reached its peak and pledged to hold interest rates high.  Ms. Babcock noted that other high-yield currencies have reaped benefits from the lackluster dollar performance.  The Australian dollar, for instance, has rebounded from a tumble it took in mid-July, when a British brokerage firm predicted a sharp depreciation in the currency.  On July 19, the day after the report, the Australian dollar was fetching 74.45 U.S. cents in New York.  The unit finished New York trading Tuesday at 76.57 U.S. cents.  On the Commodity Exchange in New York, gold for current delivery settled at $370.80 an ounce, up 30 cents.  Estimated volume was a moderate three million ounces.  In early trading in Hong Kong Wednesday, gold was at $370.35 an ounce.  Sperry Corp., a unit of Unisys Corp., was given a $17.4 million Air Force contract for aerial targets.  ISC Cardion Electronics Inc. won a $13.4 million Navy contract for radar displays.  Recession worries and program trading knocked stock prices around in volatile trading and left leading market averages lower at the close.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average gave up most of Monday's 25.42-point gain, falling 19.54 to 2641.12.  Among broader averages, the Standard & Poor's 500-stock index fell 2.33 to 343.75, and the New York Stock Exchange composite index dropped 1.03 to 191.38.  New York Stock Exchange volume was heavy at 225,280,000 shares.  Traders said volume lately has been heavy in the first hours of trading, a sign of foreign investor activity and of aggressive stock-switching by U.S. accounts.  Yesterday's volatility reflected crosscurrents of investor sentiment: Recession fears pulled the market lower, but euphoria over declining interest rates buoyed stock prices when the selling eased.  Stock-switching and profit-taking by institutional investors helped create discrepancies between the cash and futures markets that gave rise to stock-index arbitrage.  In this strategy, traders buy or sell futures against an opposite position in stocks to take advantage of small price differences.  Successive blasts of buy and sell programs buffeted the market throughout the session, sending the industrial average up more than 14 points shortly after the opening and back up to a gain of more than 16 in early afternoon.  But equally stiff sell programs sent the indexes swinging below Monday's close at several points during the day.  "With these inter-hour death dips, the market is very, very hard to trade," said Joseph Barthel, director of technical strategy at Butcher & Singer in Philadelphia.  Ex-dividend trading in Chevron, Primerica and Union Carbide reduced the industrial average by about two points.  Stocks turned lower in the first hour of trading after an economic report revived recession fears.  The index of business conditions as reported by U.S. purchasing managers declined for the third month in a row, hitting 46% in July, its lowest point since January 1983.  Bonds rallied in response to the report, and interest-rate-sensitive stocks gained.  Primerica added 3/4 to 27 5/8.  Morgan Stanley initiated coverage of the stock with a buy recommendation, according to Dow Jones Professional Investor Report.  A.G. Edwards rose 1 to 28 1/4 on expectations that it will report strong earnings for the second quarter.  Increased activity in the financial markets is expected to benefit the earnings of many securities firms.  Among other stocks in that industry, Merrill Lynch rose 1/8 to 35, Shearson Lehman Hutton gained 1/8 to 23 1/4 and Bear Stearns climbed 3/8 to 17 1/8.  Bear Stearns reported net income of 50 cents a share for its fourth quarter, up from 19 cents a year earlier.  Centel surged 2 1/2 to 52 1/2.  Donaldson, Lufkin & Jenrette put the stock on its buy list.  The securities firm earlier had a "buy-hold" rating on the stock.  The stock also was cited as a favorite by investor Mario Gabelli in this week's issue of Barron's.  Rite-Aid lost 7/8 to 38 3/4 after the indictment of its president, Martin Grass, by a county grand jury in Cleveland.  Mr. Grass is charged with attempting to bribe an official of the Ohio Pharmacy Board.  Cameron Iron Works tumbled 1 3/8 to 22 1/8 after agreeing to a stock-swap merger with Cooper Industries, which gained 1/2 to 34 1/8.  Under merger terms, Cameron holders will receive Cooper Industries convertible exchangeable preferred for their shares.  On the market's technical outlook, Michael Metz, strategist at Oppenheimer, said there are plenty of late-comers who have missed the recent rally and are waiting to buy.  They will cushion the market against steep losses, he said.  "There is too much of a backlog of demand to stop the rise yet," Mr. Metz added.  He said he sees cyclical stocks taking over the leadership from the consumer issues that have led the rally so far this summer.  Over the past several weeks, investors have sold cyclical stocks such as steel and chemicals, which typically rise and fall with economic growth.  But now, some believe they are trading at values that more than reflect the impact of a recession on earnings.  Consequently, these stocks are the market's cheap buy, Mr. Metz said.  "We'll see a rotation into cyclicals that more than counters profit-taking in the 'nifty 50' leaders," he said.  Cyclical issues are selling at six or seven times earnings now, he said, which is well below the broader market's multiple of about 12.  Earnings reports moved several stocks yesterday.  Eastman Kodak slipped 1 1/4 to 47 after reporting that its second-quarter net fell to 18 cents a share from $1.20 a year earlier.  The latest quarter included a charge of $350 million for restructuring.  Lomas Financial tumbled 7/8 to 7 5/8.  The financial services company suspended dividends on its common and preferred, citing its loss of $282.4 million for the year ended June 30.  Katy Industries, which reported second-quarter profit from continuing operations of 35 cents a share, fell 2 to 24.  The company earned $1.14 a share a year earlier.  Zapata slid 3/8 to 3 3/8.  It reported a loss of $26.1 million for its third quarter, ended June 30, compared with a $15.9 million loss a year earlier.  The American Stock Exchange Index fell 0.75 to 375.81.  Volume totaled 14,190,000 shares.  Massachusetts banker and investor Edward S. Buchanan agreed to pay a $1 million fine to settle Federal Reserve charges that he didn't obtain approval to buy large blocks of stock in other banks.  The fine is the largest ever imposed by the Fed.  A Fed spokesman said that the previous highest fine wasn't publicly disclosed.  The largest previously disclosed fine was $600,000 paid by Household International Inc. to settle charges that the company used its limited-service bank to make commercial loans.  Household neither admitted nor denied any wrongdoing.  As part of the settlement with Mr. Buchanan, who is the president of Massachusetts Bank & Trust Co., Brockton, the Fed agreed not to disclose the charges.  But the American Banker reported -- and sources confirmed -- that the Fed charged Mr. Buchanan with disregarding provisions of the Bank Holding Company Act that require prior Fed approval of purchases of more than 5% of another banking company's stock.  The American Banker, a financial-services newspaper, said that Mr. Buchanan didn't ask for approval in the takeover attempts of at least three companies: Union Warren Savings Bank, Boston; Abington National Bank, Abington, Mass.; and Westport Bancorp, Westport, Conn.  "I strenuously object to the allegations made by the Federal Reserve," Mr. Buchanan said in a statement.  He couldn't be reached for further comment.  The Fed spokesman said he couldn't discuss the central bank's reasons for not making the charges public.  Computerized program trading pushed stock prices up and down, and bond prices rallied on news of slower economic growth and inflation.  The dollar took another dive against most other major currencies.  After seesawing through much of the day, the Dow Jones Industrial Average closed with a loss of 19.54 points at 2641.12 in heavy trading.  The prospect of further easing of credit by the Federal Reserve, meanwhile, propelled bond prices higher and drove the dollar lower.  The National Association of Purchasing Management's July survey set the stage for much of the action in financial markets.  The survey's index of business conditions in July fell to 46%, indicating that the nation's manufacturing sector contracted for the third consecutive month.  The index was the lowest since January 1983.  Stock and bond markets also got a boost from Fed Chairman Alan Greenspan's comments that the Fed has apparently been successful in defusing inflation and that the economy remains on course for a "soft landing" -- modest growth with lower inflation and interest rates.  The bond market rally started in overseas trading and gathered steam after the purchasing managers' report was released.  At its midday peak, the Treasury's benchmark 30-year bond was up more than two points, or $20 for each $1,000 face amount, and the yield was down to 7.76%.  But by the end of trading, the bond had given back about a point of that gain and was yielding 7.83%.  Stock prices were even more volatile, fueled as they were by computerized trading tied to stock index arbitrage.  They rallied twice during the day, carrying the Dow Jones industrials up as much as 16 points.  But the subsequent retreats were harsh, at one point knocking the average down nearly 25 points from its opening level of 2660.66, a post-crash high.  Analysts said the swings reflected uncertainty among investors about the risks and benefits that came with rapidly falling interest rates.  "Three months ago, I don't think anyone would have predicted that the yield on the 30-year Treasury bond would hit 7.76%," said Charles Clough, chief portfolio strategist at Merrill Lynch.  "That's just an indication of how fast interest rates can fall, and that's unmitigatingly positive for stocks."  But he also said investors are worried about the outlook for corporate earnings in a declining economy.  "The only question {in the} near term is the sustainability of corporate earnings," he said.  In major market activity:  Stock prices sank in heavy trading.  Volume on the New York Stock Exchange totaled 225.3 million shares.  Declining issues on the Big Board were ahead of gainers, 808-729.  Bond prices rallied.  The Treasury's benchmark 30-year bond gained more than a point.  The dollar fell against most other currencies.  In late New York trading, the dollar was quoted at 1.8510 marks and 135.90 yen, compared with 1.8648 marks and 136.95 yen late Monday.  Vermont American Corp., Louisville, Ky., said directors rejected proposals by Newell Co. of Freeport, Ill., to acquire a 20% to 25% stake in the maker of consumer and industrial tools, or to merge with it.  A price wasn't discussed in connection with either proposal.  Instead, directors agreed to continue to investigate the possible sale of Vermont American and allow Bear, Stearns & Co., its investment broker, to solicit offers from prospective purchasers.  The board said Newell, which in June ended a tender offer to buy as many as 1.2 million of Vermont American's Class A common shares at $30.50 a share, could make an offer "on the same basis as all others."  Newell had wanted to negotiate a transaction outside of the company's current process, Vermont American said.  No officers of Newell, a maker of do-it-yourself home products, could be reached for comment.  Vermont American said it amended its shareholder rights plan to permit it, for a limited time, to lower the threshold at which the rights are triggered.  As amended, the rights would be granted if any party acquires an additional 2% of Vermont American's stock and, following that acquisition, controls at least 15% of the company.  The following were among Friday's offerings and pricings in the U.S. and non-U.S. capital markets, with terms and syndicate manager, as compiled by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report:  @ CORPORATES  IBM Credit Corp. -- $400 million of 7 3/4% notes, due Aug. 14, 1992, priced at 99.90 to yield 7.79%.  The issue is noncallable and was priced at a yield spread 32 basis points above the three-year Treasury note.  Rated triple-A by Moody's Investors Service Inc. and triple-A by Standard & Poor's Corp., the issue will be sold through underwriters led by Salomon Brothers Inc.  General Motors Acceptance Corp. -- $300 million of 8 1/4% notes, due Aug. 1, 1996, priced at 99.944 to yield 8.26%.  The issue is non-callable and was priced at a yield spread 72 basis points above the Treasury seven-year note.  Rated double-A-3 by Moody's and double-A-minus by S&P, the issue will be sold through underwriters led by Merrill Lynch Capital Markets.  The issuer is a unit of General Motors Corp.  South Central Bell Telephone Co. -- $300 million of 8 1/2% debentures, due Aug. 1, 2029, priced at 97.25 to yield 8.748%.  The issue is non-callable for five years and was priced at a yield spread 97 basis points above the 30-year Treasury bond.  Rated triple-A by Moody's and S&P, the issue will be sold through underwriters led by Morgan Stanley & Co.  The issuer is a unit of Bellsouth Corp.  Ford Motor Credit Corp. -- $200 million of 8% notes, due Aug. 1, 1994, priced at 99.634 to yield 8.09%.  The issue is noncallable and was priced at a yield spread 68 basis points above the five-year Treasury note.  Rated double-A-2 by Moody's and double-A by S&P, the issue will be sold through Merrill Lynch Capital Markets.  The issuer is a unit of Ford Motor Co.  Potomac Electric Power Co. -- $75 million of 8 5/8% first mortgage bonds, due Aug. 15, 2019, via Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc., priced at 98.555 for a yield of 8.76%.  The bonds are nonrefundable for five years and were priced at a yield spread 98 basis points above the Treasury's 30-year bond.  The bonds are rated double-A-1 by Moody's and double-A by S&P.  Willcox & Gibbs Inc. -- $50 million of 7% convertible subordinated debentures, due Aug. 1, 2014 was priced at par.  The debentures are convertible into common stock at $24.30 a share, representing a 21.5% conversion premium.  Rated single-B-2 by Moody's and single-B-plus by S&P, the issue will be sold through Goldman Sachs & Co.  @ MUNICIPALS  California -- $3 billion of 6 1/4%, 1989 revenue anticipation notes, dated Aug. 8, 1989, and due June 29, 1990, priced by a Bank of America NT&SA group to yield 5.65%.  The notes are rated MIG-1 by Moody's and SP1-Plus by S&P.  Puerto Rico Electric Power Authority -- $1 billion various bonds, including $585.8 million power revenue refunding bonds Series N and $414.2 million power revenue bonds Series O, repriced by a Prudential-Bache Capital Funding group to lower most yields by five to 10 basis points.  The size of the offering was increased to $1 billion from the preliminary total of $819 million.  Series N bonds are due 1990-1993, 1995-2000, 2007, 2010, 2012, 2014 and with capital appreciation bonds due 1994, 2001-2004 and 2017.  Series O bonds are due 1995-2000, 2007, 2010, 2012, 2014 and with capital appreciation bonds due 2001-2004 and 2017.  The bonds of both Series' are priced the same where their maturities overlap.  Current interest term bonds due in 2007, now priced as 7% bonds to yield 7.15, changed from 7% securities priced to yield 7.20%.  Original term bonds due in 2010, priced as 6% bonds to yield 7%.  Original issue discount term bonds due in 2012 are 5% bonds, priced to yield 6.90%.  Current interest term bonds due in 2014, which carry the high yield of the issue, are now 7 1/8% bonds, priced at 98 5/8 to yield 7.24%.  Bonds due 1993-1999 and bonds due 2001-2003 are insured.  The insured bonds are expected to carry triple-A ratings from both Moody's and S&P.  The uninsured bonds are rated Baa-1 by Moody's and single-A-minus by S&P.  Hawaii -- $119.5 million of general obligation refunding bonds, Series BO and BP, due 1993-2009, were priced by a Merrill Lynch Capital Markets group to yield from 6.10% in 1993 to 6.70% in 2003-2009.  Series BO bonds are due 1994-2002 and Series BP bonds are due 1993-2009.  Their scales are the same where they overlap.  The bonds are rated double-A by S&P.  Hillsborough County Aviation Authority, Fla -- $92.5 million Tampa International Airport revenue bonds, 1989 Series A, due 1992-2004, 2009 and 2019, priced by a Smith Barney Harris Upham & Co. group to yield from 6.20% in 1992 to 7.206% in 2019.  Serial bonds are priced at par to yield from 6.20% in 1992 to 7% in 2003 and 2004.  There are $15.5 million term bonds due in 2009, priced as 7.10% issues at 99 1/2 to yield 7.146%, and $55.3 million term bonds due in 2019, priced as 7 1/8% issues at 99 to yield 7.206%.  Interest on the bonds will be treated as a preference item in calculating the Federal alternative minimum tax that may be imposed on certain investors.  The bonds are insured and rated triple-A by both Moody's and S&P.  @ EUROBONDS  British Gas International Finance BV (U.K. parent) -- $350 million of 8 3/8% bonds due Sept. 8, 1999, priced at 101.10 to yield 8.51% less full fees via Merrill Lynch International.  Guaranteed by British Gas PLC. Fees 2 points.  Bank of Ireland (Ireland) -- $200 million of undated subordinated variable-rate notes at par via Salomon Brothers International.  Initial margin is 0.50 over three-month Libor (London interbank offered rate).  Notes are puttable every three months, when the margin is reset, unless borrower and lead manager fail to agree on new margin, in which case there is a fall-back rate of one point over three-month Libor for the first 10 years, rising to 1.40 thereafter.  World Bank (agency) -- 100 million pounds of 10 7/8% bonds due Aug. 15, 1994, priced at 101.175 to yield 11.03% less fees via S.G. Warburg Securities.  Fees 1 3/4.  The House Appropriations Committee approved a $286.5 billion Pentagon bill providing no new funding for the Air Force's advanced fighter and cruise-missile program and cutting troop levels more than 16,000 in fiscal 1990.  The measure incorporates cuts voted last week in such major weapon systems as the Midgetman mobile missile and B-2 bomber, but goes beyond the authorizing bill in reducing classified programs and shifting funds to improve military readiness.  The advanced cruise missile cut is part of an estimated $2 billion reduction from the Pentagon's request for secret, or so-called black, programs and the rejection of new money for the advanced tactical fighter is a major blow to the Air Force.  By comparison, the bill adds $1 billion for six sealift cargo ships and tankers.  The mix of aircraft purchases is particularly beneficial for Grumman Corp.  The New York-based company is one of few leading aerospace contractors without an investment in the advanced tactical fighter, and the House bill adds $893 million to the Bush administration's budget to finance the purchase of the 24 new F-14 jet fighters and 12 EA-6B Prowlers produced by Grumman.  Though the bill conforms with the appropriations ceiling set by the budget summit last spring, it will take major steps by the Pentagon to stay within the prescribed $281.9 billion limit on direct spending.  The bill imposes a fixed cap to satisfy budgeteers.  But unless adjustments are made, the measure would lead to spending $1.8 billion above this level.  The committee action came as the full House approved a stripped-down $5.8 billion bill covering the Commerce, State and Justice Departments, and two significant business-related amendments were attached to an $18.4 billion Treasury bill pending in the Senate.  A House-passed ban on the enforcement of new tax rules related to employee-benefit plans won endorsement from a Senate Appropriations subcommittee, which also moved to curb the growing practice of credit-card companies selling their services in partnership with nonprofit organizations in order to get subsidized lower mail rates.  An estimated 750,000 pieces of mail are expected to be generated under such marketing schemes in the next year, and the committee said the Postal Service could save $30 million in fiscal 1990 by withholding the lower rate.  Measured against current appropriations, yesterday's Pentagon bill is most striking in the shift of priorities from research and development to military readiness accounts.  More than $4 billion would be added to operations and maintenance, while research and development programs would be reduced almost $2 billion -- including the additional $693 million cut last week from the Strategic Defense Initiative.  Among the services, the Air Force appears most vulnerable.  Implicit in many of the cuts is a criticism of the department's management of major programs.  Apart from the tactical fighter and advanced cruise missile, the committee cut deeply from funding for the service's advanced radar-warning receiver.  The decision is most significant to Loral Corp., which has been implicated in the Pentagon procurement scandal and whose Air Force contract on the receiver program has been recommended for termination by the General Accounting Office.  As amended yesterday, the bill reflects increased funding for drug interdiction authorized by the full House last week.  But equally important are the shifts in a range of often more prosaic accounts.  The measure cuts $861 million, for example, from the Pentagon's request for automatic data processing, and an estimated $513 million is added elsewhere for depot maintenance.  From ammunition to field kitchens, the measure reflects a preoccupation with conventional forces that is part of the pork-barrel politics of defense appropriations but also bears the stamp of Rep. John Murtha (D., Pa.), the new defense subcommittee chairman and a Marine combat veteran.  The reduction in troop levels will fall on the Army and Air Force and is accompanied by a $1.2 billion increase to repair barracks and base facilities and for medical care for current military personnel and their families.  The last issue has been a crusade of sorts for the Pennsylvania Democrat, and he has used his new power as well to build his strength at home.  For example, $300 million was allocated to the Transportation Department to help the Coast Guard, and he, in turn, won $13.7 million for an unauthorized highway project in Pennsylvania in a pending transportation bill that won waivers from the leadership's Rules Committee yesterday.  The separate $5.8 billion bill approved by the House yesterday covers less than a third of the expected costs for the Commerce, State and Justice Departments.  Among the major accounts funded are $1.42 billion for the 1990 census and $50 million to begin promised reparations to Japanese-Americans interned in camps during World War II.  The census funds provoked a seesaw debate over how undocumented aliens are counted for the purposes of reapportionment -- an issue that pits lawmakers from older, declining districts against those from the burgeoning Southwest, where immigrants have added to the population.  On a 227-197 roll call, the House first signaled its support of a GOP-sponsored amendment to block the census from "knowingly" counting illegal aliens.  But Democrats closed ranks when the appropriations leadership moved to sidetrack the proposal on procedural grounds.  By a 288-134 margin, the House upheld a parliamentary ruling that the amendment was out of order on a spending bill, and when the GOP leadership sought to join the issue in a second later appeal, the motion was tabled 249-172.  Critics of the amendment argue that the restrictions are unworkable and unconstitutional.  But the Senate already has adopted similar language as part of a recent immigration bill, and the early House roll call reflected significant support.  Republicans were helped by their choice of sponsor -- Rep. Thomas Ridge, a popular Pennsylvania moderate and Vietnam veteran who picked up as many as 92 Democratic votes on the first vote.  The Treasury bill pending in the Senate reflects different but related pressures from the movement and people and commerce across borders in the Southwest.  Arizona and New Mexico senators dominated the drafting of the measure, which provides $1.3 billion for the Customs Service, or $122 million more than the House-passed level.  Southmark Corp. said it asked a U.S. bankruptcy court judge to permanently enjoin its National Heritage Inc. unit from completing a planned restructuring and from taking other actions that might affect Southmark's stake without first seeking shareholder approval.  In its complaint, Southmark charged that National Heritage's plan to spin off a subsidiary would dilute Southmark's stake in the new company because a portion of the unit already is owned by National Heritage management and employees.  Southmark, a Dallas real-estate and thrift concern, currently owns about 62.5% of National Heritage, a manager of nursing homes and retirement centers.  Southmark recently sought protection from creditors under Chapter 11 of the federal Bankruptcy Code while it tries to work out a plan to pay its debt.  Last week, Southmark said it solicited consents allowing it to change National Heritage's bylaws to prevent the restructuring.  But a spokeswoman said National Heritage is expected to challenge the bylaws change and said Southmark filed the lawsuit to "solidify its position."  National Heritage couldn't be reached to comment.  The following issues were recently filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission:  Colonial InterMarket Income Trust I, initial offering of 8.5 million shares of beneficial interest, via PaineWebber Inc.  Putnam Dividend Income Fund, initial offering of eight million common shares, via Goldman, Sachs & Co.  Kellwood Co. said it expects to report that sales and earnings for the first quarter ended Monday rose more than 12%.  For the year-earlier first quarter, the apparel maker earned $8.7 million, or 76 cents a share, on sales of $173.6 million.  The company said it expects to report final results Aug. 22.  Kellwood also told shareholders at its annual meeting yesterday that it is considering whether to expand its shirt-making facilities in the Northern Marianas on the island of Tinian.  MOSLEM KIDNAPPERS EXTENDED a deadline for killing a U.S. hostage.  A fundamentalist Moslem group, acknowledging a plea for mercy from American captive Joseph Cicippio's Lebanese wife and "some special factors," announced that it had reprieved him until Thursday.  The statement by the Revolutionary Justice Organization, which wants Israel to release an abducted Shiite cleric, said the postponement "wasn't subject to renewal."  The White House, meanwhile, pressed diplomatic efforts, including a request that Soviet Foreign Minister Shevardnadze urge Iran to ensure the safety of the Americans.  Shamir suggested that Israel is negotiating the release of hostages in Lebanon, but the Hezbollah group rejected an Israeli offer to trade the clergyman.  ---  Solidarity considered a proposal from the Communist-allied Peasant Party to form a coalition with a union parliamentary deputy as Poland's prime minister.  The plan was disclosed by lawmakers as Kiszczak's bid to be elected premier drew opposition.  Former Premier Rakowski, meanwhile, was hospitalized in Warsaw with heart trouble.  Food prices soared as much as 500% under a Polish government plan to free prices and establish a free-market economy.  Some officials in Warsaw predicted riots as price controls and meat-rationing ended.  ---  The Senate Judiciary Committee rejected the nomination of William Lucas to be the Justice Department's civil-rights chief.  Senate Democrats asserted that Bush's nominee, a former sheriff of Wayne County, Mich., lacked experience and qualifications for the post.  ---  The Senate endorsed Bush's military spending priorities, voting 62-38 for the simultaneous development of the mobile MX and Midgetman nuclear-tipped missiles.  The House gutted the missile proposal last week.  The Senate also approved a nonbinding resolution against large-scale B-2 Stealth bomber purchases.  ---  A Cambodian peace conference agreed to send a fact-finding mission to the Southeast Asian nation in what the French foreign minister called "a great first step" toward peace.  Delegates to the international parley in Paris also decided to establish a force to monitor a lasting peace once Vietnam completes a troop withdrawal next month.  ---  Ethnic Albanian miners staged a strike in Yugoslavia's southern Kosovo province, where 25 people were killed in riots sparked by labor unrest this year.  Mine officials said more than 600 workers at a lead and zinc mine refused to enter the pits to protest failing to receive their salaries for June.  ---  The House Appropriations panel cleared a $286.5 billion Pentagon bill.  The measure doesn't provide new funding for the Air Force's advanced fighter and cruise-missile program and cuts troop levels by more than 16,000 in fiscal 1990.  ---  The Energy Department unveiled a five-year, $19.5 billion program to correct environmental and health problems at atomic-weapons plants.  The plan is part of a cleanup that could take 30 years.  Energy Secretary Watkins acknowledged that even an optimistic timetable "passes much of the burden to the next generation."  ---  New Jersey's high court limited the right of plaintiffs to seek damages based on an enhanced risk that cancer or other disease might develop from exposure to toxic materials.  The court said a plaintiff must show a "reasonable medical probability" that he will later contract a disease for such claims to be considered.  ---  HUD Secretary Kemp announced plans to overhaul the Federal Housing Administration.  The proposal includes asking a major accounting firm to test the financial soundness of mortgage-insurance programs for single-family housing.  ---  Hurricane Chantal lashed the Gulf Coast with heavy rain and winds of 80 mph, forcing thousands of residents to flee inland and hampering the search for 10 workers from a capsized oil rig.  The storm, the season's first hurricane, weakened over Texas and was downgraded to a tropical storm.  ---  A judicial council reprimanded federal Judge Thomas J. Curran of Milwaukee for ruling in two General Electric Co. cases while holding stock in the company.  Following the determination by the circuit-court panel in Chicago, the Associated Press reported that the judge agreed to scrutinize future cases to prevent such conflicts.  ---  Shevardnadze met in Tehran with Iran's Islamic leaders and expressed Moscow's readiness to assume a more active role in Iran-Iraq peace talks, Tehran Radio said.  The visit by the Soviet foreign minister, his second this year, was viewed as underlining improving ties between the two nations.  ---  Sri Lanka's government postponed indefinitely the reopening of 10,000 schools in the island nation because of continuing ethnic violence.  Officials in Colombo also reported that a government radio broadcaster was killed by six gunmen, eight days after the slaying of the chief government censor.  ---  Died: Michael Harrington, 60, political theorist and prominent socialist, Monday, in Larchmont, N.Y., of cancer.  Encor Inc. said it reached agreements to sell 21 properties for a total of 126 million Canadian dollars ($106.7 million) to 10 purchasers.  Encor, an oil and gas concern, said it expects the sales will be completed by the end of October and will enable the company to reduce its long-term debt to C$588 million from C$714 million.  The unit of Toronto-based TransCanada PipeLines Ltd. said proceeds of the sales will satisfy two principal repayments of C$37.5 million each, which are payable on Dec. 31, 1990, and Dec. 31, 1991, under its production loan facility.  Encor said the properties represent established reserves of about 22.5 million barrels of oil equivalent.  American Express Co. acknowledged it has promised to pay $8 million to charities to settle its dispute with international banker Edmond J. Safra, twice the amount it revealed Friday.  In an interview, American Express Chairman James Robinson III said the additional payment is part of a "private understanding" with Mr. Safra and represents reimbursements for Mr. Safra's expenses arising from the dispute.  "In hindsight, I wish that we'd released the entire amount -- the full $8 million -- on day one," said Mr. Robinson.  A senior American Express executive said yesterday that the company considers the $4 million in charitable contributions it disclosed last week as its official apology.  Mr. Robinson had acknowledged that American Express representatives had appeared to influence the publication of unfavorable articles about Mr. Safra, an action, Mr. Robinson wrote, he found contrary to "common standards of decency and ethics."  American Express also said yesterday that Mr. Robinson and Mr. Safra had signed a legal document releasing each other from liability.  Mr. Robinson said American Express was concerned about avoiding "nuisance suits" from shareholders, which his attorneys believed would result from the public disclosure of any settlement.  According to individuals close to the company, American Express has already received one such letter seeking damages related to the $4 million payment.  A spokesman at the Internal Revenue Service in Washington said it was difficult to determine at this point whether such payments would qualify as a charitable contribution for tax purposes.  "To qualify as a deduction, any such contribution must be voluntary," the spokesman said.  "Also, there must be nothing received in consideration of the contribution."  The spokesman said, however, that the payments might qualify as a business expense.  Representatives of Mr. Safra didn't return phone calls yesterday.  Mr. Safra sold one of his former banking companies, Trade Development Bank, to American Express in 1983 for $520 million plus the assumption of $30 million in debt.  Although American Express expected he would remain with the bank, he resigned as chairman and chief executive officer of American Express International Banking Corp. at the end of 1984.  Today he competes directly with the American Express Trade Development Bank in Geneva for wealthy private-banking customers.  The charities that will receive the $8 million are the United Way of America, the Anti-Defamation League of B'nai B'rith, Hopital Cantonal de Geneve and the International Red Cross.  Tokyo stocks closed lower but rebounded from the day's lows on late index-buy orders from institutional investors, brokers said.  London share prices fell but closed above the day's lows as the market erased a portion of its losses in response to Wall Street's rise.  Tokyo's Nikkei average of 225 issues fell 55.41 points to 34898.46.  The index gained 248.24 points Monday.  Volume on the first section was estimated at 700 million shares, up from 551.1 million shares Monday.  Declining issues outnumbered advancers 493 to 378, while 225 issues remained unchanged.  In early trading in Tokyo Wednesday, the Nikkei index shed another 20.72 points to 34877.74.  Dealings were slow on Tuesday, brokers said, as the market readied itself for a technical correction after an unusually fast-paced surge last week.  Between July 18 and July 31, the Nikkei gained 1,600 yen, or 4.8%, much more than the 1,000 yen monthly gain that is normally considered "healthy," a broker said.  Political uncertainty also discouraged investors, brokers said.  The ruling Liberal Democratic Party is having difficulty deciding on a successor to Prime Minister Sousuke Uno.  The Tokyo Stock Price Index of all issues listed in the first section, which gained 22.29 points Monday, was down 1.28 points at 2627.62.  In the morning session, linear motor car-related issues were bought on a newspaper's report that a Tokyo-Yamanashi test track site had been selected for the new project.  But they failed to hold investors' interest into the afternoon, brokers said.  Small-sized stocks such as miscellaneous financial issues and companies in the Tokyu Group of companies made distinctive gains in an otherwise quiet second session.  Among miscellaneous financials, Orix rose 260 yen ($1.90) to 5,110 yen ($37.33), Nippon Shinpan was up 60 yen to 1,690 and Orient Finance gained 70 yen to 1,710.  Current speculation focuses on a possible restructuring of the Tokyu Group under new corporate leadership.  According to a market rumor, companies in the group may be targets for merger and acquisition activity, a broker said.  Tokyu Department Store was up 90 yen.  Tokyu Corp. rose 70 yen to 1,920.  Tokyu Construction was up 30 yen at 1,390.  Tokyu Railroad gained 70 yen to 1,850.  In other sectors that have led the market since last week, electric utility and steel issues stayed firm, while housing and construction stocks fell into a lull.  Electric power issues with strong gains Monday were mixed yesterday and were subject to some profit-taking.  Tokyo Electric Power was up 50 yen at 6,380.  But Kansai Electric Power fell 10 yen to 5,020, and Chubu Electrics was down 40 yen at 4,680.  Steel issues stayed firm.  Nippon Steel made substantial gains, brokers said, closing at 890 yen, up 11.  Kawasaki Steel closed flat at 954 yen.  Meanwhile, in London, traders said the market's overall decline resulted from a lack of speculative buying, a technical price markdown by market makers and a growing perception that U.K. interest rates are unlikely to be cut in the near future.  The Financial Times-Stock Exchange 100-share index ended off 4.7 points at 2292.3, well above the day's low of 2284.5.  At its highest, the index touched 2297.5, a rise of 0.5%.  Trading activity was driven by the activities of market makers, with most institutions steering clear of the market until its near-term direction becomes clearer.  Buying sentiment also took an early knock from a large sell program, traders said.  At the close, the narrower Financial Times 30-share index was down 2.3 points at 1909.8.  Turnover registered a mediocre 413.5 million shares, up from 309.3 million Monday.  Around the London close, the Dow Jones Industrial Average was up 15.17 points at 2675.83.  Dealers said the absence of corporate or speculative news prompted the market to question whether its recent lurch forward is justified.  "The market's just fooling around at these levels and doesn't really know where to go next," one trader said.  Reflecting these anxieties, B.A.T Industries retreated 13 pence (24 cents) to 853 pence ($14.22) on volume of 6.5 million shares.  National Westminster, Britain's largest bank, ended 3 pence firmer at 330 on volume of 4.7 million shares.  The bank announced a large increase in provisions against loans to developing countries that cut its pretax profit to #352 million in the first half from #702 million a year earlier.  The bank made specific provisions against #395 million of such debt in the latest period, compared with just #6 million a year earlier.  Brewing stocks bounced back from a recent spell of profit-taking as market players reassessed their fundamental value.  Allied-Lyons rose 1 1/2 pence to 522, Whitbread advanced 5 pence to 365, Scottish & Newcastle added 5 pence to 380, Grand Metropolitan rose 5 pence to 595 and Bass jumped 9 pence to #10.69.  Reuters continued to benefit from strong demand from U.S. and Continental buyers, closing up 17 pence at 872 on volume of 1.1 million shares.  In Frankfurt, heavy foreign demand for blue chips pushed share prices to a postcrash high in brisk trading.  Equities opened broadly higher as the market ended a two-day bout of profit-taking and resumed its summer rally, brokers said.  Buying was spearheaded by large institutional funds from Britain and Switzerland, but domestic investors were also active.  Share prices in Brussels and Amsterdam rose to records for the second day in a row.  Elsewhere, stocks closed higher in Paris, Stockholm and Milan.  South African gold stocks closed higher.  In other Asian and Pacific trading, share prices closed higher in Hong Kong, Sydney, Manila and Wellington and lower in Singapore, Taipei and Seoul.  Here are price trends on the world's major stock markets, as calculated by Morgan Stanley Capital International Perspective, Geneva.  To make them directly comparable, each index is based on the close of 1969 equaling 100.  The percentage change is since year-end.  @ % This  @ Jul 31 Jul 28 Year  @ U.S. ........................... 318.9 315.4 + 24.5  @ Britain ........................ 695.1 696.5 + 27.3  @ Canada ......................... 432.8 432.6 + 17.9  @ Japan .......................... 1558.3 1544.2 + 9.7  @ France ......................... 523.3 524.8 + 18.2  @ Germany ........................ 243.4 243.5 + 17.1  @ Hong Kong ...................... 1930.6 1897.9 - 4.9  @ Switzerland .................... 224.6 224.0 + 29.9  @ Australia ...................... 329.1 327.2 + 13.4  @ World index .................... 549.3 540.0 + 11.1  Pinnacle West Capital Corp. said it asked Arizona regulators to reconsider a July 12 temporary order limiting the amount of dividends that the holding company's cash-rich Arizona Public Service Inc. unit can pay to its financially strapped parent.  The appeal to the Arizona Corporation Commission, announced late yesterday, apparently reverses an earlier statement by a Pinnacle West spokesman that the company wouldn't challenge the temporary order.  The spokesman declined at the time to say whether Pinnacle West would challenge a proposed permanent order, for which hearings are scheduled Aug. 28.  The regulatory order limits to $52.7 million -- the amount paid on June 1 -- the quarterly dividend that Arizona Public Service may pay Pinnacle West.  The next scheduled dividend date is Sept. 1.  The unusual regulatory action arose because federal regulators ordered Pinnacle West's troubled MeraBank thrift unit to boost its capital by $192 million, effective this past Monday, to shore up a weakening balance sheet.  While that deadline apparently hasn't been met, a spokesman for Pinnacle West declined to confirm or comment on the failure.  As in the past, Pinnacle West said it has no plans to use money from Arizona Public Service to subsidize any of its troubled non-utility units.  However, the company's chairman, Keith L. Turley, said "we firmly believe the Arizona Corporation Commission has no legal authority to issue such an order."  Federal prosecutors sought about $22 million in asset forfeitures from the six defendants who were convicted of racketeering in the case involving unlawful trading by Princeton/Newport L.P.  The federal jury that convicted five officials of Princeton/Newport and a former Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. trader on Monday began considering the government's forfeiture request yesterday.  The six defendants were convicted on all but one of 64 felony counts involving a variety of acts of conspiracy, racketeering, and securities, wire and mail fraud.  Two of those counts related to charges stemming from the potent Racketeer Influenced and Corrupt Organizations law, or RICO.  The RICO law requires convicted defendants to forfeit their profits from the alleged wrongdoing, plus interest, as well as their salaries during the period of wrongdoing and their stake in what the law calls a "racketeering enterprise."  The government had alleged that the illgotten gains in this case totaled about $445,000, and prosecutors succeeded prior to trial in tying up a total of $21.7 million in assets for all of the defendants.  Under RICO, assets can be restrained prior to trial to preserve them in the event of a conviction and subsequent forfeiture.  The assets tied up prior to trial include interests in Princeton/Newport partnerships held by James Sutton Regan, the managing general partner of Princeton/Newport, and Jack Z. Rabinowitz, Charles M. Zarzecki and Paul A. Berkman, all of whom were general partners of the investment firm.  The assets also include the compensation of those partners between July 1984 and February 1986, when the crimes for which they were convicted occurred.  Additionally, compensation for Steven B. Smotrich, a defendant who was Princeton/Newport's comptroller and Bruce L. Newberg, a former Drexel junk bond trader during that time period, is included among the assets that have been sought by the government.  U.S. District Judge Robert L. Carter told a jury of nine women and three men yesterday that if the panel finds that the Princeton/Newport officials, including Mr. Smotrich, held any interest in the Princeton/Newport "enterprise" through which illegal trading occurred, it could require defendants to forfeit that entire interest.  Judge Carter told jurors they could also require the defendants to forfeit any compensation they may have obtained as a result of the racketeering violations for which they were convicted.  Mr. Regan has the most at stake, with a total of $15.1 million in partnership interests and compensation that could be forfeitable.  Mr. Rabinowitz has $1.4 million at risk.  Mr. Berkman has $1.3 million.  Since Mr. Smotrich and Mr. Newberg didn't have any interest in the Princeton/Newport enterprise, Judge Carter ruled that the jury could determine that they must forfeit all or part of their compensation for the period in which the violations occurred.  Mr. Smotrich's compensation during that period was $124,500; Mr. Newberg's was $2.6 million.  Over objections by defense attorneys, Judge Carter also allowed prosecutors to introduce as evidence parts of the government's document that listed its charges -- known as a criminal "information" -- against Drexel.  These are the charges to which Drexel agreed to plead guilty in December, rather than face racketeering charges of its own.  One of the six counts to which Drexel pleaded guilty, which related to a transaction with Princeton/Newport, was given to jurors to consider in their deliberations about the amount Mr. Newberg must forfeit.  Jurors were also told that Drexel had agreed to pay a "substantial sum" to the government as a penalty, but it wasn't told that Drexel paid $650 million in fines and restitution.  Defense lawyers told jurors yesterday that to require defendants who had already been convicted on so many felony counts to forfeit all their remaining assets would constitute "cruel and unusual punishment," in violation of the Eighth Amendment of the U.S. Constitution.  "The results of your verdict are devastating, and they have destroyed the lives of our clients," Paul Grand, a lawyer for Mr. Zarzecki, told jurors.  "If you order the forfeitures the government has requested, it would be vengeful," he said.  "The Eighth Amendment says the punishment must fit the crime," said Jack Arsenault, Mr. Berkman's lawyer.  "This is now the excess of government the Eighth Amendment was designed to protect us from."  But Mark Hansen, a prosecutor in the case, told jurors that the law provides for defendants to be stripped of their interests in a tainted enterprise.  The crimes these defendants committed, he said, "were in their economic self-interest," and they should be severely punished for them.  Imperial Corp. of America, as expected, posted a $34 million second-quarter net loss after the thrift reserved $56 million for possible losses on certain wholesale consumer loans and high-yield corporate bonds.  Imperial said a month ago that it anticipated the loss, which compares with net income of $10.4 million, or 72 cents a share, in last year's second quarter.  Results for the year-earlier period were restated for an accounting change.  For the six months, the company reported a net loss of $33 million, compared with net of $15.9 million, or $1.11 a share, the year earlier.  The thrift's second-quarter loss provisions were related to a planned $2 billion reduction in assets, also announced last month, following the resignation of its former chief executive officer, Kenneth J. Thygerson.  Imperial intends to get out of investment banking and reduce its holdings of high-yield bonds, in a return to more traditional thrift activities.  Of the total reserves it set aside in the latest earnings period, $25.9 million was in the area of consumer loans and due primarily to high delinquency levels on automobile and mobile-home loans, the thrift said.  A $27 million loss provision for corporate bonds included $22 million that reflected the depressed price of its $40 million face amount of Integrated Resources Inc. bonds.  During the quarter, those bonds were downgraded from investment grade.  Imperial said, however, that its regulatory capital ratio at June 30 was 3.6%, which exceeded regulatory capital requirements by $67.8 million.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading, Imperial closed at $4.875, down 25 cents a share.  The thrift's results were announced after the market closed.  The United Steelworkers said it reached a tentative fouryear contract agreement with Armco Inc., covering 4,700 workers at three plants.  The accord tentatively concludes union talks with four steelmakers whose contracts expired yesterday.  Workers at Bethlehem Steel Corp., Inland Steel Industries Inc. and National Steel ratified their contracts last month.  The contract restores past wage concessions that amounted to about $1 an hour and provides wage increases averaging 75 cents an hour, the union said.  The pact, which would run through July 31, 1993, also provides a $500 signing bonus, cost-of-living salary adjustments and restoration of certain benefits.  Approved by a union negotiating team, the agreement must be ratified by the rank and file.  Armco closed at $11.375 a share, up 12.5 cents, in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  Genentech Inc. said it received a patent for the technology relating to the process of preparing its heart attack drug TPA.  After receiving the patent, the South San Francisco biotechnology concern said it filed suit for patent infringement against several companies.  The new suit is in addition to pending litigation regarding TPA patent infringement.  Genentech now holds three U.S. patents relating to TPA.  Named in the suits are Burroughs Wellcome Co., Genetics Institute Inc. and several affiliates.  Genentech's problems with TPA aren't limited to legal battles.  The drug, which Genentech sells under the brand name Activase, has had lower than expected sales since it was introduced in late 1987.  The product sells at a stiff premium to alternative drugs whose performance have been shown in some tests to be nearly as effective.  The Bush administration is relying on a massive diplomatic offensive, rather than military threats, to respond to the latest Middle East hostage crisis, and officials credit the effort with heading off another hostage murder yesterday.  The diplomatic push has even involved an unusual request to the Soviet Union for help.  Last Sunday, during an international conference in Paris, a top aide to Secretary of State James Baker met with aides to Soviet Foreign Minister Eduard Shevardnadze to ask that Mr. Shevardnadze urge Iran to ensure the safety of the American hostages.  The Soviet foreign minister was believed to have done that during a previously scheduled meeting yesterday in Tehran with Iranian President-elect Hashemi Rafsanjani.  Pressure on President Bush to retaliate for Monday's apparent murder of Marine Lt. Col. William Higgins eased a bit when Lebanese Shiite terrorists backed off a threat to immediately kill a second U.S. hostage, Joseph Cicippio.  The group holding Mr. Cicippio, the "Revolutionary Justice Organization," said in a statement delivered to a Lebanese newspaper that the deadline yesterday for killing the hostage had been postponed 48 hours because of "friendly appeals and sincere behests."  The terrorist group's reference to "friendly appeals" was taken by U.S. officials as a sign that the international diplomatic effort, which has included appeals to Iran and Syria, was having some effect.  Mr. Bush held another meeting yesterday with his national security advisers to discuss options on the hostage matter, but the crisis atmosphere faded a bit as the Cicippio death threat was postponed.  That threat hasn't been withdrawn, however, and the Revolutionary Justice group included with its most recent message a photo of a third American hostage, Edward Austin Tracy, implying he could be in danger as well.  There was confusion about the fate of Anglican Church envoy Terry Waite, a British hostage.  Late yesterday, "Oppressed of the Earth," the group that claimed to have killed Col. Higgins denied an earlier report that it had threatened to kill Mr. Waite today.  But there were reports of a phone call in the group's name insisting Mr. Waite would be killed today.  U.S. officials say there have been persistent reports for months that Mr. Waite died or was killed some time ago.  Both the faction that says it killed Col. Higgins and the one that is holding Messrs.  Cicippio and Tracy are believed to be affiliates of Hezbollah, the Iranian-inspired Shiite political and terrorist organization in South Lebanon.  One of Hezbollah's top leaders, Sheik Abdel Karim Obeid, was kidnapped last week by Israeli commandos, setting off the apparent murder of Col. Higgins and the threats against the other hostages.  U.S. officials took pains yesterday to emphasize that while they don't condone Israel's kidnapping of the sheik, the U.S. isn't pressuring Jerusalem to release him unconditionally because that would appear to be granting the terrorists' demand.  Indeed, Bush administration officials are privately hinting that they harbor some hope that Israel may be able to trade the sheik for some hostages, as it has offered to do.  President Bush late Monday called on "all parties" to free any hostages they hold, a statement that seemed to include Israel and could be interpreted as condoning an exchange.  White House Press Secretary Marlin Fitzwater said the U.S. maintains a policy of refusing to negotiate for hostages, and has clearly explained it to Israel.  But he added: "Israel is a sovereign nation.  They have a different policy with regard to hostages than we have. . . .  We wouldn't try to tell any other country what to do.  We would make our policy clear in terms of how we would conduct ourselves."  He added: "That would be the limits of our guidance."  Though officials were playing down military options, they might have been doing so to avoid complicating any eventual military strike by signaling in advance that it is coming.  And there was one significant military movement yesterday; the Pentagon said the Coral Sea, the only U.S. aircraft carrier in the Mediterranean, ended a port visit to Alexandria, Egypt, several hours earlier than expected yesterday.  However, a three-ship task force headed by the destroyer Belknap, the flagship of the U.S. Mediterranean fleet, was said to be continuing on a planned visit to the Russian seaport of Sevastopol on the Black Sea, giving the impression that no major naval preparations related to the hostage crisis are imminent.  The American diplomatic offensive, described by one top State Department official as "a real full-court press," began Sunday after the terrorists threatened to kill Col. Higgins, and it picked up tremendous steam Monday after they claimed to have hanged him and threatened to kill others.  In addition to the request made of the Soviet Union, the offensive involves urgent meetings with Israel, America's European allies and Syria, which controls the portions of Lebanon where the Shiite terrorists operate.  Indirect contacts with Tehran are being conducted through Switzerland, and probably through other countries such as Turkey and Japan, which maintain ties there.  One administration aide suggested that U.S. messages are being received "very clearly" in Tehran, but he wouldn't describe the precise route.  President Bush also called Pope John Paul II to ask him to help seek the return of Col. Higgins' body and to discuss the situation in Lebanon more generally.  Officials said the response to the effort has been good and even claimed receiving some positive feedback from Syrian and Iranian contacts.  They claimed the diplomatic offensive may have helped avert Mr. Cicippio's murder, but they said it was impossible to know what specific contacts influenced the terrorists' decision to delay carrying out their threat against the hostage.  One official said Syrians and Iranians had sent word they had no direct control over the terrorists.  Any U.S. campaign to convince Iran to use its influence to save hostages could be complicated by politics within the Tehran government.  Iran's President-elect Rafsanjani is attempting to consolidate control over that country's government.  He has tried in the past to appear more reasonable to the outside world than others in Tehran's power structure.  Moscow's Tass news agency quoted Mr. Rafsanjani as expressing "deep regret about what had happened" but asserting that "Iran has no connection with the tragedy played out in Lebanon."  But militant Shiites in Lebanon have tended to take their lead from Iran's hardline Interior Minister Ali Akbar Mohtashemi, who just this week declared that "American and Israeli criminals" should be held responsible for any violence Moslem activists carry out in retaliation for the kidnapping of Sheik Obeid.  Jockeying between Messrs.  Rafsanjani and Mohtashemi may be particularly acute now, Middle East analysts note, because Mr. Rafsanjani is starting to form a cabinet and will have to determine the future of the interior minister.  Treasury bonds soared in volatile, panic-driven trading as investor sentiment swerved between wildly bullish and mildly cautious.  The surge in bond prices pushed yields on some long-term Treasury securities to the lowest levels since March 1987, and set off a wave of new corporate and municipal debt offering.  More than $1.6 billion of new corporate debt flooded the market, the largest amount in a single day since RJR Holdings Capital Corp. issued $4 billion of high yield bonds in May.  In the tax-exempt market, $4.4 billion of new notes and bonds were issued including a huge $1 billion offering by Puerto Rico Electric Power Authority.  That was the biggest long-term municipal bond offering since August 1987, according to IDD Information Services Inc.  Bond market analysts attributed yesterday's rally to several factors, including a report by the National Association of Purchasing Management showing more economic weakness, widespread speculation that the Federal Reserve will continue to ease credit conditions and large-scale buying on the part of foreign investors.  In Washington, Federal Reserve Chairman Alan Greenspan said that economic indicators do not indicate that a recession is imminent.  Mr. Greenspan also confirmed that the central bank eased credit conditions last week, but he refused to say whether more easing will occur anytime soon.  His remarks didn't seem to damp investors' enthusiasm.  "People looked at the purchasing managers' report which suggested that the risk is toward more economic weakness," says James Capra, a senior vice president at Shearson Lehman Government Securities Inc.  "One month ago, about 10% of the market participants we talk to were expecting a recession.  Now it's up to 40%," he says.  The purchasing managers index of economic activity, a widely watched measure of economic health and business plans, dropped for the third straight month to the lowest level since 1983.  In the Treasury market, the benchmark 30-year bond climbed more than two points by midday, or about $20 for each $1,000 face amount.  Later, however, a round of profit-taking sent prices tumbling nearly one point.  Then, after a period of see-saw trading, the benchmark bond settled at a price of about 111 29/32, up more than one point from Monday's close.  Some traders say the bond market was carried up by foreign investors and speculators, especially in Japan, and panic-driven money managers who missed most of the bond market rally and now are trying to capture quick gains.  In early trading, "there were some sizable transactions by Japanese institutions," says Jay Goldinger, a trader and market strategists at Capital Insight Inc. in Beverly Hills, Calif.  "They were like vacuum cleaners, sucking in everything they could."  What stimulated their appetite, he says, was the falling value of the dollar on foreign exchange markets.  "They were using the bond market to buy dollars," because the currency was relatively cheap, he says.  Other traders say a small group of Japanese investors, followed by some domestic buyers, took profits later in the afternoon when it appeared that the bond market was rising at an uncomfortably rapid pace.  Bonds dealers noted that the amount of selling was small, but had a big impact largely because market activity had abated considerably by that time.  Richard L. Sandor, senior vice president of financial futures and options at Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc., was among the analysts recommending that customers get out of the market.  Although he was bullish on bonds last week, he told customers late yesterday that "the market has gone too far too fast.  It needs a breather."  Among other things, Mr. Sandor notes that the number of investors buying call options far exceeds the number buying puts by a ratio of 2.7-to-1, a sign that bond investors are extremely optimistic.  A call option gives an investor the right to buy a bond in the future at prices specified in the present.  Investors who buy them are betting that prices will rise.  Such widespread optimism, says Mr. Sandor, is a contrarian sign that the market is due for a correction.  But other bond market analysts remain decidedly bullish.  Yesterday's late pullback, "is only a pause," says Roger Froehlich, president of Technical Dimensions, a Mt. Kisco, N.Y., forecasting and advisory firm.  "We don't interpret it as any kind of shift toward weakness."  He expects the benchmark 30-year bond to fall as low as 7.60% within the next few weeks.  In the past five trading days, bond prices have risen at a faster rate than during any time since January 1988, according to Technical Data Global Markets Group in Boston.  Treasury Securities  The Treasury's benchmark 30-year bond was quoted at a price of 111 29/32 to yield 7.83% compared with a price of 110 27/32 and yield of 7.91% Monday.  The latest 10-year notes were quoted at 109 7/32 to yield 7.75% compared with 108 29/32 to yield 7.975% Monday.  Among short-term rates, the discount rate on three-month Treasury bills was quoted late at 7.69% for a bond-equivalent yield of 7.93%.  The discount rate on six-month Treasury bills was quoted at 7.36% for a yield of 7.73%.  Municipal Issues  New issues took center stage as $1.4 billion in long-term tax-exempts and $3 billion of California notes came to market.  The bulk of the issues appear to have met with strong investor response, underwriters said.  A $1 billion issue of Puerto Rico Electric Power Authority revenue bonds was well received, according to Gerald McBride, manager of the municipal bond department at Prudential-Bache Capital Funding, which led the underwriters.  The issue was priced to yield from 5.9% in 1990 to 7.24% in 2014.  California's $3 billion note offering also was oversubscribed.  The notes, dated Aug. 9, 1989, and due June 29, 1990, were priced to yield 5.65%.  In the secondary market, yields on more seasoned municipal notes declined.  New York State's 7 1/2% tax and revenue anticipation notes due March 1990 were quoted at 5.55%, according to one broker, down from 5.70% late Monday.  New York City firmed up details on its planned short-term borrowing, saying it intends to take bids tomorrow for $1.25 billion of various notes.  The issue is to include $300 million of tax anticipation notes and $950 million of revenue anticipation notes, all due June 29, 1990.  Corporate Issues  The new-issue floodgate swung open as corporations came to market with $1.6 billion of new debt.  "The market took on a life of its own, " says James Quigley, head of syndicate at Merrill Lynch Capital Markets.  Merrill underwrote a total of $500 million of debt by Ford Motor Co. and General Motors Corp. units during the session.  Dealers say interest in the corporate market was boosted by individual investors who missed the Treasury rally and were trying to capture gains in the corporate market.  Corporate prices ended 1/2 to 3/4 point higher after earlier gains of as much as 1 1/4 points.  Mortgage-Backed Securities  Prices of Ginnie Maes and other mortgage-backed securities finished higher, but below their best levels of the session.  The Ginnie Mae 9% issue for August delivery was up 7/32 from Monday's close at 99 17/32 to yield 9.18%, based on a 12-year average life assumption.  Mortgage analysts were surprised at the 12 basis point increase in the June 11th district cost of funds index, against which many California adjustable rate mortgages are set.  The index rose to 8.923% in June.  Analysts had been expecting the index to be flat to up slightly.  Competition for funds could portend further increases in the index in upcoming months, says Michael Herskovitz, vice president of mortgage-backed securities research at Merrill Lynch Capital Markets.  He said further rises could mean consumers will seek either fixed-rate mortgages, or adjustable rate loans based on other instruments, such as Treasury bills, where rates have been on the decline.  Foreign Bonds  The rally in the U.S. bond market had a positive impact on most foreign markets.  In West Germany, most of the day's gains came at the opening when the U.S.'s benchmark 30-year Treasury bond gained 3/8 point in Tokyo.  In response, Bonn's 7% issue due February 1999 rose 0.15 point to 102.80, to yield 6.59%, while the 6 3/4% notes due 1994 rose 0.10 point to 100.525, to yield 6.61%.  Japanese government bond prices posted large gains as the yen strengthened against the dollar.  The benchmark No. 111 4.6% issue due 1998 closed at a price of 97.45, up 0.33 yen per 100 yen face value.  Its yield fell to 5.015%.  Bond prices declined in Britian on continued profit-taking.  Traders say the launch of a Eurosterling issue by the World Bank didn't affect prices significantly.  The agency brought #100 million ($165 million) of 10 7/8%, five-year bonds to market.  Britian's benchmark 11 3/4% bond due 2003/2007 fell 7/32 to 115 25/32, to yield 9.63%.  The treasury's 11 3/4% notes due 1991 fell 5/32 to 99 30/32, to yield 11.75%.  Seven feet long, with a jaw full of evil teeth, the alligator lurking nearby is one mean matron.  So Dane Ledet doesn't linger by the muddy mound of swamp grass where he has just landed in a helicopter.  Within seconds, he scoops the 36 fresh eggs from her nest and scrambles back into the waiting copter.  A scene from "Louisiana Jones and the Jaws of Death?"  No, this is farming.  Mr. Ledet is merely replenishing his herd -- by raiding an alligator's nest.  He is one of a new strain of courageous entrepreneurs who farms alligators.  Alligators have yet to find a welcome mat at Louisiana parish fairs.  Who wants to hang a ribbon on a critter that might eat it, along with your arm?  Nobody oohs and aahs over alligators at 4-H Club exhibits, either.  At Louisiana's finest country clubs, gentlemen farmers still talk racehorses -- not alligators.  Nonetheless, alligators are becoming important livestock in this state.  Farmers from Natchitoches to New Orleans have begun to raise them, forgoing blue ribbons for cash.  Prices on alligator hides and meat have reached record highs, although they may not stay so high if the supply keeps increasing.  State wildlife officials expect that nearly 75,000 alligators will be raised this year on Louisiana's farms, triple the herd in 1987.  Veteran alligator farmers complain that newcomers are constantly hounding them for advice.  More than 200 people are on a waiting list for state alligator-farm permits.  Alligator sections have been added to aquaculture classes in state universities.  Alligator skins once were the booty of poachers who devastated the alligator population and helped put "alligator mississippiensis" on the endangered species list and helped make alligator products unfashionable.  But the wild population has exploded in recent years, and the alligator was delisted in 1987.  By then, after years of experimental alligator husbandry, Ted Joanen and Larry McNease, Louisiana wildlife researchers, had already successfully promoted alligator farming.  They saw it as a way to stop poaching, ensure a supply of skins and foster new business that was desperately needed in a state whose economy was depressed by the oil glut.  To protect the species, state law requires farmers to return a sizable portion -- 17% this year -- of their nurtured, four-foot-long stock to the wild.  Raising alligators is different from raising cows.  The alligator has a walnut-size brain.  But its jaws can snap a farmer's arm like a breadstick; they exert a force of 3,000 pounds a square inch.  Stealing their eggs, corralling the critters and hauling them to market are hazardous.  Alligators lack a strong herding instinct.  About a month ago, Skeet Rogers, proud new part-owner of Bayou Pierre Gator Farm in Natchitoches, had to move half of his 2,000 alligator herd into a larger barn.  He first thought to move them through a "chute" made from sheets of tin.  "We were going to herd 'em like cattle with sticks," he says.  "It was a mess.  They tried to climb over each other and they started fighting."  With the help of 14 leery volunteers, each wearing two pairs of thick leather gloves to protect his hands, Mr. Rogers hand-carried the alligators from barn to barn.  At market time, Mr. Rogers loads some 200 live four-foot gators into an old, gutted school bus for the hour-and-a-half drive to Ville Platte.  Only a sheet of plywood separates the driver from his passengers.  The driver is "usually the guy who draws the shortest straw.  I'm serious," says Mr. Rogers, adding: "Usually a car follows -- just in case."  Like most alligator farmers in Louisiana, Mr. Rogers houses his animals in half-sunken tin-sided structures of cinder blocks on concrete slabs.  Inside one of these barns, the temperature is a humid 89 degrees, just about right for gators.  They are at home in a few inches of water reeking of reptile urine.  The smell takes some getting used to.  On their uncle Raywood Stelly's Raywood's Kajun Alligator Farms at Kaplan, the 17-year-old Stelly twins, Velma and Thelma, daily plop gobs of feed mix to the gators as part of their farm chores.  The feed is one part nutria, a prolific swamp rat; one part croaker, an inexpensive fish, and one part vitamin-fortified dry food that a producer packs in sacks labeled Alligator Feed.  "The first time we did this, I couldn't believe it," says Thelma, her arms sunk in a bucket of bloody nutria carcasses.  "Now we're used to it -- almost," says Velma, swatting at a swarm of flies around her head.  To build their herds without having to collect eggs, some farmers buy them for $5 to $8 each.  But most collect their own, paying landowners for the rights to do so, and search by airboat and helicopter.  They work over a three-week laying period that usually comes in June.  Newly hatched alligators "come out mean as hell and biting," a farmer says.  In Ville Platte, Steele McAndrew collects eggs on his own pond, where he keeps his breeding stock.  Checking the pond, he totes a 10-foot plastic pipe to fend off his ungracious wards.  As he nears a nest, a seven-foot gator appears from nowhere, hissing and blowing at him in the heat of midmorning.  "These are like bears in a park," he says, easing the pipe a few feet from the reptile's snout.  "They don't have any fear left in them."  Before Mr. McAndrew can finish, the alligator jumps and sprints toward him in short bursts.  Then it seizes the tooth-scarred pipe in its jaws.  So ferocious is the animal that Mr. McAndrew guesses her eggs lie nearby.  He hatches the precious eggs he collects in an incubator.  If the heat exceeds 91 degrees or drops below 89, the eggs are endangered, and a heat-sensitive alarm rings in Mr. McAndrew's bedroom.  Mr. McAndrew was one of the pioneer Louisiana alligator farmers eight years ago.  His farm, which is becoming part of a joint venture, will soon expand to 30,000 alligators from 6,000.  He concedes that an alligator farm isn't exactly the Garden of Eden.  "A 90-degree building, 100% humidity, rancid meat, getting splashed with alligator urine and water -- it's just not ideal conditions," he says, adding that "a lot of people in Louisiana are desperate."  Alligator hides fetch the farmer $39 a linear foot.  Farm-bred gators, whose hides are used for handbags and other small goods, typically are slaughtered when they are four feet long.  Hides from bigger, wild alligators, used for luggage, bring about $48 a foot.  A field-dressed four-foot-long alligator brings farmers about $20 for the meat.  There are alligator farms in Florida and Texas, too.  But alligator-farm technical knowledge and state support is centered here; for nearly 20 years, Messrs.  Joanen and McNease did their research on alligators in captivity in the marsh at Rockefeller Refuge in southern Louisiana.  Foreign countries, mainly in Africa, have engineered their alligator and crocodile farming enterprises on the Louisiana model.  The market for alligators would be larger, alligator men say, if it weren't for the mistaken belief that the alligator is endangered.  Even with increases in demand over the past few years, the world market for crocodile and alligator hides has regained only half the volume of 15 years ago.  "It's not mass fashion right now," says Lee Goldman, president of Campaign Inc., distributor of Polo Ralph Lauren Corp. alligator products.  But, he says, "If there are more skins available, they're reasonably priced and they look good, I'm all in favor of it."  Nature lovers, Mr. Joanen says, should consider that the farmers who skin alligators also are returning healthy four-footers to the wild.  "If you want to help the marsh, and the alligator," he says, "buy an alligator handbag."  Toyota Motor Corp. announced a "major restructuring" that, while not involving layoffs, eliminates two layers of middle management and switches some managers from "purely supervisory positions to . . . doing hands-on work."  The Japanese auto giant said the changes are designed to streamline decision-making.  Toyota also said it plans to spend 100 billion yen ($730 million) on new housing, recreational facilities and other amenities for the company's workers.  The moves reflect the increasing pressures that Toyota faces as it fights for a bigger share of the automobile market world-wide, and competes as well for workers in Japan.  Indeed, taken together, Toyota's moves seem aimed at pleasing younger workers by offering them more access to top management on the job, and more creature comforts after hours.  The bureaucratic shake-up is far from the sort of cost-cutting purge that U.S. auto makers have conducted in recent years.  While the reorganization affects about 25,000 of Toyota's roughly 65,000 employees, no one will be laid off.  The company is handsomely profitable; earnings for the fiscal year ended June 30, 1988 -- the latest results reported -- jumped 19% to 310.95 billion yen ($2.34 billion).  Toyota also is so cash-rich that in Japan's it's nicknamed "the Bank of Toyota."  But the company is often slower to move than its smaller Japanese rivals.  Toyota, for example, trailed Honda Motor Co., Nissan Motor Corp. and Mazda Motor Co. in opening its own U.S. assembly plant.  The company also lagged Honda in launching a luxury-car division.  Within Toyota, there are "so many, many steps to reach top management that it takes time to make a decision," a Toyota spokesman in New York acknowledged yesterday.  Moreover, there were many middle managers whose functions amounted to little more than "sit quietly without doing anything," the spokesman said.  Now, Toyota plans to eliminate two layers from the decision-making hierarchy.  As part of that process, about 1,000 middle managers now will have to "become involved in the process of creating and doing hands-on work," the company said.  In addition, employees will no longer address their managers as "kacho," which means "manager."  Instead, all employees will refer to each other by the honorific suffix "-- san," which is the Japanese equivalent of Mr., Mrs. or Ms. Nissan made that change previously as part of an effort to relax its own corporate bureaucracy.  Toyota also said that, from now on, personnel evaluations will focus more on performance than seniority.  That is a radical departure from the practice at most Japanese companies.  Toyota's commitment to building housing and other facilities for workers reflects a larger change in Japanese society.  "Corporations are competing for college graduates on the basis of housing," said Maryann Keller, an auto industry analyst with Furman Selz Mager Dietz & Birney.  "They can no longer put workers in a 2-by-4 box and have a recreation facility that's one television set."  American Telephone & Telegraph Co., quietly plotting its strategy for entering the electronic-publishing business, has become the subject of intense scrutiny as industry players, consultants and analysts try to anticipate the speed and direction of its moves.  So far, AT&T hasn't filled in many of the variables in a complex equation, and is keeping quiet about its plans.  "We're not talking until decisions are made and agreements are signed," an AT&T official says.  "Until then, we're going underground."  The telephone giant's entry is expected to accelerate development of the information-services business, and many in the industry are waiting to see whether AT&T focuses on the business market or the mass market -- or both -- and whether it plans to wade in slowly or make a huge splash.  The way was cleared last week when a federal judge decided to allow the Aug. 24 expiration of a ban on AT&T electronic publishing, which will enable AT&T to offer a wide variety of services such as financial and securities data, videotex -- delivery of information to home television sets -- and news over the telephone lines.  AT&T began testing the waters several months ago, and its representatives have talked with such information-services providers as Compuserve Inc., a unit of H&R Block Inc., and Dow Jones & Co., publisher of this newspaper, fueling speculation that AT&T probably will form joint ventures rather than strike out on its own.  In an intriguing twist, AT&T has acknowledged that it has held talks with Nintendo of America Inc., raising the possibility that computer game equipment would be used for distribution of some information services to residential customers.  The notion that AT&T could make a grand entrance into electronic publishing, and the prospect that its entry will expand the whole industry by drawing in more customers from its vast pool of telephone users, initially propelled the stocks of several information-services companies.  Those affected included Dun & Bradstreet Corp., Knight-Ridder Inc., Telerate Inc., which is 67%-owned by Dow Jones, McGraw-Hill Inc., Reuters Holding PLC and Mead Corp.  Several analysts and consultants see possible advantages if AT&T data bases were married with those of information providers to give users hybrid data.  And Robert Morris, an analyst with Goldman, Sachs & Co., notes that AT&T has two big advantages if it decides to pursue the mass market: its expertise in billing and telemarketing.  With a pipeline into 80 million homes and seven million businesses, industry officials hope AT&T will give the industry the boost it needs to take off.  Because of the possibilities of joint ventures and solid expansion of the market for information services, companies already in the business haven't opposed AT&T's entry.  "We view this as an opportunity, not as a threat," says Carl Valenti, president and publisher of the Dow Jones Information Services Group.  "We've talked to AT&T, just as we've talked to others," Mr. Valenti says, adding that Dow Jones is now "looking forward to sitting down and having a serious discussion."  Compuserve's president and chief executive officer, Charles McCall, echoes the sentiment: "We haven't had any detailed discussions about joint venturing, but we hope there will be something positive for the future."  Even competitors such as MCI Communications Corp. say they aren't concerned about the prospect of AT&T's entry into electronic publishing.  MCI's main entry in the field has been MCI Mail, an electronic-mail offering that also allows users access to Dow Jones News/Retrieval service.  In addition, MCI provides the long-distance transmission for Prodigy, the IBM-Sears joint venture to provide information services at a low cost to the mass market.  That mass market for information services has been elusive as companies weigh the best delivery systems and products -- and question the level of demand among residential and small-business users.  But things are popping.  Prodigy is rolling out its service around the country, and has signed up 125,000 memberships.  At the same time, the regional Bell companies are testing electronic gateways, which they like to compare to shopping malls, offering users access to many information providers.  Edward Greenberg, a telecommunications analyst with Morgan Stanley & Co., believes well-designed information service products, such as stock quotes and research data, will be essential.  The Bell companies, however, claim they are hamstrung by Judge Harold Greene, the same judge who just allowed AT&T into electronic publishing.  Judge Greene, who oversees the consent decree that broke up AT&T 5 1/2 years ago, has maintained the ban on the regional companies providing or manipulating the content of information products.  In fact, Friday's decision touched off a new round of lobbying by the regional Bell companies for legislation that could lift restrictions on their businesses.  Among other things, the Bell companies claim that they will have trouble building a critical mass for their gateway services unless they are allowed to offer electronic yellow pages -- essentially a shopping and referral service based on their yellow-pages customers -- and so-called enhanced white pages that allow telephone customers to electronically search for a listing in several ways.  One company, Chicago-based Ameritech, has decided to skip services that require users to use a computer.  Instead, it is concentrating on services customers can get over a telephone, such as horoscope information, weather, sports and stock quotes.  The company says its research indicates it won't attract enough users to turn a profit without electronic services.  Lobbying against the "free the Bells" legislation is equally intense.  Information providers, including newspaper publishers and long-distance companies, worry that the Bell companies would use their monopolies in local services to crush competition.  Against this background, AT&T is preparing to make some big decisions.  "There's a lot of interest out there," the AT&T spokesman says.  "But about the only thing I can tell you is that we've been swamped with calls from entrepreneurial types."  ---  @ Leading On-Line Information Companies  @ Excluding providers of stock quotes and other trading information  @ NUMBER OF SALES  @ SUBSCRIBERS AS OF  @ AS OF 12/31/88  @ 12/31/88 (In millions)  @ LEXIS, NEXIS, MEDIS (MEAD CORP.) 210,000 $307.5  @ Abstracts and full text of  @ articles on financial, medical,  @ legal, and general-interest topics  @ DIALOG INFORMATION SERVICE INC. 310,000 113.0  @ (KNIGHT-RIDDER INC.)  @ 340 databases with abstracts and  @ full-text articles on technology,  @ medicine, business and the sciences  @ COMPUSERVE INFORMATION SERVICE CO. 489,000 86.5*  @ (H&R BLOCK INC.)  @ Text of general and business  @ articles, on-line shopping,  @ historical stock quotes, dozens of  @ user bulletin boards and abstracts  @ DOW JONES NEWS/RETRIEVAL SERVICE 310,000 60.0  @ (DOW JONES & CO.)  @ Corporate information, business  @ articles, historical stock quotes  @ *Fiscal year ended 4/30/89  @ Source: Digital Information Group  (During its centennial year, The Wall Street Journal will report events of the past century that stand as milestones of American business history.)  BELL LABORATORY SCIENTISTS picked sunny April 25, 1954, and the front yard of the Murray Hill, N.J., research center to demonstrate a new product, the solar cell.  An engineer, using a solar battery device about the size of a four-pack of cigars for power, transmitted his voice by a small radio transmitter to a receiver across the lawn.  The heart of the battery was an array of razor-blade-thin wafers of silicon.  The material, melted sand with a surface heat treated with minute traces of boron, creates electrical charges when stimulated by light.  Bell researchers Daryl M. Chapin, an electrical engineer, Calvin S. Fuller, a chemist, and Gerald L. Pearson, a physicist, had been developing their solar cells for many years.  The "photovoltiac effect" they created in silicon was a lineal descendant of the "photoelectric effect" noted by Willoughby Smith, an engineer in Ireland, on Feb. 4, 1873.  Although solar cells have been greatly improved since 1954, their widespread use in tapping the sun's daily outpouring of 1,000,000,000,000,000 kilowatt hours of energy has been slow because of high costs.  They were tried on satellites in 1962 and are used today on some orbiting the Earth.  Solar panels were also installed in 1974 on some home roofs after the Arab oil boycott caused a power scare.  Today, solar cells are used in some hand-held calculators and, rarely, on boats and harbor buoys.  Mostly, however, the solar batteries continue to have roles in stunts that suggest more a promising future than a vital present.  Solar-powered cars have "aced" in countries from Australia (General Motors won with its Sunraycer in 1987) to Switzerland (the annual "Tour de Sol").  They run only in daylight hours.  (During its centennial year, The Wall Street Journal will report events of the past century that stand as milestones of American business history.)  JONAS SALK REPORTED TO A GROUP of scientists at Hershey, Pa., on Jan. 23, 1953, favorable tests of a new polio vaccine and soon became a world hero.  Poliomyelitis, a viral disease of the nervous system, had been crippling and killing children for generations.  Physicians could neither prevent nor cure the scourge.  But in 1952, Salk successfully tested a killed-virus type vaccine at a home for crippled children at Leetsdale, Pa.  Professor Salk, aided by National Foundation for Infantile Paralysis grants, had been probing polio at the University of Pittsburgh since 1948.  Basil O'Connor, a Wall Street lawyer, headed the foundation started in 1938 to lick polio with hundreds of millions of dollars from "march of Dimes" donations.  President Franklin D. Roosevelt, crippled by polio in 1921, was O'Connor's friend.  Salk teams vaccinated 388,800 children for a six-month period ended May 30, 1954.  Then on April 12, 1955, over 150 journalists swarmed to the University of Michigan to hear the good news.  Within hours the U.S. licensed the vaccine's manufacture, wrote Richard Carter in his "Breakthrough -- The Saga of Jonas Salk."  Just 13 days later, the first of 204 vaccine-related polio cases, including 11 deaths, was reported as millions of children were still being injected.  The program was halted briefly as officials learned that one of the five drug companies making the vaccine had turned out a bad batch.  Salk, with streets named after him, was criticized throughout by rival scientist Albert Sabin, developer of a live-virus polio vaccine swallowed in a sugar cube.  Sabin's vaccine was licensed on Aug. 17, 1961, at a time when Salk's made polio nearly extinct.  Today Sabin's is most commonly used.  Salk is now trying to develop a vaccine for AIDS.  (During its centennial year, The Wall Street Journal will report events of the past century that stand as milestones of American business history.)  PRESIDENT TRUMAN'S LAST OFFICIAL ACT, four days before he left the White House on Jan. 20, 1953, had his usual give-em-hell style.  It angered Democrats, particularly in oil-rich Texas.  His executive order set aside as a federal petroleum reserve the undersea area up to 150 milles off U.S. coastlines.  The prior May 29, Truman had vetoed a bill that would have given California, Louisiana and Texas title to offshore oil and gas, then reportedly valued at $100 billion.  Truman had said he wouldn't turn the "vast treasure over to a handful of states, where the powerful private oil interests hope to exploit it to suit themselves."  The vetoed bill had been sponsored by Sen. Pat McCarran, the renegade Nevada Democrat with whom Truman had fought since his Senate days.  His daughter, Margaret, later wrote that her dad disliked McCarran "both personally and politically."  Another biographer uses the word "despise."  After Truman left, the oil lobby and offshore oil states resumed their fight and won in 1953 the Submerged Lands Act, which restored to the states underwater oil and gas rights -- but only for distances 3 to 10.5 miles offshore.  President Eisenhower, signing it May 22, said: "I deplore and I will always resist federal encroachment upon the rights . . . of states."  But an act of Aug. 7, 1953 (the Outer Continental Shelf Lands Act) kept U.S. ownership of oil-gas assets up to 150 miles beyond those state boundaries.  Since 1954, the outer shelf properties have produced $189 billion of natural gas and oil, generating $84 billion in revenue to the U.S. Treasury.  There are billions of barrels of oil and trillions of cubic feet of gas down there that remain for drillers.  But both federal and state restrictions on new auctions of offshore leases have been growing since 1981 because of environmental concerns.  (During its centennial year, The Wall Street Journal will report events of the past century that stand as milestones of American business history.)  GENETICS, BOTH THE SCIENCE and its companion art and industry of gene-splicing, got a dramatic boost in 1953, when three young scientists at England's Cambridge University drew the shape of the basic building-block of heredity, DNA, shorthand for deoxyribonucleic acid.  Two years before, James D. Watson, a 24-year-old Chicagoan with a Ph.D. in biology, had teamed with Francis Crick, 36, a British physicist-turned biologist, to find the molecular structure of DNA.  Their secret weapon was unpublished X-ray diffraction photos taken earlier by British biochemist Maurice Wilkins.  Their shadowy outlines hinted that DNA's molecular shape was a double spiral.  Watson and Crick lived in mortal fear that Linus Pauling, the two-time Nobel Prize-winning Calfornia chemist, would beat them, even without Wilkin's photographs.  A relieved Watson learned that Pauling was postulating a triple spiral instead of the Crick-Watson double helix.  The Cambridge team completed its DNA model, made up of wire and colored beads.  They had pictured DNA -- correctly -- as a double rope ladder, its sides composed of sugars and phosphates, its steps alternating pairs of adenine, thymine, cytosine and guanine.  Celebrating their success at a Cambridge pub, Crick toasted the discovery of "the secret of life."  He wasn't far wrong.  DNA holds the secret of how heredity works, how cells are directed and controlled in future generations.  Watson shared the 1962 Nobel Prize with Crick and Wilkins and is still a major force in genetics.  He is now associate director of the "genome" project, a plan to may DNA in the human body.  Its scope can be shown by one statistic -- each human cell holds a billion pairs of nucleotides, subunits of DNA.  The National Institutes of Health estimates that the mapping will take 15 years and will cost at least $3 billion.  (During its centennial year, The Wall Street Journal will report events of the past century that stand as milestones of American business history.)  WHAT GEORGES AUGUSTE ESCOFFIER was to haute cuisine, Clarke and Gilbert Swanson of Omaha, Neb., were to the eating habits of the television age.  Clarke Swanson, noting that 19 million women had stayed in the work force after World War II, thought they could use help in whipping up quick meals.  So in 1951, the Swanson company began selling frozen pot pies -- turkey, chicken and meat.  The first production order called for 20,000 pies.  Soon it was 250,000 a day.  By 1953, Clarke and his brother were ready for the next step -- complete frozen dinners.  The Swansons had also found the perfect name for their brainchild -- the "TV dinner."  They acquired the title from an equally prescient lawyer named Cecil Johnson, who had trademarked it.  The Swansons packed their first entree, a turkey dinner, in a package that depicted a TV set, complete with knobs.  The contents, served in a three-section aluminum tray and priced at 98 cents, included a slab of turkey, cornbread dressing, gravy, peas topped with butter and whipped sweet potatoes flavored with orange juice and butter.  The first 5,000 dinners hit supermarket frozen-food lockers in December 1953.  The verdict from a Swanson panel of experts -- 1,200 housewives and a few hotel chefs -- was lip-smacking approval.  Frozen chicken dinners came 18 months later.  By the time Campbell Soup acquired Swanson in 1955, the company was producing 25 million TV dinners a year (The company kept the "TV dinner" tag until 1973, when the trademark lapsed.)  The frozen dinner has become an American institution.  During the 12 months that ended in March 1989, $1.25 billion of them were sold.  Even Escoffier would say "Bon appetit]" to that.  (During its centennial year, The Wall Street Journal will report events of the past century that stand as milestones of American business history.)  THE PRESIDENT OF THE UNITED STATES may be the most powerful man in the world, but even he can meet his match.  That is what happened in April 1952 when Harry Truman seized the steel mills to head off a threatened strike.  The steel unions had been talking strike since December 1951.  The quarrel was over wages, and the employers had refused to talk without a price increase that Truman decided was excessive.  The president had a choice -- invoke the Taft-Hartley Act (anathema to labor) or use the machinery of the Wage Stabilization Board.  With the Korean War raging, Truman chose the board.  Truman's advisers told him that any steel stoppage would cripple the war effort.  On April 8, acting on what he considered his constitutional powers as president and commander-in-chief, Truman signed Executive Order 10340 seizing the mills producing 90% of the nation's steel.  Congress responded by enacting a measure forbidding the president to use its appropriations to operate the mills.  Before the month was out, a federal judge had reversed the Truman order and the case went to the Supreme Court.  On June 2, 1952, the Supreme Court voted 6-3 to reject Truman's arguments.  The majority wrote six different opinions but all agreed that the justices could find nothing in the Constitution to justify the seizure.  Commerce Secretary Charles Sawyer turned the mills back to the steel companies and within hours more than 600,000 steelworkers walked out.  They would stay on the picket lines for 53 days, a stoppage that Truman estimated cost $40 million a day in wages and lost production.  Inventory stockpiles, however, kept shortages to a minimum and a final strike settlement was reached after the government's price-controllers okayed increases of up to $5.65 a ton for producers.  Siemens AG said group net income rose 12% in the nine months through June, to 1.09 billion marks ($584.5 million) from 969 million marks a year earlier.  The West German maker of electrical and electronic goods said sales grew 11%, to 44 billion marks ($23.59 billion) from 39.7 billion marks.  New orders increased 18%, to 47.7 billion marks from 40.5 billion marks.  The company didn't provide results for the fiscal third quarter alone, but a comparison with six-month numbers showed that group net income climbed 18% in the quarter, to 433 million marks from 367 million marks a year earlier.  Sales rose 11%, to 17.7 billion marks from 16 billion marks, and new orders climbed 22%, to 15.8 billion marks from 12.9 billion marks.  Sales for the nine months were stronger overseas, growing 16% to 23 billion marks, compared with a 6% rise in domestic sales to 21 billion marks.  In new orders the situation was reversed, with domestic orders up 19% to 20.7 billion marks and foreign bookings up 17% to 27 billion marks.  Siemens said capital investment rose 22% in the nine months, to 3.3 billion marks from 2.7 billion marks.  COMMUNITY NATIONAL BANCORP shareholders approved a 1-for-10 reverse split, a move officials said would make the stock more attractive to investors and improve liquidity.  Community is the holding company for Community National Bank & Trust Co. of Staten Island, N.Y.  The split reduces shares outstanding to 2.6 million from 25.9 million.  John J. Amodio, president and chief executive officer, said the company had net income of $1 million, or 36 cents a share, for the second quarter, up from $333,000, or 11 cents a share, a year earlier.  Total assets rose to $353.7 million at June 30 from $223.9 million a year earlier.  In over-the-counter trading, Community National shares closed yesterday at $8.25.  John M. Stafford, a former chairman and chief executive officer of Pillsbury Co., was named executive vice president of Michael Foods Inc. to head its egg operation.  A director of Michael since last fall, Mr. Stafford said yesterday he has been discussing the job with the concern for several months.  Michael's chief executive, Richard G. Olson, once worked with Mr. Stafford while they were at Green Giant Co., before Pillsbury acquired it.  As president of the Michael Foods Egg Co. unit, Mr. Stafford said he will oversee development and marketing of a proprietary low-cholesterol egg as well as an ultra-pasteurized product called Easy Eggs.  "We've got some patented technology that has the capacity to convert a commodity business into a value-added business," Mr. Stafford said, adding, "Michael is a small company that I think is on the verge of exploding."  Mr. Stafford, 52 years old, said that since leaving Pillsbury in early 1988 he had traveled extensively, gone to golf camp, and considered numerous investment opportunities.  Asked whether he anticipates any problem working for someone else, he replied, "Anybody who knows me knows that ego is not one of my problems."  As Japan's economic boom nears the three-year mark, several industries are threatened with labor shortages.  Shortages aren't cutting into production yet, but government officials and companies are deeply concerned about "mismatches" of supply and demand that could hurt the economy in future years.  Opposite ends of the economy -- high-technology companies and labor-intensive service businesses -- are threatened.  Mitsuru Saito, a senior economist at Sanwa Research Institute, an affiliate of Sanwa Bank Ltd., says even an economic downturn probably won't solve the problem.  Japanese business, he says, is facing fundamental structural changes.  For technology companies, the shortages may only end when more highly skilled workers are trained.  That likely will require the retraining of older workers, because fewer and fewer young people will be entering the labor force in the 1990s.  Analysts also say the shortages in service and construction industries may increase pressure to allow more foreign workers into the country.  Japan is enjoying its second-longest economic expansion in the post-war period: 32 months, with no end in sight.  In May, with unemployment at 2.4%, 127 jobs were offered for every 100 applicants, the largest gap during the current boomthough that figure is skewed a bit by the heavy unmet demand for part-timers.  Though analysts and industry officials say the shortages are putting upward pressure on wages, there are few worries this will spur inflation soon.  But high-tech companies in particular could be forced eventually to offer higher pay.  In recent years, a growing number of university graduates with degrees in science and engineering have been shunning manufacturing for better-paying jobs with banks and brokerage firms.  According to a recent survey of national colleges in the Tokyo area, only 37% of science and engineering graduates joined manufacturing companies last year, down from 70% in 1966.  A recruitment official at T.D.I. Corp., a medium-size software-development company in Tokyo, deplores this increasing competition for graduates, particularly from major companies capitalizing on their names.  "The number of people who want to get a job in the {information-processing} industry hasn't increased much, but the companies that want to hire them are rapidly increasing," he says.  According to a recent report by the Ministry of Labor, information-processing companies are suffering a shortage of 121,000 skilled workers, or 18% of jobs available, and the situation has been deteriorating.  An official at the Ministry of International Trade and Industry says some software-development companies have order backlogs as long as 12 months.  Japanese companies traditionally recruit college graduates in the autumn, but this year eagerness to fill positions got the best of some of them.  Eiji Suzuki, president of the Japan Federation of Employers Associations, issued a warning to companies last month, reminding them of their gentlemen's agreement not to start direct contacts with students before Aug. 20.  In the service sector, retailers, wholesalers and fast-food restaurants are troubled.  The long hours and unusual shifts required for these jobs put off many people.  Consequently, demand for part-timers is growing; among chain stores, the demand has produced what is being called an "hourly-wage war" for part-time help.  Construction also has been hit by a shortage of workers, reflecting both Japan's unprecedented building boom and the disinclination of young people willing to enter the industry.  "Young people don't want to do things that soil their hands," says a Labor Ministry official.  An official at a Tokyo government job-placement office adds, "In the past, if a white-collar job wasn't available, people would take even plumbers' jobs.  But not now."  Construction industry officials say young people seek higher education instead of apprenticeships.  Shinichiro Shikano, who runs a small construction business on the outskirts of Tokyo, says, "Almost 100% of sons used to take over their father's businesses.  But no longer -- particularily those with a college education."  One solution for many construction companies has been to employ illegal foreign workers, and this has led to calls for looser immigration curbs.  So far, however, the government insists the situation isn't bad enough to justify a change in policy.  American Express Co. swapped its remaining common-stock holdings in Fireman's Fund Corp. for $342 million of Fireman's preferred shares, effectively taking American Express out of the property and casualty insurance business.  However, American Express still will have about a 15% voting interest in Fireman's Fund, the parent of Fireman's Fund Insurance Co., and will receive a 7.75% dividend on the preferred shares, valued at $36 each.  An American Express spokesman said the latest agreement "puts a date certain out there when we will be out of our ownership entirely."  The terms of the new preferred include a mandatory redemption in seven years.  American Express acquired the company in 1968 for $350 million of preferred stock, but has gradually reduced its holdings through public offerings and other transactions.  Including the latest transaction, the company said it had received $1.75 billion for its investment.  American Express, a travel and financial services company, has been treating its equity in Fireman's Fund as a discontinued operation and has said it wanted to get out of the property-casualty business.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, Fireman's Fund common rose $1.25 a share to close at $38.  The Defense Department dropped its investigation into allegations that the president and chief executive officer of QuesTech Inc. was fired for reporting fraud.  The department's inspector general, June G. Brown, ruled that the actions of the former QuesTech official weren't covered by a law protecting "whistle-blowers" because the company was participating in a voluntary disclosure program in which contractors agree to investigate and report fraud.  William L. Mayo, former president and chief executive officer of the McLean, Va.-based defense contractor, alleges in a federal lawsuit that QuesTech billed U.S. agencies for work it never performed.  In the suit, filed in federal court in Alexandria, Va., Mr. Mayo also claims that QuesTech spent "extraordinary" sums to help several directors maintain "illicit sexual relationships" with subordinate women employees who weren't qualified for their jobs.  Mr. Mayo couldn't be reached for comment.  His attorneys contend that the Defense Department's decision to close the investigation could discourage other executives from bringing companies into the voluntary program.  QuesTech's general counsel, Norman H. Singer, said the company categorically denies every allegation in the lawsuit.  He said the company believes Mr. Mayo fabricated the charges after he was fired last October from his $165,000-a-year job for poor performance and conflicts with directors.  Mr. Singer said the company is aware of allegations of overcharging involving only one subsidiary that Mr. Mayo ordered disclosed to federal officials in May 1988.  The Defense Department concluded its investigation of those allegations early this year after finding $18,000 in overcharging by Dynamic Engineering Inc., a unit that QuesTech sold March 31.  Mr. Singer said QuesTech will ask the court to dismiss Mr. Mayo's lawsuit.  Mr. Mayo, a former president of the Comsat General Corp. unit of Communications Satellite Corp., was hired in May 1987 by QuesTech Chairman John L. McLucas, a former U.S. Air Force secretary.  According to Mr. Singer, Mr. Mayo worked for Mr. McLucas at Comsat.  J. Robert Kirk, another attorney for Mr. Mayo, said the inspector general's ruling exposes executives to retaliation by company directors and officials seeking to limit the scope of internal investigations and voluntary disclosures.  But the Defense Department concluded that it lacks jurisdiction in the matter.  It determined that Mr. Mayo was acting in his official capacity and on behalf of QuesTech when, in May 1988, he first ordered the company to disclose evidence of fraud.  Accordingly, the inspector general ruled, Mr. Mayo's action didn't constitute "a protected disclosure" under the law requiring the department to investigate suspected retaliation against whistle-blowers.  "This ends the inspector general's inquiry involving QuesTech," a department spokeswoman said.  But Mr. Mayo's attorney, Mr. Kirk, said his client was fired by QuesTech's board of directors while attempting to expand an internal investigation of suspected fraud, including evidence that a director had charged a contract for work not performed.  Mr. Kirk also said his law firm gave the inspector general's office evidence of improper contract billing provided by eight present and former QuesTech employees, but Pentagon investigators made no attempt to contact them.  The Pentagon spokeswoman said the department can't comment on any aspect of the investigation.  Assicurazioni Generali S.p.A., Italy's largest insurance company, has signed an agreement with the French insurance and financial services company Cie. du Midi to form a joint holding company.  Generali said yesterday the two groups would be able to contribute their own insurance subsidiaries to the venture or execute acquisitions through the new company.  Midi will hold a "large share" of the capital of the new concern, Generali said in a statement.  A Generali spokesman said some of the terms of the venture still had to be negotiated, but he couldn't offer further details.  Generali indirectly controls about 20% of Midi through its alliances.  It previously had announced plans to jointly invest with Midi up to $1 billion in North American insurance companies, but no mention of these plans was included in yesterday's statement.  Japan's murky political situation grew even more obscure as two leading candidates for prime minister were shunted aside.  Ryutaro Hashimoto and Shin Kanemaru had been among the top contenders to succeed Sosuke Uno as president of the ruling Liberal Democratic Party and thus as prime minister.  Mr. Hashimoto had seemed to be emerging as the front-runner.  But both men belong to the 105-member LDP parliamentary faction of former Prime Minister Noboru Takeshita, whose leaders announced yesterday that the faction wouldn't field a candidate.  Theoretically, LDP members of the Diet, or parliament, could still vote for either man, but without factional backing that is unlikely.  The LDP Diet members are scheduled to elect their president by secret ballot at a meeting next Tuesday.  The faction's decision left two names prominent among those still being mentioned for the job: Toshiki Kaifu, 58, a former education minister, and Toshio Komoto, 78, who heads a 30-man Diet faction that includes Mr. Kaifu.  Japanese press accounts stressed Mr. Kaifu's strong support from younger members of the party, but as Mr. Kaifu is a member of Mr. Komoto's faction it wasn't clear how aggressively, if at all, he would campaign for the job.  The Takeshita faction's decision was the result of behind-the-scenes jockeying in which Mr. Kanemaru himself played a central role.  As chairman of the Takeshita faction, Mr. Kanemaru apparently was determined that the party's top job not go to a younger member, especially Mr. Hashimoto, who just turned 52.  Some LDP insiders say Mr. Kanemaru's reason for stepping aside himself is clear -- his health is poor, they say, and he never seriously intended to run.  What is unclear is why he was so determined to stop Mr. Hashimoto, and whom, if anyone, he was trying to help.  Mr. Kanemaru and other faction leaders reached the agreement in meetings Sunday and yesterday.  Mr. Hashimoto was informed of the decision yesterday morning, and voiced agreement with it, according to Japanese press reports.  Publicly, the faction leaders said they reached the decision to take responsibility for the faction's strong role in Mr. Uno's election as party leader two months ago.  He was supposed to help the party recover from the Recruit Cosmos influence-peddling scandal, but instead his short reign aggravated the party's problems, contributing to the loss of its majority in the Diet's upper house in elections nine days ago.  Mr. Uno, who was undone by revelations of his connections with a geisha, announced after the elections that he would resign.  With Mr. Kanemaru and Mr. Hashimoto out of the running, the party seems more divided than ever.  Some of its members believe that only by turning to a completely fresh face can the party convince the voters it is changing its ways.  But that would mean skipping over two generations of potential presidential aspirants, including some of the party's most powerful figures.  Many members of the old guard still doubt the need for such radical change, and want to continue observing the party's traditions of seniority.  Last week Mr. Kanemaru suggested the party's salvation lies instead in promising to repeal the unpopular 3% consumption tax that it rammed through in the midst of the Recruit scandal.  But under criticism from other party leaders, he was later forced to backpedal on the tax issue.  Mr. Kaifu would be a fresh face for the party, but so far he lacks the public appeal of Mr. Hashimoto, who was one of the few party leaders who could have gone head-to-head against the rising star of the Japan Socialist Party, Takako Doi.  B. Manischewitz Co. said that an $841-a-share bid for the matzo maker collapsed and that the company and the bidding group are negotiating over a $2.4 million transaction breakup fee.  Manischewitz said the buying group, Levine, Tessler, Leichtman & Co., Los Angeles, has "repudiated" the merger agreement.  "It has become clear from the words and conduct" of Levine Tessler that the group "isn't prepared or willing to close the merger," Manischewitz said.  The company had accepted the $841-a-share offer in early July from the investment firm.  The buying group included some members of Manischewitz's management.  The group had outbid two other possible purchasers.  According to Manischewitz, Levine Tessler said it couldn't meet closing conditions for the merger due to developments related to a previously disclosed federal grand jury investigation of alleged antitrust violations in the kosher food industry.  In a statement, Levine Tessler disputed the assertion that it has repudiated the agreement.  The firm said it is "ready, willing and able" to complete the transaction once it received sufficient information to assess "new developments" in the grand-jury probe.  Levine Tessler said it has been denied information about the developments.  It added that information about certain liabilities of the company "do not comport" with representations that must be made at the closing.  The two parties said they will try to settle differences over termination claims during a two-day period in which they have agreed they won't commence litigation.  Richard L. Braun was named a senior vice president of this financial-services company.  He remains its controller.  AmBase recently changed its name from Home Group Inc.  Raw-steel production by the nation's mills increased 0.3% last week to 1,856,000 tons from 1,850,000 tons the previous week, the American Iron and Steel Institute said.  Last week's output fell 5.1% from the 1,956,000 tons produced a year earlier.  The industry used 83.5% of its capability last week, compared with 83.3% the previous week and 91.7% a year earlier.  The American Iron and Steel Institute reported:  @ Net tons Capability  @ produced utilization  @Week to July 29 .................. 1,856,000 83.5%  @Week to July 22 .................. 1,850,000 83.3%  @Year to date ..................... 58,913,000 88.3%  @Year earlier to date ............. 58,035,000 89.8%  The capability utilization rate is a calculation designed to indicate at what percent of its production capability the industry is operating in a given week.  Paul F. Avery Jr. was named a director of this manufacturer of seals and dampers for the computer and semiconductor industries, increasing the board to five members.  Mr. Avery is president of the management consulting company P.F. Avery Corp.  Rep. Dan Rostenkowski, struggling to extricate himself from a political quagmire, today intends to unveil a new tax package that includes a reduction in capital-gains taxes.  In an interview yesterday, the embattled chairman of the House Ways and Means Committee said he hopes to test with his colleagues a plan that "does a little bit in capital gains," primarily through eliminating from taxation that portion of the gain that is attributable to inflation.  This procedure, called indexing, has been the centerpiece of the chairman's tax negotiations with the Bush administration.  Going through with the proposal represents a major concession by him, particularly in the apparent absence of any commitment from the administration to support it.  Previously, the Illinois Democrat had heatedly opposed a cut in capital-gains taxes as being counter to the principles of his party.  But he has been forced to compromise; a bipartisan majority of his committee has defied him and, instead, is committed to supporting a proposal by Rep. Edgar Jenkins (D., Ga.) that would provide a lower tax rate on gains from the sale of capital assets.  It remains unclear whether Rep. Rostenkowski can persuade the many factions on his committee, and in the House in general, to go along with his latest idea.  The last time he tried to lead the way by presenting a tax package, he was rebuffed, and Rep. Jenkins quietly gathered a slim but solid majority for a capital-gains plan.  Rep. Rostenkowski's newest proposal has an added complication.  He intends to use it to avoid repeal of two controversial laws whose support has been draining away in recent weeks: the catastrophic-illness insurance part of Medicare and so-called Section 89, which uses the tax code to compel employers to give comparable health and life insurance benefits to high- and low-paid workers.  Rep. Rostenkowski said he intends to include in the package the compromises on both issues that his committee already has drafted.  The plan also will have extensions of expiring tax breaks and an expansion of federal benefits for child care and for the poor, he said.  Asked about his latest effort's chance of success, he said, "Hope springs eternal."  The chairman has a hard road ahead of him.  He will begin by trying to persuade the six dissident Democrats on his own committee who are backing the Jenkins plan to go along.  Next he must persuade at least some Republicans to do the same.  And then he faces a caucus of all of the Democrats in the House tomorrow.  Along the way, he may have an important ally in House Speaker Thomas Foley of Washington.  Mr. Foley was the first to float the idea of indexing as an alternative to Mr. Jenkins's rate reduction.  And, according to a Democratic leadership aide, Reps.  Rostenkowski and Foley have been working "hand-in-glove" on the issue.  What's more, administration officials said that, after many days of talks behind closed doors, Mr. Rostenkowski knows what is needed to satisfy the president, and can easily produce a plan that does so.  President Bush has said publicly that he is willing to compromise on the capital-gains issue, which was an important component of his campaign last year.  The administration officials encapsulated their preference in the phrase, "indexing plus."  By this they mean that simply removing inflation from what is taxed wouldn't be enough.  One option being widely discussed last week was augmenting the inflation index with an additional percentage point, or "indexing plus one."  Some Democrats, however, notably House Majority Leader Richard Gephardt of Missouri, derided that idea as tantamount to creating a lower rate.  Texas Oil & Gas Corp., a unit of USX Corp., said it discovered two gas wells in Oklahoma and Texas.  Texas Oil said that in Pittsburg County, Okla., the Romine No. 2 well tested at 7.2 million cubic feet a day of natural gas from Atoke "E" formation perforations made at various intervals between 8,384 feet and 8,564 feet.  Test rates were measured through a 24/64-inch choke with a flowing tubing pressure of 2,300 pounds per square inch.  The company is the operator and has a 44.8% interest in the well.  In Colorado County, Texas, the Lehrer GU A No. 1 well flowed at a rate of 3.85 million cubic feet a day of natural gas through a 10/64-inch choke with 7,010 pounds per square inch of flowing tubing pressure from Middle Wilcox perforations between 12,590 feet and 12,622 feet.  Offset wells are planned, the company said.  Texas Oil, the operator, has a 25% working interest in the field.  Stephen C. O'Hara, 39-year-old president and chief operating officer, was named to the additional post of chief executive officer of this maker of electronic products for the digital-communications industry.  He succeeds company founder Sidney N. Jerson, 59, who continues as chairman.  James F. Murray, real estate finance executive at this bank holding company, and Charles A. Smith, corporate human resources executive, were each named an executive vice president.  They had each been a senior vice president.  David B. Morse, 45-year-old acting chairman of this maker of electronic medical devices, was named chairman, succeeding George A. Jackson, 58, who resigned in February.  Curtis J. Olson, 52, president and chief executive officer, was named a director, succeeding Mr. Jackson.  The board now has five members.  John J. Hudiburg is resigning as chairman and chief executive officer of Florida Power & Light Co., FPL's utility unit, effective Aug. 31.  He will serve as chairman emeritus through year end.  Mr. Hudiburg, 61 years old, said he decided to retire early to devote the next few years to promoting quality improvement in production in the U.S. Florida Power is currently completing a four-year quality-improvement program.  The company has no plans to name a successor in the "foreseeable future," a spokesman said.  Robert E. Tallon, 62, president and chief operating officer of Florida Power, will serve as Florida Power's senior executive.  NCNB Corp., Charlotte, N.C., said it intends to redeem all of its $85 million in outstanding 14.5% senior notes at 100% of their principal amount Sept. 1.  The superregional bank holding company said the move was designed to reduce the carrying costs of the notes.  As the nuclear family has become an ever-shrinking minority group, it has turned into one of our favorite fantasy objects.  Television producers began capitalizing on this yearning for a disappearing domestic order early; the dominant shows of the '80s have centered on households with Moms, Dads and kids ("The Cosby Show," "Roseanne," "Family Ties").  Movie makers have been slow to follow.  The decade began with angst-ridden stories of family dissolution: "Kramer vs.  Kramer," "Ordinary People."  After that, the dominant theme was escapism -- either to outer space or into the jungle, with Rambo or his urban equivalent.  Until recently, romance of the heterosexual variety was pretty much absent from the big screen.  Couples, for the most part, were buddies, usually cops.  There were lots of kids, usually operating in a world where adults had no relevance.  Most of the children featured in the Spielbergian fantasies of the early '80s grew up in single-parent homes.  But not long ago, perhaps reflecting the aging of Hollywood's young film makers, the baby movies started.  Most of these featured romance between an adult and an infant -- rarely, however, in a traditional family setting ("Three Men and a Baby," "Baby Boom").  Relationships between men and women were still regarded as a thing apart from the relationship among men, women and children all living under the same roof.  Working out of New York, Woody Allen bucked the trend a couple of years ago, with "Hannah and Her Sisters," his romantic homage to the value of family life that preceded the announcement that Mr. Allen and Mia Farrow were about to produce the film maker's first child.  Now director Ron Howard and screenwriters Lowell Ganz and Babaloo Mandel -- who have 14 children among them -- have devoted their considerable wit and sentimental impulse to the subject, in a movie called, appropriately, "Parenthood."  This good-natured and pleasurable picture doesn't probe deeply into family dynamics, not all that much more than "Leave It to Beaver" did.  The movie follows the varied branches of the Buckman family, an upper-middle-class clan living in comfortable St. Louis suburbs.  The family sprawls across four generations, from babies to a charmingly dizzy great-grandmother, played by Helen Shaw.  Though idealized, the Buckmans have their problems: Their divorced 40ish daughter's children are unruly; their youngest son is a ne'er-do-well who periodically returns home to cadge a loan.  The pre-eminent Buckman is Gil, who felt neglected by his own father (Jason Robards) and is determined to be a perfect father to his own three young children.  Playing this overeager parent, Steve Martin puts on a delightful show, expanding the part of an ordinary guy to the broad dimensions of his outsized talents as actor and comic.  He makes full use of his mobile face and physical dexterity; there's always a certain amount of visible ironic tension to keep his sly wisecracking from seeming too glib.  The film makers take a snapshot approach to the various goings-on in the households of the Buckman offspring.  Their idea about childrearing -- that it's a more or less uncontrollable adventure -- is set forth amiably, with the sentimentality and wryness distributed in satisfying proportions (though Mr. Howard can't resist capping things off with a cloying finale).  If they have a lesson to impart, it's that parents shouldn't aim for perfection.  Rick Moranis -- who appears this summer in "Ghostbusters II" and in that other paean to family togetherness, "Honey, I Shrunk the Kids" -- uses his pudgy earnestness to good effect as the father bent on creating his own master race.  His rigorous training of a three-year-old -- in Kafka, Eastern philosophy, algebra -- nicely satirizes the legions of upscale parents who begin the push toward Harvard when they enroll their children in nursery school.  The picture sets up high expectations for itself with its wonderful casting, and the actors don't disappoint.  It's especially nice to see the marvelous Diane Wiest land a decent part outside a Woody Allen movie.  She plays the harried divorced mother with the distracted air of a generally sensible person who has a hard time accepting as fact the baffling drama her life has become.  Yet Mr. Howard and his writers haven't reduced her to a neurotic waffler; they give Ms. Wiest room to be funny and wise, too.  Indeed, they have so much affection for all their characters that no one -- except the prodigal youngest son -- is left dangling.  This warm-hearted vision of upper-middle-class family life is not for cynics.  EXECUTIVE HUNTS lengthen as jobs grow more complex and the pool shrinks.  Mead Corp., which 10 years ago could fill a management slot in 90 days, says the task now takes nearly twice as long.  Fewer qualified candidates are applying -- four when there used to be 10 -- says Jack Bramlage, the recruiting director.  He puts part of the blame on the diminishing number of graduate students.  Citizens & Southern Corp. finds fewer candidates for some jobs because "banking has become more specialized."  Syntex Corp. says some of its searches have stretched to a year because of steep housing and other costs in the San Francisco area.  "A lot of candidates back out," it says.  Consolidated Natural Gas Co. says it takes "slightly longer" to find managers because it conducts a more formalized search.  Recruiter John Davis says companies sometimes look "for qualities and skills that rarely appear in one individual."  SECTION 89 could cost firms $3.7 billion this year, a group contends.  While Congress ponders whether to revise, delay or kill it, the expense mounts from the 1986 tax provision aimed at company health and life-insurance plans that discriminate in favor of highly compensated employees.  The Institute for Research on the Economics of Taxation says 566 mostly small companies already have spent an average of $2.65 per worker to assess the impact.  The recurring annual compliance cost could climb to $40 a worker if and when the section goes into effect.  Using data from the survey, Fiscal Associates, an economics consultant, estimates that Section 89 as now written could add 22 cents next year to each $100 of a company's payroll bill.  That could cost 89,300 jobs and trim $2.6 billion from the nation's output of goods and services.  Federal revenue next year, it figures, could be cut $800 million.  Proposals for scaling back Section 89 could reduce the expense.  But the institute still calls for repeal.  FIRE A SHAREHOLDER?  Courts in two states take opposite views.  Under the traditional concept of employment at will, a worker can quit or be fired without explanation unless there is a contract laying out the job's terms.  But Gaston & Snow, a Boston law firm, says courts in New York and Massachusetts are differing on how the principle should be applied to a worker who also is a minority owner.  Massachusetts' high court ruled in 1976 that Springside Nursing Home needed a legitimate business reason for firing Stanley Wilkes, an officer and 25% shareholder.  Dismissal without cause, it said, was an impermissible freeze-out of a minority owner.  But, says Gaston & Snow, New York's highest tribunal has come down the other side, ruling that Glamore Motor Sales could dismiss Philip Ingle as an officer, even though he owned at least 20% of the company's stock.  His employment and stock ownership were separate matters, the court held.  Dissents in the New York court suggest the issue is far from settled, Gaston & Snow says.  LECH WALESA, leader of Poland's Solidarity movement, reciprocates congratulations from the Air Line Pilots Association with a telex backing the union's strike against Eastern Airlines.  "Trade union rights cannot be taken for granted even in democratic countries," Mr. Walesa writes.  FLEXIBLE SPENDING ACCOUNTS flex their muscles.  More than 30% of the companies surveyed by consultant Hay Group -- up from 20% in 1986 -- now allow employees to deduct pretax dollars from their paychecks to pay for unreimbursed health costs or child care.  But Williams, Thacher & Rand, another consultant, says an IRS proposal dims the appeal for employers.  LOST BENEFIT: The IRS rules that employees have to pay income tax on the cost of life insurance that some companies buy for dependents.  Previously, as much as $2,000 of such insurance wasn't taxed, consultant Kwasha Lipton says.  IF YOU CHEAT, at least do it quietly.  Two former postal workers pleaded guilty to charges they underreported earnings while claiming workers' compensation for injuries.  One acted in a movie and TV shows; the other was a radio announcer.  CORPORATE DISCIPLINE means following the contract or office manual.  Navistar International Corp. says its labor contracts detail how it can move against workers accused of breaking the rules.  Any disciplinary action has to be signed off by the next two highest levels of management.  "If the offense is serious enough and the employee's rank is high enough, then the personnel department would get involved," says Martin Tretheway, vice president for human resources.  Fighting on the job could mean instant dismissal.  For most offenses, though, workers would be counseled several times before the ax is dropped.  Dayton Hudson Corp. says it sacks any worker who steals.  But the retailer tries to mend the ways of employees accused of absenteeism or such other infractions.  Violators usually get written warnings.  Lawsuits alleging unlawful discharge or discrimination prompt companies to move carefully, lawyers say.  THE CHECKOFF: A Labor Department directory lists such enticing jobs as pillowcase turner, pickle pumper and slime-plant operator, consultant Valpar International finds. . . .  The Communications Workers of America threatens "electronic picketing" against Bell Atlantic.  But how does it get those little electrons to carry signs?  Nordstrom Inc. has always been paternal about its customers.  The retailer serenades shoppers with live piano music, checks coats at the door and even provides baby-changing tables to speed a diaper switch.  So it wasn't surprising that, when the 88-year-old concern opened its first East Coast department store last year, it went to extraordinary lengths to preserve its reputation for service, a reputation renowned in the West.  Rather than hire managers locally, Bruce, John and Jim Nordstrom, grandsons of the founder, transplanted 100 veterans to the new store in McLean, Va., outside Washington, D.C. Another 200 salespeople moved east at their own expense.  When the store doors finally opened, fully half the staff was already steeped in the quirky Nordstrom culture -- and customer coats were being properly checked at the door.  But now Nordstrom is facing a much bigger test.  Beginning in September, and extending over the next four years, the highly successful retailer plans to add 15 more stores to its 58-store chain.  Many of them will be in the East and Midwest, including suburbs of New York, Chicago, Minneapolis and Baltimore.  Stretching a company beyond its base is always risky, but it may be especially so for Nordstrom.  The retailer, which advertises less than its competitors and relies more on word of mouth to draw shoppers, is entering new markets where it is generally unknown.  It will be selling its wares at a time of slowing consumer spending.  And its quick growth could well outpace its ability to train new missionaries to carry the company flag.  "I think they have a problem as they grow larger," cautions Stanley Marcus, the retired chairman of Neiman-Marcus, which struggled through an expansion of its own in the 1970s and early 1980s.  He says it may not be as easy for Nordstrom to maintain standards as it was "when the stores were in one area and family members could check them daily."  But the Nordstroms are confident they can clone the company's unusual culture and keep service levels high.  They point to their record so far: Over the past decade, Nordstrom has successfully expanded out of the Northwest into the hipper California market.  As for the McLean, Va., store, it was profitable in its first year.  The secretive Nordstroms -- known inside the company as Mr. Bruce, Mr. John and Mr. Jim -- usually refuse to explain to outsiders how their company works.  Instead, they make self-effacing comments about their role in Nordstrom's remarkable success.  "It's just a lot of people doing a lot of things on their own," says Jim Nordstrom, a tall man with big hands who, at 49 years old, is the youngest of the founder's grandsons.  But don't be fooled by this aw-shucks attitude.  The Nordstroms are shrewd businessmen, who typically open new stores in malls with track records of attracting affluent crowds.  They are also masters at motivating their troops, at maintaining family harmony amid potentially explosive corporate decisions, and at decentralizing their business.  To understand the Nordstroms and their old-fashioned ways, you must climb two flights of stairs above the company's flagship department store in Seattle to its modest executive suite.  Up here, the executives answer their own phones and the portraits of Grandpa Nordstrom and his two dead sons are done in charcoal instead of the usual corporate oils.  While it is clear who runs the show, the Nordstroms like to describe their organization chart as an upside-down pyramid, with them on the bottom.  They eschew executive perks, such as having their own secretaries.  Their small offices are identical in size.  There is no czar.  Instead, the five top executives share power, insisting that titles mean nothing.  Jim Nordstrom, his brother John and their cousin Bruce are all co-chairmen.  Cousin Jack McMillan is president, and a family friend, Robert Bender, who grew up in Seattle with the Nordstroms and was their fraternity brother at the University of Washington, is senior vice president.  It is the family that's at the core of the Nordstrom mystique.  The three Nordstroms and their cousin Jack each earned an identical $453,750 in salary and bonuses last year, while Mr. Bender earned somewhat less.  And although the family members each control different amounts of Nordstrom stock -- with values ranging from $74 million to $195 million -- they all have an equal vote, along with Mr. Bender, on major policy questions, such as where to locate new stores.  They don't move forward unless the decision is unanimous.  "Everybody has veto power," says Mr. McMillan.  "It isn't used very often."  Balancing acts like this are rare in business, and rarer still among a founder's third-generation offspring.  But the Nordstroms, who along with their extended family own 40% of the company's stock, say they are merely following in the footsteps of their fathers, who also shared power.  "We were raised with an example," says a bespectacled Bruce Nordstrom, 55.  "It really has a lot to do with turning the other cheek and saying, 'I want you to do what you want to do.'"  Take, for example, the family's decision a few years ago to sell the Seattle Seahawks football team, in which the Nordstroms had a majority stake.  Jim Nordstrom considered the team a distraction from the retailing business.  Bruce was uncomfortable with the publicity and the fact that young athletes earn so much.  But John Nordstrom was the team's managing partner -- and he loved it.  "He really didn't want to sell, he got so involved," says Mike McCormack, then the team's general manager.  But Mr. Nordstrom ultimately went along with the family's desires.  "He was reluctant to sell, but the decision was made," Mr. McCormack says.  The family provides extraordinary management stability for the chain at a time when other stores are being rocked by takeovers and revolving-door owners.  When B. Altman and Bonwit Teller were bought out in 1987, for example, their new parent, Hooker Corp. of Australia, redirected the chains into an ambitious, new expansion program.  Now, Hooker is having cash-flow problems and has put the chains up for sale.  Meantime, some apparel makers have held up shipments to the stores because of Hooker's problems.  Nordstrom, on the other hand, steams ahead.  Each of the five top executives oversees a separate piece of the company, pushing most operating decisions down to the store level.  They pore over daily sales reports but insist they don't give employees much direction.  Instead, they create an intensely competitive atmosphere by setting ever-higher sales goals and pitting employees against one another in contests.  "People that respond to that kind of pressure are our kind of people," says Bruce Nordstrom.  Store managers, for instance, must publicly declare their sales goals at regional meetings.  Then a top executive unveils what he calls the "secret committee's" sales target for each store.  Unlucky managers who set goals below the committee's are booed.  Those who exceed them are cheered.  To egg on the crowd, the usually reserved John Nordstrom sometimes dons a letterman's sweater emblazoned with a big "N."  The executives also hand out monthly cash prizes to stores that provide the best service.  The choice is made on the basis of scrapbooks bulging with letters from customers, copies of thank-you notes salespeople write to their customers and notes called "heroics" that salespeople write about each other.  Salespeople who do especially well are honored monthly as All-Stars.  A Nordstrom shakes their hand and gives them $100, and the right to big discounts in the store.  The most productive are inducted annually into the Pace Setters club, which also entitles them to big discounts.  And the best managers get their names engraved on a plaque in the executive suite.  To promote service, employees are given the freedom to do almost anything to satisfy shoppers.  Billie Burns, a former men's clothing department manager, once got a call from a regular customer who was racing to the airport and needed some clothes.  Mr. Burns gathered up a bagful of blazers, slacks and underwear, charged them to the customer's account and met the man's car outside the store for the handoff.  A saleswoman at the same store once soothed a frantic executive with a run in her stockings by delivering some nylons to the woman's office in time for her to change for a big meeting.  This sort of attention to customers' needs started at the turn of the century with John W. Nordstrom.  A Swedish immigrant who arrived in the U.S. with $5 in his pocket, he made his fortune mining gold in Alaska and the Klondike before opening a shoe store in Seattle with a partner in 1901.  The two split philosophically, the story goes, the day Grandpa Nordstrom started ordering shoes in uncommon sizes.  Today, the Nordstroms, unlike other retailers, require virtually everyone to start on the sales floor, where they themselves started stocking shoes.  They attract career-oriented college graduates partly because Nordstrom pays, in combination with an hourly wage, commissions ranging from 5% to 10% after employees meet certain sales quotas.  The average Nordstrom salesperson earns around $25,000 a year, compared with less than $20,000 for clerks at other stores, where commissions normally aren't paid.  A top performer at Nordstrom can make more than $80,000.  The company is also highly decentralized and growing rapidly.  Even merchandise buying is decentralized, so company buyers in different areas can adapt to customers' tastes.  The suburban Washington, D.C., store, for example, carries more formal attire than other Nordstrom stores.  All this leads to more opportunity for employees, especially since Nordstrom promotes only from within.  Consider the case of Bob Love, a former Chicago Bulls basketball player.  Mr. Love's stuttering landed him in what he calls "dead end" jobs after he retired from professional sports.  Then he went to work busing tables at a cafe in a Seattle Nordstrom store.  His hard work impressed John Nordstrom, who told him he would have to do something about his speech impediment to advance beyond menial work.  So with Nordstrom picking up the tab, Mr. Love started seeing a speech therapist.  "They kept pushing me and were concerned about me," says Mr. Love, now corporate health and sanitation director for the chain's restaurants.  "All I wanted was a chance.  They gave it to me."  The Nordstrom culture does have its eccentric moments.  Former employees in certain regions say that, in motivational seminars, they were encouraged to write and repeat upbeat statements called "affirmations."  While still a salesperson, for instance, one former store manager told himself repeatedly, "I enjoy being a store manager at Nordstrom."  Salespeople have also focused on such phrases as "I feel proud being a Pace Setter."  Some employees consider it pop psychology, but others embrace the idea, writing chants aimed at changing their lives.  For suppliers, this corporate individualism -- and splintered chain of command -- can be vexing.  When Michael Treiber, chief executive of Jones New York, a women's apparel maker, tried going to the top -- as he does at other chains -- he found Jim Nordstrom wouldn't talk business.  "We talked about the social amenities," recalls Mr. Treiber.  "Other than a glad hand and a goodbye, that's all I got out of the conversation.  He doesn't want to second-guess his people."  Nordstrom department managers, in fact, have so much freedom to hire and fire that some employees complain of favoritism.  The company recently was sued in federal court in Seattle by the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission on age-discrimination charges.  Clearly, working at Nordstrom isn't for everyone.  Consistently failing to meet sales quotas is considered a firing offense.  "It's a very intimidating environment," says one Seattle-area saleswoman who requested anonymity.  "They preach that as long as you're giving service, they'll take care of you.  But that's not true.  All they really care about is how much you sell."  Nordstrom employees today "have less job security than any other employees we have under contract," contends Joe Peterson, president of United Food and Commercial Workers Local 1001 in Seattle, which represents Seattle-area Nordstrom employees.  Notably, however, the union hasn't been able to organize Nordstrom workers elsewhere because they typically earn more than clerks at other stores.  But when the company recently suggested making union membership optional in its Seattle stores, a union poll showed employees overwhelmingly opposed to the idea.  The union is threatening to wage a negative publicity campaign against the chain over the matter.  The three Nordstroms themselves might not have measured up to the standards they use today.  "We weren't very good salespeople," says Jim Nordstrom.  "I was the best, and I was lousy."  Bruce Nordstrom says he once pushed so hard while fitting a young woman in a tight pair of flats that she tipped over in her chair.  The Nordstroms, all of whom are married, are as private in their personal lives as they are in their business affairs.  John and Jim Nordstrom live along Lake Washington in a Seattle neighborhood where dense shrubbery shields their houses from public view.  Their pursuits tend to be solitary ones.  John, a varsity rower in college, runs 50 miles a week and skis.  Two years ago, he climbed with crampons and ice axes to the top of Mount Rainier.  Jim owns a 72-foot yacht, which he moors over summers at his fishing lodge in British Columbia.  He flies himself back and forth in his own plane.  His cousin Bruce also has a big boat, which he takes up to Jim Nordstrom's place in Canada in the summer.  All of the men want to retire by age 60, so it is likely that a new generation of Nordstroms will play a role in the company's coming expansion.  Seven fourth-generation Nordstroms are already working their way up through the ranks.  Three are store managers.  Three are buyers.  One runs a new management-training program in Southern California, which she calls the University of Nordstrom.  There are also professional managers who will likely leaven the mix at the top.  For now, though, the company can bask in its success.  Its sales per square foot rose last year to $380, nearly double the department-store industry average.  And in 1988, when other big merchants were struggling, Nordstrom rang up a 21% sales gain to $2.3 billion.  What's more, the competition is starting to ape Nordstrom.  Bloomingdale's, among others, is copying the company's practice of paying commissions to salespeople.  And, though Nordstrom may still have the franchise on emergency deliveries of nylons, its rivals are taking note: Lord & Taylor has started special classes -- to teach its clerks how to be friendlier.  Nicholas Delbanco, a talented novelist, has been lucky enough to spend sizable periods of his life in the south of France.  Family funds and family friends helped him fetch up in a comfortable cottage on a large estate and this retreat became central to his adolescence and young manhood.  Acutely aware of the writers and painters who worked in Provence before him, Mr. Delbanco wrote his first three novels (there are 10 in all) in his cottage, brought his first serious love there, revisited on his honeymoon, and in 1987, took his two daughters back to the region on a sentimental journey to show them where their parents "cavorted when young."  "Running in Place: Scenes From the South of France" (Atlantic Monthly Press, 231 pages, $16.95) is a sort of thank-you note and good-bye to a region that once meant so much, but is less important to him now in middle age.  As he explains, he has written about Provence and he is not a Faulkner or a Hardy, a writer capable of using the same locale forever.  His fictions have needed other settings and he has moved on.  "Running in Place" is a slight but engaging book that brings splashes of Provencal sunlight to those of us left at home.  Mr. Delbanco mixes autobiography with bits of Provencal history.  He adds brief sketches of some of the region's tourist sites.  The book opens with a wonderful, farcical anecdote.  Mrs. Delbanco has just settled into a bubble bath when a fully dressed (except for shoes) man swings through the hotel window and lands in her tub.  She screams, but the door is locked and the outraged husband can't come to her rescue until the bubble-covered wife and soggy intruder have escaped the tub and reached the door.  It is all an accident, a misunderstanding, a broken-hearted man looking for his lost lover.  Many apologies are offered and accepted.  But Mr. Delbanco's publishers overmatch "Running in Place" by their dustjacket comparison to Ernest Hemingway's extraordinary memoir of Paris, "A Moveable Feast."  This is a low-key, family-centered book in which little of moment happens.  Even James Baldwin, the only famous figure in Mr. Delbanco's landscape, is a quiet presence.  Hemingway had Gertrude Stein, Fitzgerald and a cast of strivers for greatness.  Mr. Delbanco's characters are his family and his Provence neighbors.  He treats them all with affection (something one would never say about Hemingway), from the drunken watchman, a veteran of Dien Bien Phu; to the old-fashioned, elderly bourgeoisie making polite dinner conversation; to the married cook and gardener, his closest friends, who care for the estate where he stays.  From them he knows the hardships of rural life.  He helps deliver bottled gas tanks over icy roads to remote villages and watches men labor in the fields and on the olive harvest.  The rural village in our age has been a romantic place to live only for those who don't have to do manual labor there, as Mr. Delbanco knows.  A pension, a trust fund or a fruitful stock portfolio can make village life an idyll, but for the village worker, income is meager, toil is dull, horizons are narrow.  Young people are drawn to the cities.  This gulf between village and city, or old ways and modern times, is Ian Buruma's theme in "God's Dust: A Modern Asian Journey" (Farrar Straus & Giroux, 220 pages, $17.95), an examination of Asian nations caught between the pull of contemporary life and fears of losing their cultural identities.  Mr. Buruma is a very different traveler from Mr. Delbanco.  He is a reporter who set out in the summer of 1986 to spend a year traveling through Burma, Thailand, the Philippines, Malaysia, Singapore, Taiwan, South Korea and Japan talking to Asians about identity crises.  Mr. Buruma, a Dutch citizen who now lives in Hong Kong after many years in Japan, ends his travels concluding that what is being lost to modernization is no great loss, and to nourish old ways at the expense of the new is futile, foolish and even politically dangerous.  Nostalgia for old ways is largely based on myths, he writes.  "In the real world, traditional village life was dirt poor and fraught with cruel social discrimination.  But it is a potent fantasy."  Potent enough that political groups seeking to reinvent the past can endanger their nations' efforts to live in the present.  "God's Dust," much of which has appeared in The New York Review of Books and other publications, suffers because Mr. Buruma dwells at length on several political events that are now old news and he only hints at the new class tensions arising throughout Asia, caused by the region's new wealth.  Yet he is a sharp observer whose chapters on Taiwan, Malaysia and Singapore are particularly good.  Of Lee Kuan Yew's increasingly totalitarian Singapore, Mr. Buruma remarks that Chinese rulers have always justified themselves as guardians of a perfect social order.  "I am convinced that if Deng Xiaoping had a blueprint for a perfect modern China, it would look rather like Singapore," Mr. Buruma observes.  He is writing long before the Tiananmen massacre, but it is an interesting link between the two most heavyhanded (leaving aside Vietnam) regimes in Asia, the one communist, the other virulently anti-communist, but both feared by their citizens and criticized only in whispers.  ---  Mr. Lescaze is the Journal's foreign editor.  The veteran ABC News producer Av Westin joined King World Productions Inc. as senior vice president of "reality based" programming.  Mr. Westin, 60 years old, was hired to create a new, daily syndicated magazine show and to inject some investigative zip into the syndicator's tabloid television show "Inside Edition."  It seems that last year's big burst in so-called reality-based programming -- including the syndicated show "A Current Affair" and programs such as "America's Most Wanted" -- was just the beginning.  The move by King World to double its reality programs comes just as Paramount television's new daily syndicated tabloid show, "Hard Copy," is about to be launched.  Also, both ABC and NBC are launching new prime-time news shows, which have their premieres this week.  When Mr. Westin's contract expired this spring at Capital Cities/ABC Inc., the former executive producer of the prime-time news program "20/20" said he was going to form his own production company.  Mr. Westin said in an interview that he had been negotiating with ABC for a joint venture under which he would have done cable programming and some programming for videocassettes.  Walt Disney Co. and Warner Communications Inc. also negotiated to back Mr. Westin.  But he said King World offered him a three-year contract with "a far bigger salary than I was getting at ABC" and "a percentage of net profits from any entities I create."  King World has four of the top 10 television programs in syndication, including "Wheel of Fortune" and "The Oprah Winfrey Show."  Despite Mr. Westin's having won many awards and built a reputation as an extremely able television producer, his 20-year career at ABC took a slide two years ago, when he circulated a memo highly critical of Roone Arledge's management of ABC News.  After the memo was widely publicized, Mr. Arledge suspended Mr. Westin.  Though he rejoined ABC News after several months, with his old title of vice president, program development, Mr. Westin wasn't running "20/20" any longer.  For the past year, he has produced a dozen news specials in a series called "Burning Questions," but Mr. Westin said he could see limited opportunities for him to produce prime-time programming in the near future.  "ABC is putting all their eggs for at least two years into this new program {PrimeTime Live} with Diane Sawyer and Sam Donaldson," Mr. Westin said.  "I could see myself doing maybe three programs a year."  He also has been producing a series of cable programs for the Arts & Entertainment network, 38%-owned by ABC.  Mr. Arledge said in a statement that the differences between him and Mr. Westin "were put behind us long ago and don't reflect in any way on Av's decision to leave ABC News. . . .  We hope to have an opportunity to work with him again in the future."  Mr. Westin said he didn't have any concrete ideas yet on the format for King World's new magazine show, tentatively called "30 Minutes" and scheduled for the 1990-1991 season.  As for "Inside Edition," Mr. Westin said he will act as a consultant and establish a new investigative unit on the show.  Though he didn't offer specifics, Mr. Westin was emphatic about de-emphasizing gossipy, titillating items in favor of consumer-oriented exposes.  "They didn't hire me here to do wet T-shirt contests," Mr. Westin said.  France's stock exchange watchdog body, completing a six-month investigation into trading of Societe Generale shares last year, said it has found evidence of possible insider trading by four unidentified buyers.  The Commission des Operations de Bourse, which has no powers to prosecute offenders itself, said yesterday that it transmitted the findings of its investigation to judicial authorities.  The probe, which comes just as France is about to increase the commission's powers to deal with increasingly frequent allegations of insider trading here, covered all transactions in Societe Generale shares between June and December 1988 -- a period including the runup in the share price and the launch of an aborted raid on the bank by financier Georges Pebereau.  That raid caused considerable controversy here both because of persistent allegations of insider trading and because the move had the blessing of France's Socialist government.  The government intervention was part of the Socialists' plan to remodel the shareholding structure of French concerns sold to the public by the former conservative government.  Although Mr. Pebereau acquired a 10.36% stake in the bank, becoming its dominant shareholder, he was denied any management role and ultimately sold off his stake after a four-month stand-off.  Sony Corp., expanding further in Europe, plans a new magnetic tape factory and is considering opening a semiconductor plant, a Sony official said.  Jack Schmuckli, chairman of Sony's European operations, said the new factories would help boost the European-made content of Sony electronics products sold in Europe.  Currently, he said, roughly 40% of the goods' value is produced in Europe.  By 1992, the Japanese company aims to boost that proportion to at least 50%, he said.  The planned factory investments are part of Sony's three-year-old push to expand its European electronics operations.  With a strong yen and mounting protectionism in Europe, several Japanese companies are moving to cut their imports to Europe and build local factories.  Such Sony rivals as Fujitsu Ltd. and Toshiba Corp. recently announced they're also considering opening their first full-scale semiconductor factories.  The Sony executive, confirming a report in London's Financial Times yesterday, said the company will soon pick the site for its first magnetic tape-coating factory in Europe.  Currently, Sony imports the tape from Japan for assembly at three European sites.  He said the company will decide soon whether to go ahead with plans for full-scale chip production.  He added that Sony plans three small product-development centers in Europe.  In the year ending next March 31, Mr. Schmuckli said, Sony expects its European electronics sales to exceed $3 billion.  It plans to spend roughly $100 million annually in coming years on its European expansion, he added.  Spain's stock markets implemented the most sweeping changes in their 158-year-old history in a reform known as "El Big Bang."  The changes are designed to broaden the Spanish markets' trading base, tighten disclosure controls to eliminate insider trading and bring the exchanges in line with others in Europe.  A June 1988 law, which took effect Saturday, converted Spain's four exchanges -- in Madrid, Barcelona, Bilbao and Valencia -- into private entities owned and managed by newly created brokerages and broker-dealer companies.  It eliminated the monopoly of civil-servant stockbrokers on trading rights and eventually is to integrate the exchanges in a single, computerized trading system.  The old system, where prices are fixed in two daily open-outcry sessions on the exchange floors, is to exist side by side with continuous computerized trading until all shares switch over.  Yesterday, share prices rose in Madrid, Barcelona and Valencia on light volume.  The Bilbao exchange was closed because of a local holiday.  The prospect of high-definition television conjures up images of giant corporations, billions of dollars and global battles.  But the nascent HDTV industry consists of little companies as well as big ones.  Unlike Sony Corp., Hitachi Ltd. and the other major players moving into the field of super-clear video, these small companies are mostly in the U.S.  And more important, unlike the Japanese giants, the small, specialty companies are betting everything on a single technology previously untested in the marketplace.  "The major risk is that if you've hung your career and reputation on an idea that sinks, you may sink with it," says David Niles, the president of Eleven Twenty Five Productions Inc., a New York pioneer in high-definition programming.  At least three other companies also have jumped into the HDTV business as niche players.  Rebo Studio, based in Manhattan, is typical.  The company has invested more than $4 million in HDTV production gear, says Barry Rebo, president.  With 40 employees and about $3.5 million in annual revenue, Rebo produces HDTV programming and is developing a line of specialty equipment for HDTV production.  Other entrants include Zbig Vision Ltd. of New York, and Powder Moon Productions in Provo, Utah.  These little entrants are a reminder -- a disturbing reminder, perhaps -- that large U.S. companies have been slow to take up the potential HDTV challenge posed by Japanese electronics firms.  Moreover, the smaller firms are welcomed by the Japanese players, because several of them are working on programming, or so-called software, which nicely complements the television sets and studio hardware that the large producers are focusing on.  As such, the smaller companies offer a look at the symbiotic relationship between big companies and start-ups that often characterizes the early stages of development in a new technology.  "These companies have taken significant risks in order to become front-runners," says Jeff Cohen, the product manager for high-definition video systems at Sony Corp. of America, a unit of Tokyo-based Sony.  These pioneers, Mr. Cohen says, are valuable Sony customers not only because they buy its production equipment, but also because they promise to be effective "ambassadors" in introducing the technology to others.  The potential rewards for such ambassadors are huge: big reputations, rapid sales growth and the chance to make a mark in business history.  High-definition television, an infant industry today, could become a major source of consumer entertainment, industry growth and jobs in the 1990s, with revenue from such things as TV sets and video production equipment totaling as much as $20 billion a year by the turn of the century.  But the risks are also great when a small company stakes its future on costly new technology.  If a company chooses the wrong technology, its money will be wasted.  Even if it picks the right technology, timing is crucial: Early entrants may still be struggling to pay for their equipment when much better models hit the market, giving later competitors an edge.  "We may end up as the pioneers with the arrows in their backs," quips Denis Bieber, Rebo's chief executive officer.  Eleven Twenty Five says its HDTV business moved into the black recently, after a two-year start-up.  But because of the high cost of entry to HDTV, Rebo -- which turned to the technology in 1986 -- is still in the red and says it expects to stay there at least two more years.  The technology is developing so fast that much of Rebo's HDTV equipment, which it had initially planned on amortizing over five years, grew obsolete in less than two years.  Now Rebo must lay out money for a newer, even costlier generation of equipment.  "We don't regard this as losing money," says Mr. Bieber, who owns the company along with Mr. Rebo and Tomio Taki, a Japanese investor.  "We regard it as investing in the future."  So-called high-definition TV sets -- with a screen shape and picture quality akin to movies -- are still far from the consumer market in this country; industry predictions place their arrival anywhere from three to 10 years in the future.  By investing heavily in the new technology now, Eleven Twenty Five and Rebo aim in the short term to win production contracts -- for making movies, music videos, TV shows and commercials -- that might otherwise go to companies still wed to older technologies.  The two companies also are building libraries of their own HDTV programming.  They hope to be sitting on a trove of such programming when HDTV sets finally reach consumers' homes.  Rebo, which was founded in 1975, "has always been involved in the newest video technologies," Mr. Rebo says.  "You have the greatest competitive advantage if you move in first and move in quickly."  At Eleven Twenty Five, Mr. Niles says he has risked his future on new technology several times.  In 1977, for example, he embraced a tape format not widely adopted until about four years later.  He was also a pioneer in special-effects equipment and computer graphics.  With an initial 1985 investment of $900,000 that has since grown to more than $4 million, HDTV is his biggest gamble, he says.  A payoff is beginning to materialize, the companies say.  With limited success, they have persuaded Madison Avenue and other clients to produce HDTV programming now, even though consumers wouldn't benefit yet.  The advantage in picture quality is lost when high-definition programming is "down-converted" for showing on ordinary TV sets.  The plus side is that these HDTV tapes wouldn't become obsolete when consumers switch to high-definition sets.  Meanwhile, with HDTV, shooting costs are reduced at least 15% to 20% compared with film -- more if there are a lot of special effects, for which HDTV is especially useful.  In one Rebo demonstration tape, the sexy woman on the video monitor appears to be dancing through a spacious art gallery with paintings nearly as big as she is.  In fact, she was standing on a 15-square-foot mat inside a studio.  The "gallery" consisted of postcard-size pictures tacked onto cardboard.  To hold down their risk and keep income flowing, both Rebo and Mr. Niles have continued to operate facilities for conventional TV programming.  Mr. Niles says he will sell his conventional facilities, based in Paris, this year, with proceeds to be invested in HDTV operations.  Rebo's high-definition work began with music videos, such as one for the rock group Cameo's song "Candy."  More recently, Rebo's "Performance Pieces," a 10-minute comedy short, won an award for best fiction short at this year's Cannes International Film Festival in France.  To find new applications for its HDTV technology, Rebo is working dozens of angles -- trying, for instance, to persuade museums to record their collections on high-definition tape for insurance and other purposes.  Increasingly, Rebo is also focusing on HDTV-related hardware as well as programming.  It is taking various manufacturers' equipment, such as Apple computers, and customizing systems of its own.  At the National Association of Broadcasters show in Las Vegas, Nev., in April, Rebo showed off four innovative products: a camera-control system, an optical transmission system, a computer-based "framestore," for isolating single frames of programming, and a down-converter for changing high-definition computer graphics into conventional TV format.  Rebo has begun to sell some of these.  As Rebo sees it, these smaller companies are getting in on the ground floor of what will be a gigantic industry.  Rebo's picture of the future is much wider, after all, than just the wider TV sets.  Rebo also foresees, for example, high-definition picture telephones and high-definition computer peripherals.  In the absence of short-term profits, Rebo for now is settling for recognition.  In beating others to the trade show with such products, Mr. Rebo says, the company "showed up a lot of much bigger American companies.  We even showed up some bigger Japanese companies."  A wide, clear and bright future, he reasons, is sure to follow.  They say that cool thoughts are helpful when it's hot, so sitting atop a low hill in the Hoosier metropolis on Sunday afternoon, with the temperature around 85 in hazy sunshine and humidity to match, I thought a few.  Instead of Indianapolis, I imagined myself in the Alps, buddying around with guys named Jens and Jochen.  There was snow to the right of me and snow to the left.  The air was crisp; pine trees edged the slopes.  Soon I was rolling down the hill, and the breeze felt good.  But -- hey] -- there came a pylon on my right.  Instinct told me to lean away, but that just steered me toward it.  I leaned right and swerved away just in time.  From behind, somebody was hollering for me to get my head back.  That was the last thing I wanted to do.  If something was gonna get me, I wanted to see it coming.  I passed the next pylon all righty, but picked up speed and couldn't avoid a third.  Splat]  In a flash I was across the finish line, but heading for the metal side rail.  I sat up as instructed, dug my heels into the now-sand-covered asphalt, and pulled on the runners of my sled.  The effort cost me a month's wear on my sneakers, but I managed to stop.  I didn't exactly conquer -- onlookers had a fair laugh at my expense -- but I survived.  Sometimes you win, sometimes you luge.  As one who is both squeamish and a patriot, I am pleased to report that most of the dozen youngsters, aged 12 to 18, who tried that same exercise here Sunday fared far better than I, and that the most serious injury anyone sustained was a skinned elbow.  The occasion was open tryouts for the U.S. junior national luge team, from which our future Olympians will come.  Luge, of course, is a winter activity, requiring contestants to negotiate at breakneck speed an ice-covered, steeply banked track while lying supine on a brakeless metal sled (luge means sled in French).  It is best performed in the cold.  But since we, as in U.S., are desirous of someday winning a medal in the sport, and most of our population resides in non-frosty climes, the U.S. Luge Association has fashioned a wheeled sled suitable for use on inclined roadways, and has taken its tryouts on the road to six cities this summer.  Indianapolis was stop No. 4, preceded by Austin, Texas, Atlanta and Minneapolis, and scheduled to be followed by Salt Lake City on Aug. 12 and 13 and Los Angeles on Aug. 19 and 20.  The association figures that, all told, about 300 kids, none of whom will have luged before, will turn out, and that about 60 will be invited to pay their own way to a one-week camp in November in Calgary, up in Canada.  From that group, 20 or so will compete in the junior national meet in February at Lake Placid, N.Y., site of the only Olympic luge track on American soil, and, maybe, three or four will be picked for the subsidized U.S. junior team, to be groomed for the big time.  If that process seems hurried, it is.  The East Germans identify likely lugers at age six or seven, strap 'em in sleds, stuff them with steroids and don't let them go until they win Olympic medals as adults.  I'm told that's how they've won 15 of the 21 golds awarded in the sport since it went Olympic in 1964.  The U.S. has never won a luge O-medal.  We are, however, getting better at it, and with athletes identified in ways similar to the Indianapolis tryout.  Steve Maher, an instructor here Sunday, is a 26-year-old ex-University of Illinois gymnast who, while working in marketing for a California firm in 1986, heard a luge trial mentioned on a radio program.  He showed up, learned the sport, and, with partner Joe Barile, won the national doubles title in 1988, earned a 16th in that year's Olympics and a ninth in the 1989 world championships.  Bonny Warner, a Californian whose sixth-place finish in the women's singles at Calgary was the best ever by an American, first saw luging at age 17 as a torchbearer at the 1980 Winter Games in Lake Placid.  Her victory in a 1987 World Cup event was the first international gold medal for the U.S.  Lin Hancock, the U.S. junior team coach, was teaching physical education in Glen Falls, N.Y., when he saw luge on television in the 1980 Olympics.  He was so smitten he chucked his job to move to Lake Placid and bang on the luge run's door until its operators let him in.  He became an alternate on the 1984 U.S. team at the advanced age of 29, then turned to coaching.  Hancock notes that the U.S. is at a disadvantage to the Alpine countries because almost no American slides {that's another name for luging} for recreation, and because of the dearth of facilities.  But he opines that the Olympic track Salt Lake City is building as part of its bid to host the 1998 Winter Games should help, as should the enlistment of Minneapolis-based 3M (Minnesota Mining & Mfg.  Co.) as the national team's corporate angel. 3M is underwriting the current tryout circuit, and passing out T-shirts as well.  "We're getting some good athletes who can do enough arithmetic to calculate that luge is a good way to get to the Games," Hancock says.  "You figure it.  There are, maybe, 600 lugers in the country, and a dozen make the Olympic team.  Compare that to any other sport, and you'll see what I mean."  The kids who turned out at Wilbur Shaw Memorial Hill here, where they hold the local soap-box derby, got eight or 10 trial runs each on wheeled sleds that hit a nifty 25 mph or so, and a battery of tests, including situps, pushups and a standing long jump, to gauge their strength and athletic talent.  Other aptitudes also were plumbed, and some of the group obviously got the right answers.  "I like cold weather better than warm, even if that makes me weird," said Jim Pearce, a lanky, 17-year-old high school trackman.  "I like anything that goes fast, and this was great]" exclaimed Cathy Robertson, a 17-year-old from Martinsville, Ind., "This was the best thing I've done since skateboarding.  I loved it when I wiped out on a skateboard.  I'll bet I'll love wiping out on a sled."  Orders for gas-turbine generators surged 80% in the first seven months of 1989, reflecting a response to growing concern about possible power shortages in the 1990s.  UBS Securities Inc., a unit of Union Bank of Switzerland, reported that 70 turbines, capable of generating 5,294 megawatts of electricity, were ordered by utilities and other builders between January and July, compared with 39 units or 1,920 megawatts in the first seven months of 1988.  One megawatt equals 1,000 kilowatts, enough to meet the power needs of 400 utility customers.  Indeed, more megawatts of power have been ordered so far this year than in all of 1988, when 115 plants or 4,353 megawatts were contracted for, UBS said.  The actual number of units ordered in the first seven months of 1989 probably exceeded 70, UBS added, explaining that many small units don't get incorporated into the statistics until year end.  "Utilities need capacity and they need it fast," said Robert McCoy, a UBS managing director, explaining that until recently utilities were putting off ordering plants because of concern that state-utility regulators wouldn't permit them to recover the plants' cost from customers.  "Now they've come up to the ragged edge," Mr. McCoy said.  He added that utilities are primarily ordering gas turbines because they cost less, take only two years to build and are less environmentally harmful than coal-fired plants.  The biggest beneficiary of the current building surge has been General Electric Co., which has about 58% of the U.S.'s and 27% of the world's turbine-building capacity.  In reporting first-half earnings two weeks ago, GE chairman John F. Welch Jr. said "the long-awaited resurgence in power generation" had finally materialized.  This resurgence, Mr. Welch said, not only contributed to GE's "excellent" first-half results -- profit was up 17% -- but also has helped position the company for future growth.  A GE spokesman added that GE now has turbine orders totaling about $2.4 billion, about 25% of that from U.S. customers.  Mr. McCoy of UBS said GE's U.S. gasturbine orders in the first seven months of the year totaled 3,299 megawatts, or 62% of total demand.  Swiss-based Asea Brown Boveri was second, with orders for 1,162 megawatts, or 22%.  Westinghouse Electric Corp. was third with 441 megawatts or 8%.  As strong as this year's surge has been, it pales compared with the order spike that some analysts are predicting for the early 1990s.  Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc., for example, recently forecast that the combination of a vibrant economy and pent-up demand could cause an order spike of more than 70,000 megawatts in 1991, more than 30% of that being combustion turbines, most of which run on natural gas.  The emphasis on gas turbines, however, is bad news for consumers, argues Marie Corio, president of New York-based Applied Economic Research Co., a power-supply forecasting firm that has predicted significant power shortages in parts of the U.S. as early as 1992.  Ms. Corio says that fuel costs for gas-fired plants are roughly double those for coal plants, which means Americans can expect higher electric bills over the next five to 10 years.  User Unfriendly?  Word processors perform  Every literary chore,  Even checking spelling,  Which used to be a bore.  They correct poor grammar  And eliminate cliches,  Compressing excess wordage  In truly wondrous ways.  For perfectionists like me  They've been heaven sent --  Except that what emerges  Isn't always what I meant.  -- Henry F. Hill.  ---  Professional Pleasure?  The pros play football, baseball, tennis --  But one cannot help saying  The way they labor at these games,  They certainly aren't "playing."  -- G. Sterling Leiby.  Even after a $250 million gain on the sale of its East Coast shuttle, Texas Air Corp. posted a loss of $109.3 million for the second quarter, the legacy of a bitter strike at its Eastern Airlines unit.  Continental Airlines, another Texas Air unit, posted a modest profit for the period.  But the earnings weren't nearly enough to offset the cost of the strike and subsequent bankruptcy-law filing at Eastern, which has been operating under Chapter 11 protection since March 9, five days after the strike began.  Texas Air's loss, narrower than its $255.9 million loss in the 1988 second quarter, included the gain on the shuttle's sale in June to developer Donald Trump.  The latest deficit came as the company's rivals continued the airline industry's succession of record-setting quarters begun last year.  Indeed, several carriers said their traffic surged because of the Eastern strike.  Second-quarter revenue plunged 34% to $1.4 billion from a restated $2.13 billion.  Analysts were encouraged by Continental's results.  "I expected Continental's results to be weaker," said Tom Longman, an airline analyst with Bear, Stearns & Co.  "I was pleasantly surprised they were so strong."  Continental reported net income of $32.1 million on revenue of $1.3 billion.  In the year-ago quarter, Continental had a loss of $150.9 million on revenue of $1.1 billion.  Continental's chairman, D. Joseph Corr, predicted "we will make further progress during the second half of the year."  Eastern's loss was $129.3 million, including the shuttle gain, $17.2 million in bankruptcy court costs and a $65.7 million pension curtailment charge.  The pension charge is an assessment of what the cost would be if its striking or furloughed employees take early retirement, a spokesman said.  Required under accounting procedures, it doesn't reflect an actual cash outlay, the spokesman said.  In the year-ago quarter, Eastern had a loss of $89.8 million.  Because of the strike, Eastern's revenue dried up to $89.6 million, compared with year-ago revenue of $1 billion.  Eastern seemed to lose money at about the same rate as before the strike and the bankruptcy filing, Mr. Longman said, and it needs to continue to sell assets quickly.  Under a plan presented to its creditors, Eastern plans to sell $1.8 billion in assets and gradually start up service in many of the markets it served before it was grounded by the machinists strike.  Last month, Eastern flew 226 flights a day, and beginning today is expected to increase that number to 350 daily flights, mostly into and out of its Atlanta hub.  The carrier has had to charter five jets from Continental to fly its August schedule.  Eastern says that is a temporary measure as newly hired pilots make their way through the airline's training program.  For the six months, the loss narrowed to $364.9 million from $380.1 million.  Revenue fell 23% to $3.28 billion from a restated $4.26 billion.  Cross & Trecker Corp. said it will undertake a major restructuring of its operations, and it reported a wider third-quarter loss that included $25 million in one-time charges.  The tool maker, based in Bloomfield Hills, Mich., said it will sell three units, consolidate two of its other businesses and sell its stake in a joint venture operation, Murata Warner Swasey.  In connection with the restructuring, the company said it plans to file a registration statement with the Securities and Exchange Commission for the sale of about $50 million in convertible preferred stock.  Cross & Trecker announced the restructuring at the same time it reported a $32.5 million loss for the quarter ended June 30.  That loss included a one-time provision for restructuring costs of $21.3 million, as well as other one-time charges totaling about $3.7 million, the company said.  In the year-earlier quarter, Cross & Trecker had a loss of $4.2 million.  Revenue in the latest quarter rose 3.3% to $118.5 million from $114.7 million.  Cross & Trecker stock closed yesterday at $11.625, down 50 cents, in national over-the-counter trading.  In a statement yesterday, Cross & Trecker's vice chairman and chief executive officer, Norman J. Ryker, said the company's continuing losses led management to "accelerate" a restructuring plan.  The company said it plans to sell its Wiedemann, Roberts Corp. and Alliance Automation units, which make a variety of factory tools and equipment.  Through the three quarters ended June 30, these units had a total operating loss of $11.6 million on combined revenue of $64 million, the company said.  In the year-earlier nine months, the three units had losses of $8 million on revenue of $60.5 million.  In addition, Cross & Trecker said it will consolidate many operations of its Kearney & Trecker Corp. and Warner & Swasey units, which make machine tools.  A company spokesman said it isn't clear yet how many of the two units' 1,340 jobs will survive the reorganization.  The businesses Cross & Trecker will keep had combined operating losses of $26.1 million, including one-time charges of $16.5 million, during the latest nine months, compared with operating losses of $8.4 million in the year earlier.  These units had revenue in the latest nine months of $287 million, compared with $259.1 million in the same period a year earlier.  SOFTWARE TOOLWORKS Inc., Chatsworth, Calif., said it plans to file for an offering of about two million common shares.  The software producer, which currently has 6.8 million common shares outstanding, said it expects to file with the Securities and Exchange Commission by the middle of this month and to begin the offering in September.  Of the two million shares, 1.5 million will be offered by the company and the rest by shareholders.  Montgomery Securities will be the underwriter, a company spokesman said.  Separately, the company's net income for the first quarter ended June 30 soared to $849,000, or 13 cents a share, from $231,000, or four cents a share, a year ago.  Revenue rose to $4.2 million from $1.3 million.  The earnings exceeded the per-share net of 11 cents and revenue of $3.4 million analysts were projecting.  With regard to Nicholas F. Brady's July 11 editorial-page article on the savings-and-loan bailout legislation ("No Time to Waive Gramm-Rudman"), possibly the most important argument for an off-budget mechanism is that it isolates all the costs.  Whether Congress would agree with this or not, it gives the global markets a sense that all the hours and years it took to come up with the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings legislation were not in vain (e.g. there is a genuine desire to be fiscally responsible).  This perception is worth a lot more than the 25 basis points that it would cost with the off-budget proposal.  If the financial markets sense that Congress might be shifting its commitment to G-R-H, the overall cost of financing the existing debt burden would surge.  Fiscal responsibility implies a long-term time frame, not merely one or two years.  We constantly are being accused of not planning or thinking for the long term.  If Congress were to repeal the spirit of G-R-H, it would send a message to the skeptics that their view of our long-term commitments was right.  Indeed, that is the alternative plan that so far has shaped up in Congress.  The House plan would put the $50 billion to be raised for the thrifts under the Treasury umbrella of debt financing and the thrifts' contribution would be held in escrow by the government.  The funds that the thrifts would contribute would not be locked in and, therefore, there is the possibility that these funds could be reclaimed by the S&L industry for its own use in the future.  While it would seem at first sight that this alternative would cost less money because the Treasury's access cost to funds would be cheaper, the point to remember is that in order to do it this way, Congress would have to pass a waiver to the G-R-H.  It would seem that all you have to do is start with one waiver and before you know it, a few more could come along, and we would be back to square one with no limits on what deficit we end up with in 1993 (when we are supposed to have a zero deficit).  A shifting away from fiscal restraint would be the worst medicine for the economy, which may in turn not provide the necessary cure for the ailing thrifts as we enter the 1990s.  Maria Fiorini Ramirez  Money-Market Economist  Drexel Burnham Lambert  New York  Mark S. Nadel's Manager's Journal, "More Power to the Stockholders" (editorial page, June 26), correctly identifies a significant problem with corporate governance in this country: Directors of large public corporations often feel their loyalty is to management, not to the shareholders who own the company.  Directors are often biased in favor of management when the interests of management and shareholders conflict, particularly when a corporation is subject to a possible takeover attempt.  Shareholders are unable to ensure that their interests are represented properly because directors are not held directly accountable.  Mr. Nadel suggests that the way to increase accountability is to adopt the European model of corporate directorships.  We believe we can achieve the same results through some simple reforms of corporate democracy.  A bill we recently introduced in the Senate would give shareholders who own significant blocks of shares the opportunity to include their own views and proposals, including the right to offer their own nominees for directors on the corporate board, along with the regular proxy materials.  Our bill also would guarantee the confidentiality of the proxy voting process by requiring corporations to employ an independent third party to issue the proxy materials, tally and report the results.  We believe the American system of corporate democracy is fundamentally sound but that it needs reform.  The changes we have proposed will strengthen the process by placing control of America's corporations where it belongs, with the shareholders, the true owners.  Sen. Howard M. Metzenbaum (D., Ohio)  Sen. William L. Armstrong (R., Colo.)  Washington  This gardener couldn't help but track the art stock market beginning in 1987, when impressionist flowers started selling at auction for mind-wilting prices.  Then in May of this year, after I'd posted my final spring plant bids, mail order, some "Asters" (Monet's) sold for $9.4 million at Christie's and "Young Girl Wearing a Hat With Wildflowers" (Renoir's) moved for $13.8 million at Sotheby's.  And while a nonfloral self-portrait, "Yo Picasso," went for $47.9 million at the same sale as "Wildflowers," Picasso didn't come close to some very common "Irises" (Van Gogh's) that had been disposed of for $53.9 million in 1987 by the same house, and that remain the most expensive irises and painting in the world.  All this hothouse bidding drove John Russell to rail in the New York Times that "in the month of May 1989" the New York auction rooms "doubled as gambling room, vanity parade and surrogate stock market, with overtones of bullring, prize ring, cockfight, dogfight and man fight. . . .  every last instinct of greed and cupidity and ostentation was let loose."  Mr. Russell just goes to the wrong auctions.  I would like to recommend to him and you a decidedly kinder, genteeler sale, viz., the Rare Plant Auction of the Wilmington Garden Center, whose ninth running I attended about the time Mr. Russell was exposing his tender self to the brutalities of the ChristoSoth cockpits.  The Wilmington auction took place decorously under glass in the conservatories of Longwood Gardens, Pierre Samuel du Pont's former country retreat.  Neither Donald Trump nor Leona Helmsley nor Boone Pickens was among the 400 plant lovers intent on peaceful takeovers of the more than 300 lots.  Certainly, there were no straws, no anonymous bidders calling in from Yokohama.  The closest this sale got to the secrecy of the ChristoSoth universe was a silent auction, which was carried on through written bids, but buyers used their own names and wrote them themselves, without assistance or gold pens.  During the live auction, they showed their own hands and faces.  And the RPA proceeds, instead of re-enriching the rich, go for inner-city greenworks administered by the non-profit Wilmington Garden Center: the Greening of Wilmington Plantmobile, which assists with community gardens, tree plantings and neighborhood gardening and conservation education.  The "Irises" of this auction was a "Clivia miniata" "Yellow Form," donated by Macrae Parker Jr., a New York businessman, famous as the RPA's big bidder.  Whispering during the silent auction, I asked him about clivia (which I rhymed with trivia).  "Clive-ia," he tut-tutted genially.  "I've had them all my life, but I'd always had orange clive-ia.  In Connecticut I had 25 tubs.  After I'd seen a yellow cliveia at the Philadelphia Flower Show, I decided I never wanted to leave this watery planet without a yellow clive-ia."  A fellow plantsman, Richard Both ("I was vice president of explosives at Hercules") broke in: "This man Parker came out of the blue to our first auction eight years ago.  He wanted yellow clive-ia, started at $300 and ended at $1,200]"  Mr. Parker chimed in: "I met Ruth du Pont there.  Her mother and I were bidding on the same yellow clive-ia.  I asked Ruth du Pont, 'Do you think I can buy that clive-ia for $500?' And she said, 'There are men in Wilmington who'd trade their wives for that plant]' The yellow clive-ia is the best investment I've ever made] When I went to collect it there was a note attached from the donor, Sir John Thouron {of Scotland and Pennsylvania}: 'Please do not attempt to divide this for several years]'"  Sir John had gone to Belgium for his yellow C., which spawned all the others in the U.S., not to mention the Rare Plant Auction itself.  Mr. Parker waited six years before quartering his yellow, and two more before giving one of the scions to the RPA.  This well-begot clivia spent the evening under a spotlight and sold for $600 to a two-couple clivia consortium.  Almost anyone could see why these four were willing to pool assets in this way, even at risk of intertwining their lives rather closely at bloom time.  But why would anyone want to take pen in hand for a pachysandra, that plebe among ground covers, in a sale of rarities?  To ward off such dubiety, the RPA catalog began contritely, "pachysandra is often scorned for being too plain and too common" (Leona Helmsley once added 10,000 of the common sort to her queenly Connecticut estate), but "P. terminalis" "Green Sheen," it asserted, was "this sensational cultivar."  Dale Chapman, nurseryman, had donated it.  He is a quondam chemical engineer whose Hampton, Conn., company's motto is "EUONYMUS WE GOTIMUS]" "I've been in ground covers 21 years," he began his "Green Sheen" peroration.  "It's the shiniest pachysandra I or anyone has ever seen.  It was just a sport I happened to discover in 1978.  I really believe in this pachysandra.  I'm a man of faith in God.  I really feel that pachysandra 'Green Sheen' is a gift that God has given me."  Mr. Chapman's verdant manna sold to William Ross McLaughlin for $65.  If anyone still needed convincing about the rareness of "Green Sheen," Robert Herald, chairman of the Wilmington Garden Center's (Rare) Plant Selection Committee, was on hand to say: "That pachysandra is a new cultivar and a dramatic improvement.  But some people don't like pachysandra and so they consider it not an improvement.  Whoever bought that pachysandra will be one of the very few people in Delaware to have it."  This was no hollow chauvinism, Mr. Herald explained, because Delaware is "a very special, horticulturally rich area.  There are some very discriminating gardeners in this crowd," people whose cutting-edge taste ensures that "the auction definitely follows gardening trends.  Hostas, day lilies, grasses -- they're trendy plants now.  They're in vogue.  We put together a wish list of all the donors and we try to offer the most current cultivars."  Among the au courant plants: Hostas "Great Expectations," and "Pizzazz"; day lilies "Heavenly Guide," "Techny Peace" and "Satchmo"; a Once Upon A Windowsill, Aspidistra.  Dilatush Nursery had sent a "Cedrela sinensis".  There was an Ogeechee-lime from the North Carolina State University Arboretum.  Other mouth-filling rarities included: Vaccinium crassifolium", "Viburnum bitchiuense", "Sycoparrotia semidecandra", and the "Miscanthus sinensis" "Malepartus" of Mrs. J. Pancoast Reath.  Mrs. Lammot du Pont Copeland's False Goldenrod went to David Baker for $17.  The Korean Goatsbeard from Waterloo Gardens went to Mr. and Mrs. Eleuthere I. du Pont for a $23 song. (The same du Ponts landed the "Heptacodium jasminoides" "Seven-son Flower" from Harvard for $53.) A post-Monet dwarf water-lily "Nymphaea pygmea" "Helvola" joined the private collection of Mr. and Mrs. Curtis R. Bollar for $35.  The Classical Cherub Garden Sculpture and the "winsome pig made of cast cement," $275 and $150 respectively, went to Dr. and Mrs. John Noseworthy.  Mrs. William McCabe was thrilled to buy an illusion for $350 -- a Trompe l'Oeil Garden Trellis.  Mrs. Joanna Reed's Stinking Hellebore joined John J. Feliciani for $31.  Mr. Lynn Kippax was overheard saying: "I got my first double hernia for $180 -- that Knot Garden." (Trough With Knot Garden of Boxwoods.) When the False Climbing Hydrangea ("Schizophragma hydrangeoides") sold for $475 at live auction, Amanda Gehret remarked, "I bought a climbing hydrangea four years ago and it's done absolutely nothing but crawl.  But some people go on the theory that the more you spend for it, the better it'll grow."  The Rare Plant Auction made $29,000 for the Wilmington Garden Center without greed, cupidity or ostentation surfacing even once and provoked not a single snarl from the flower-art auction prize rings in New York.  The turmoil at Cooper Cos. is proving difficult to bring to an end.  A year ago, dissident shareholders won control of Cooper's board and promptly gave the heave-ho to Parker G. Montgomery.  The chairman and chief executive officer's convoluted corporate strategy, they felt, was responsible for the stock's long decline.  Since the new team took power, the company's stock has tumbled 70%.  The health-care products maker is now virtually a shell company.  Its market capitalization has fallen from $650 million to less than $60 million.  And there are allegations that the only people to have benefited from the ouster are the dissidents themselves.  Now, a different group of unhappy shareholders has emerged.  The new group alleges that mismanagement of a company divestiture program and overly generous salary and bonus payments have nearly wiped out what little was left of Cooper's common shareholders' equity.  Adding a twist to the tale, two of the original dissident directors recently were squeezed off the board and may throw their substantial votes to the new dissidents.  The challengers have filed suit to block Cooper's annual shareholder meeting, which is scheduled to take place on Wednesday in New York.  They allege that management's proxy fails to disclose the company's "startling financial deterioration."  Cooper's current management says it is just playing out a bad hand it inherited from Mr. Montgomery, whose nonstop deal-making had Cooper making everything from dental floss to medical lasers.  Management claims Mr. Montgomery committed "numerous acts of corporate waste" and mismanagement, and says the continuing free-fall in the price of Cooper stock can be attributed directly to an "overburdened" debt position that Mr. Montgomery left behind.  Mr. Montgomery denies such charges and suggests his successors have been the profligate ones.  "They may be the highest paid board of directors in the world," he says.  The new dissident group has nominated a slate that includes several people with links to Mr. Montgomery, and the proxy fight is being bankrolled by two former sister companies of Cooper that are headed by Mr. Montgomery.  But Moses Marx, a New York broker and substantial Cooper shareholder who is backing the latest overthrow attempt, says the deposed executive "will not and does not have any say whatsoever about what would happen if the committee takes over the company."  Mr. Montgomery says he isn't seeking to regain control.  Some analysts say he is really angling for a better deal for holders of Cooper preferred shares, the principal assets of the two companies Mr. Montgomery heads.  Current management hasn't registered the preferred or paid dividends on it.  Cooper's appeal is difficult to divine: in the latest six fiscal periods, it reported a total net loss of $245.4 million.  Its operating assets have been sold off almost completely.  Management intends to make as yet undetermined acquisitions using some $185 million in proceeds from asset sales.  The price of Cooper stock has fallen precipitously from a 1986 high of $28.50 to less than $3 a share.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, the shares closed at $2.375, down 25 cents.  For most of the last year, Cooper has been in the hands of two sets of brothers: Bruce, Wayne and Howard Sturman, Mount Vernon, N.Y., real-estate developers, and Gary, Steven and Brad Singer, involved in construction in New York.  Together, the Sturmans and Singers, all of whom are less than 40 years old, own about 15% of Cooper's stock, and have controlled six of nine board seats.  Their original plan was to "take immediate steps to sell extraneous assets and otherwise drastically reduce nonessential corporate overhead expenses."  Over the last year, the new team has sold most of Cooper's remaining assets, including its diagnostic unit to Miles Inc.  That sale has drawn the wrath of the dissidents, who claim management gave unduly generous inducements to bondholders to obtain their approval of the transaction.  The dissidents also question the company's new attention to bottom-line basics.  The Sturmans and the Singers each named one family member to jointly serve as co-chairmen of the board at an annual salary of $300,000 apiece.  The company's recently hired chief executive officer and president will be paid $500,000 this year, not counting his $200,000 relocation bonus and a guaranteed annual bonus of "not less than $250,000."  And, after having to disgorge more than $10 million in severance to Mr. Montgomery and two of his lieutenants, the new team arranged its own set of golden parachutes worth three years' pay.  In addition, the Sturmans and the Singers have reaped big profits from what Cooper calls its Divestiture Incentive Program, a controversial corporate kitty from which bonus payments are allocated to certain employees at various steps in the company's asset sell-off.  Each of the Sturman brothers gets 12% of any payment.  So does co-chairman Gary Singer, and director Steven Singer.  Brad Singer, who doesn't work for the company full-time, doesn't get a cut, but the Singers' father, Martin -- who until recently was pulling down a $200,000 annual salary as a "full-time senior consultant" to the company -- gets 12%.  Other employees get smaller pieces.  To date, the DIP has yielded a total of $2.4 million, but an additional $4 million is expected for a recently completed sale and a planned minor divestiture.  If those figures hold, the 12% participants will each have garnered a total of $768,000 from bonuses.  Gary Singer defends the rewards as commensurate with the long hours the families have put in to expedite the unit sales.  But family ties seem to be wearing thin.  Howard and Wayne Sturman, as well as another director, won't be standing for re-election because they refused to sign a "loyalty oath" that requires directors to vote their personal shareholdings for management nominees.  Bruce Sturman signed the oath.  Yesterday, Cooper said it "terminated for cause" the employment of Howard Sturman as co-chairman, and Wayne Sturman as "senior consultant." (None of the Sturmans could be reached for comment.)  And there are others whose allegiances are shifting.  The company's principal spokesman, who in the current fiscal year pocketed $160,000 in bonuses, recently resigned, declaring: "I cannot in good conscience support present management's position."  The New York Stock Exchange censured Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. and fined it $50,000 for allegedly failing to respond on time to requests for records and information in the months after the October 1987 market crash.  The Big Board action, which Shearson settled without admitting or denying wrongdoing, was one of 37 disciplinary actions announced by the exchange's enforcement division yesterday.  Eight firms and 29 individuals were cited for alleged violations of Big Board rules and federal securities laws.  In the Shearson matter, the Big Board found that the firm, 62%-owned by American Express Co., "failed to comply in a timely manner with 22 requests" for records from November 1987 to October 1988.  This was a time when the firm had received hundreds of document requests from the exchange.  Because of its slow paper work, the exchange said, Shearson "imposed an administrative burden on the resources of the NYSE and may have prolonged certain investigations."  Shearson blames the records problem on the takeover of E.F. Hutton Group Inc. just after the crash, as well as on the large number of inquiries from regulatory agencies investigating the crash.  "We had a system in place for handling one firm, and then all of a sudden we're combined with a firm of comparable size," said a Shearson spokesman.  Nevertheless, he said Shearson has formed a new regulatory unit in its law department, dedicated solely to handle regulatory inquiries.  It also has instituted "additional training" for employees charged with responding to Big Board requests.  In other cases, Big Board hearing panels censured and fined the following seven firms for federal securities-laws violations and exchange rules: Baker, Watts & Co.; BHF Securities Corp.; Anthony T. DeCarlo Securities Inc.; Laidlaw Adams & Peck Inc.; Laidlaw Ansbacher Inc.; McLeod Young Weir Inc.; and Oppenheimer & Co. Baker Watts in Baltimore, currently named Ferris, Baker Watts Inc., consented to a censure and a $35,000 fine, and BHF Securities, New York, to a censure, both without admitting or denying wrongdoing.  The separate cases involved alleged failures to maintain required reserves for customers' benefit.  Baker Watts declined to comment.  A BHF spokesman said, "It is important to note that the firm initiated the reports of the violations to the exchange, which took place over three years ago."  The penalty originally also called for a $5,000 fine but was reduced to just a censure.  Anthony T. DeCarlo Securities, an exchange floor broker, consented without admitting or denying wrongdoing to a censure and a $2,500 fine for allegedly failing in 1985 to compute its net capital at least once a month and to keep accurate books and records.  The firm, based in Parlin, N.J., couldn't be reached for comment.  Laidlaw Adams & Peck and Laidlaw Ansbacher collectively consented to a censure and a $15,000 fine, without admitting or denying wrongdoing.  The New York firms allegedly violated federal securities laws by failing to maintain required reserves for customers, and by commingling customer and firm securities in connection with collateral used to obtain bank loans in December 1984.  Firm representatives couldn't be reached.  McLeod Young Weir and the firm's then-finance director, Dominic R. Caliendo of New York, allegedly violated federal securities laws by failing, after a conversion of the firm's computer system, to properly compute net capital and the amounts required to be on reserve.  The firm, since absorbed by Canada's Scotia-McLeod Inc., agreed to be censured and fined $40,000, and Mr. Caliendo agreed to be censured, with neither admitting nor denying wrongdoing.  Firm officials and Mr. Caliendo, currently corporate secretary of Scotia-McLeod U.S.A. Inc., declined to comment.  Oppenheimer, New York, consented to a censure and a $25,000 fine, without admitting or denying wrongdoing, for allegedly failing to properly compute required reserves, and for allegedly violating laws requiring it to obtain physical possession of all fully paid securities held for customers.  Oppenheimer said it has instituted new procedures to correct the alleged problem.  Other cases announced by the Big Board:  McKenna Cloud & Co., an exchange specialist firm, consented to findings that it improperly processed orders and altered order tickets.  The firm agreed to a censure and a $25,000 fine without admitting or denying wrongdoing.  Firm officials weren't available for comment.  Also, exchange member William Alexander Nevitt III, of Florham Park, N.J., consented to a censure and a $1,000 fine without admitting or denying wrongdoing after the exchange accused him of failing to stay with two guests on the Big Board trading floor, "thereby enabling (the guests) to engage in disruptive behavior."  Mr. Nevitt couldn't be reached for comment.  In three separate cases, the exchange censured three chief financial officers of their former firms for alleged failure to supervise and other matters.  The three are Michael Hilton from Rooney, Pace Inc.; David C. Masterson from Newhard Cook & Co.; and Warren C. Nachmann from D.H. Wallach Inc.  All settled without admitting or denying wrongdoing.  Mr. Hilton, of Richfield, Conn., was barred from membership for a month and from employment in a supervisory capacity for a year.  Mr. Masterson, of St. Louis, was permanently barred from a supervisory job.  Mr. Nachmann, of Cheltenham, Pa., was fined $10,000 and barred from membership for 60 days.  None could be reached for comment.  Peter Hall Partridge of Massachusetts, a former branch manager of Moseley Securities Corp., agreed without admitting or denying wrongdoing to be censured and barred from a supervisory job for 30 days for allegedly failing to supervise.  He couldn't be reached for comment.  Four brokers were charged with violations of options rules in their dealings with customers: Suresh Chandra of Grand Prairie, Texas, formerly with Institutional Equity Corp. and Southwest Securities Inc.; Raymond Cifani of Westlake, Ohio, formerly with E.F. Hutton; Harold S. Monashefsky of Kingston, N.Y., formerly with Merrill Lynch & Co.; and Stuart V. Reynolds Sr. of Pensacola Beach, Fla., formerly with Dean Witter Reynolds Inc., a unit of Sears, Roebuck & Co.  All consented to censures without admitting or denying wrongdoing.  Messrs.  Chandra and Cifani were barred from membership for five years, Mr. Monashefsky for 12 months and Mr. Reynolds for nine years.  Mr. Chandra, who is working as an investment adviser, said, "I deny the allegations; you can't win against people who have power and authority."  He said he can't afford an appeal.  The other men couldn't be reached for comment.  Christina Louise Zuniga, of Carmel, Calif., a former Dean Witter broker, was censured and permanently barred from membership for allegedly falsifying account statements, misappropriating securities of Dean Witter customers and making material misstatements to the Big Board.  The exchange's directors denied her appeal of the penalty.  She couldn't be reached for comment.  In separate cases, seven brokers were sanctioned for violating rules by exercising discretionary authority in accounts without prior customer approval.  The seven are former Merrill Lynch brokers Enrico G. Adelman of Natick, Mass., Eric Keith Carr of San Antonio, Texas, and Joseph J. Wysocki of Falls Church, Va.; Thomas J. Hanlon of Yonkers, N.Y., formerly with Baird Patrick & Co.; former Prudential-Bache Securities Inc. brokers James Matthew Hodges of Baltimore and Nickolas Louvros of Greece; and James Michael Pancratz of Colorado Springs, Colo., formerly with PaineWebber Inc. Prudential-Bache is a unit of Prudential Insurance Co. of America.  Mr. Pancratz declined to comment and the other brokers couldn't be reached.  Gary Milotta of New York, a former E.F. Hutton municipal bond trader, was censured, permanently barred from being a trader and fined $25,000 for allegedly exceeding authorized position limits and entering fictitious sales transactions in 1985.  He couldn't be reached for comment.  Anthony Joseph Calabrese of Garden City, N.Y., formerly with Advest Inc., consented without admitting or denying wrongdoing to a censure and a $2,500 fine for allegedly mailing false customer confirmations of a trade.  He couldn't be reached for comment.  Two people were cited for allegedly unsuitable trading for customers.  John Stanley Barnett of Raleigh, N.C., formerly with E.F. Hutton and PaineWebber, consented to a censure, a $10,000 fine and a one-year membership ban; William H. White of Portland, Ore., formerly with Merrill Lynch, consented to a censure, a $15,000 fine and a three-week suspension.  Mr. Barnett couldn't be reached and Mr. White declined to comment.  Five brokers were permanently barred for allegedly misappropriating customers' funds: John DeLong Buecking of Glens Falls, N.Y., formerly with E.F. Hutton; Mark Matthew Cuthbert from Buffalo, N.Y., formerly with PaineWebber; John Davis Labelle from Hinton, W.Va., formerly with Wheat First Securities Inc.; Kent Willis Latham from La Jolla, Calif., formerly with Merrill Lynch; and Sloane Shevrin from New York, a former officer with Ochsenhaut & Co. None could be reached for comment.  Barred for "failing to cooperate" with exchange hearing panels were Wesley McGuire Bybel of Dix Hills, N.Y., formerly with Muriel Siebert & Co., and Timothy Lee Cook of Phoenix, formerly with Shearson Lehman Brothers, the predecessor firm of Shearson Lehman Hutton.  Neither could be reached for comment.  Warren E. Buffett, chairman of Berkshire Hathaway Inc., may seek approval to more than double his stake in Coca-Cola Co. to 15%, in a move that could expand his growing influence at the soft-drink giant.  In a Securities and Exchange Commission filing, Berkshire said it expects to make a filing under the Hart-Scott-Rodino Antitrust Improvement Act of 1976, which would allow it to buy as much as 15% of the world's largest soft-drink company.  Berkshire, controlled by Mr. Buffett, has spent more than $1 billion since May 1988 to acquire about 6.75% of Coke, making it the company's second-largest shareholder.  Coke common shares jumped $4.50 on the news, to close at $68 each, in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  The closing price set a record high for the stock, part of the Dow Jones Industrial Average, which surged.  "Berkshire's purpose with respect to Coca-Cola common stock remains limited to investment purposes," the filing said.  Mr. Buffett couldn't be reached for comment.  Verne McKenzie, Berkshire's chief financial officer, said the Omaha, Neb., insurance holding company was legally required to make the filing to cover any additional Coke share purchases, because of Mr. Buffett's appointment to Coke's board two weeks ago.  "We really haven't made any decision to purchase any additional shares," he said.  Coke said it continued to view its relationship with Mr. Buffett as "positive."  It declined to comment further.  When Berkshire bought a $600 million stake in Gillette Co. two weeks ago, the move was widely considered an anti-takeover maneuver designed to protect Gillette.  Mr. Buffett is expected to be named a director of the Boston consumer-products concern.  His shares of preferred stock are convertible into an 11% stake in Gillette.  But analysts said yesterday they didn't believe Mr. Buffett's intention to increase his Coke stake was a measure designed to defend Coke against an unwanted takeover.  Coke's management is considered strong, and its stock has been trading in the $60 range -- its highest ever.  Coke's well-known brand name, several analysts said, would make the cost of taking it over prohibitive.  "With the wide recognition of the Coke brand label, comparisons with traditional multiples of cash flow and earnings are meaningless," said David Goldman, an analyst with Nomura Research Institute.  In addition, a large block of Coke stock -- roughly 25% -- is held in friendly hands.  Coke directors and officers beneficially own about 5.7%, Berkshire controls nearly 7%, and Coke's largest holder, Atlanta-based SunTrust Banks Inc., owns more than 12%.  Coke insiders estimate another 5% to 10% is held by institutions that would vote in concert with management.  An avid Cherry Coke drinker who is considered one of Wall Street's most savvy investors, Mr. Buffett has said he bought stock in Coke as a "long-term, passive" investment, as has been his style in previous share purchases.  Clearly, there are benefits to being on Mr. Buffett's pick list.  Companies' stocks usually rise following news that Mr. Buffett is accumulating their shares, because there is a herd on the Street that always follows Mr. Buffett's investments.  Even before yesterday's stock run-up, as much as $2 of Coke's current stock price was attributable to Mr. Buffett's interest, Nomura's Mr. Goldman estimated.  ---  @ Stockholdings of Berkshire Hathaway Inc.  @ (Includes some investments of subsidiaries of which Berkshire owns less than 100%)  @ 1988 YEAR-END  @ MARKET VALUE  @ (In millions)  @ Capital Cities/ABC Inc. $1,090  @ Coca-Cola Co. 632  @ Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corp.  @ preferred 121  @ GEICO Corp. 849  @ Gillette Co. convertible preferred 600  @ Salomon Inc. 9% convertible preferred 700  @ Washington Post Co. 364  @ Source: Company reports  Air Crashes Stir Signs  Of Anxiety in Travelers  MOST TRAVELERS know rationally that they aren't in greater danger because of the recent deadly crashes of a Korean Air DC-10 jet in Libya and a United Airlines DC-10 in Iowa.  But days after the accidents, travel and airline reservation agents report that customers are avoiding DC-10s and, in some cases, refusing to fly at all.  Psychologists and psychiatrists aren't surprised.  They are learning that airline accidents can spark specific biological responses that build tremendous anxiety in some people.  People tend to experience an accident vicariously, researchers say.  For example, they say, some people imagine themselves in the spiraling United plane, hurling toward the ground and cartwheeling across the tarmac in a fireball, all the while strapped to their seats.  In doing so, some people have a biological reaction similar to the one they'd probably experience if they were going through the crash themselves.  According to one theory, imagining a crash stimulates nerve impulses to the hypothalamus section of the brain.  "We take the image of the past and put it in the present," says Reid Wilson, a psychologist who does consulting work for American Airlines.  The hypothalamus sends signals to the adrenal glands, which spew extra levels of epinephrine, a hormone commonly known as adrenaline, into the bloodstream.  The epinephrine sparks such reactions as a pounding heart, sweaty palms and high blood pressure.  According to the theory, the epinephrine also overstimulates the sympathetic nervous system, causing the skin to flush.  The overstimulation partly leads to heartburn as well.  Such reactions are normal for about two weeks after a crash, says David Charney, a psychiatrist at Roundhouse Square Treatment Center in Alexandria, Va.  Public May Submit Bids To Get Bargain Rates  IF YOU FIND the air-fare pricing situation chaotic now, wait till you see what some people have in mind.  If San Francisco-based Marketel International Inc. has its way, travelers will have an electronic stock exchange of sorts for air fares, hotel rooms and car rentals by March 1990.  The proposed system is aimed at people who don't have to travel at a set time and want to go on the cheap.  Here's how the system might work:  To buy an airline ticket, a customer sends Marketel an order including origination and destination airports and preferred departure times.  Customers submit the price they're willing to pay.  Then, airlines in the system study the bid and accept or reject it.  The system would be set up to take bids for hotel rooms and car rentals as well.  "We were called crazy when we first came up with the idea," says William Perell, Marketel's senior vice president and a former rice commodity trader.  But the solution "to high prices is to allow deregulation to unfold completely.  We never allowed consumers to say how much they wanted to pay."  What the plan really needs to succeed is for at least one major airline to sign on.  But it's unclear how interested the airlines are at this point.  Marketel won't say which travel companies, if any, have signed on as vendors, and many airline pricing executives say they are leery of the proposed system.  Frequent Fliers Snap Up  Putters and Puppies  AMERICAN AIRLINES got double mileage out of an auction this spring for about 400 of its best customers.  The airline created good will by wining and dining the frequent fliers, and it got them to burn millions of their mileage points on promotional items such as pedigreed puppies and a weekend in Hawaii with Michael Jordan, the Chicago Bulls basketball star.  American is one of a growing number of airlines that are turning to spiffy vacation packages and nontravel promotions to get customers to use up mileage points.  Awards have included golf putters, portable phones and discounts on Volvo cars.  These new promotions are intended to relieve airlines of a growing liability burden that threatens to cut their revenue.  Airlines owe members about four million domestic round-trip tickets, says Randy Petersen, editor of a frequent-flier newsletter.  That's enough to fly about 120 billion miles free.  Airline analysts say carriers also are trying to prevent frequent fliers from selling their free tickets to coupon brokers that resell the freebies, a violation of industry policy.  The airlines "are doing anything they can do to get people to use their mileage," says Rolfe Shellenberger, former marketing director at American.  "It's a way of adding spice to the program, while bringing the volume of points down."  Haute Couture Comes  To the Travel Industry  BE PREPARED to do a double take when you whisk past the National Car Rental System counter.  National's uniforms clinched first place in the national transportation category of a contest thrown by New York's Career Apparel Institute.  The new National uniform: forest-green sweaters with pale gray skirts and pants.  The judges were especially taken with National's striped ties and belts and its maternity outfits.  The Long Island Railroad's uniforms beat out the Chicago Transit Authority's and New York Transit Authority's to grab the first-place trophy in the regional transportation competition.  Adolph Coors Co. said it is exploring the possibility of purchasing some assets of Stroh Brewery Co. in a move analysts said could involve some or all of the Detroit brewer's brands or breweries.  Coors, a Golden, Colo., brewer said no agreements have been reached.  Coors wouldn't say which assets it is interested in, but analysts speculated that the talks could lead to a merger.  A merged Coors and Stroh could provide stiffer competition for Anheuser-Busch Cos. and Miller Brewing Co., the industry giants.  With the big two tightening their stranglehold on the beer market in recent years, both Coors and Stroh have been suffering sales declines.  Stroh, which said in February it was seeking a minority partner, is currently the nation's third-largest brewer with about 20 million barrels in annual sales.  Coors is fourth, with about 16 million barrels.  Individually, the pair is dwarfed by Anheuser-Busch, which sold about 80 million barrels in 1988 and Miller, with about 40 million.  Investors apparently approved of Coors's interest in Stroh; Coors rose $2 a share, to $20.875, in national over-the-counter trading.  A spokesman for closely held Stroh confirmed the company is talking with Coors, but said Stroh is holding discussions with other brewers as well.  He wouldn't name the other brewers or describe the nature of the discussions.  Stroh will "continue exploring numerous alternatives for profitably restructuring and strengthening its business," with the help of its investment banker, Morgan Stanley & Co., he said.  After years of wringing growth from geographic expansion and new brand developments, Coors recently acknowledged it may need to make an acquisition to get big enough to compete with the makers of Budweiser and Miller Lite.  For the past decade, Coors has expanded to national distribution, leaving little room for geographic growth.  Meanwhile, introducing new brands has become increasingly difficult, given industrywide brand proliferation and skyrocketing marketing costs.  A combination of Coors with some major Stroh brands may be the only workable strategy that could ensure the survival of Coors or Stroh in the beer wars, said analysts.  Because of their huge sales volumes, Anheuser and Miller can spend a much smaller portion of revenues on advertising than Coors or Stroh and still reach a larger audience.  In 1988, Anheuser, for example, spent $8 a barrel of beer sold on advertising, while Coors spent $14.85 a barrel, said Emanuel Goldman, analyst for PaineWebber Inc. in San Francisco.  Higher marketing costs contributed to a 12% drop in Coors net income in the fiscal second quarter ended June 11.  Beer shipments fell about 3.4%.  Stroh shipments fell 10%, the steepest in its history, in the second quarter, said Jerry Steinman, publisher of Beer Marketers Insights.  Talks between Coors and Stroh have been held sporadically during the past couple of years, Mr. Steinman said.  Coors said it "is possible" the company had discussions in the past, but the talks never reached the point that the company felt it needed to publicly disclose them.  Yesterday's announcement was made because "rumors" of the current talks were widespread, a Coors spokesman said.  While Coors wouldn't say if a merger is being considered, analysts said such a move not only would make sense strategically, but would be well within the financial reach of Coors, which has about $1 billion in assets and almost no debt.  Stroh is closely held and wouldn't disclose its asset or debt level.  Stroh's beer business has two characteristics that could be especially attractive to Coors, said PaineWebber's Mr. Goldman.  Stroh is strong in the north-central states of Illinois, Michigan, Wisconsin and Ohio, he said, while Coors is "small potatoes" in that region and has had difficulty competing there with Stroh, G. Heileman's Old Style brand and Budweiser.  In addition, Stroh owns Old Milwaukee and Old Milwaukee Light, the nation's No. 1 selling popular-priced beer brand.  Coors doesn't brew a popular-priced beer now, but recently said it would introduce popular-priced Keystone in September, a move analysts term necessary, but very risky and very expensive.  As troubles mount for limited partnerships, many investors are bailing out, driving down prices in the informal resale market.  But some investors may be better off sitting tight.  While prices of some partnership interests are falling, the prices of others are rising as buyers crowd in to capitalize on all the bad news.  These are the findings of a recent Wall Street Journal survey of secondary-market trading activity by a number of small investment firms that buy partnership interests secondhand from investors, either for their own accounts or for resale to new investors.  Brokerage industry officials estimated earlier this summer that at least $5 billion -- and probably much more -- of publicly offered limited partnerships marketed this decade are failing.  Those known to be seriously troubled represent about 20% of the roughly $100 billion of partnerships sold by major Wall Street firms and other syndicators in recent years.  Analysts warn, however, that all partnerships shouldn't be tarred with the same brush.  "You've got firms calling investors day and night trying to get them to sell at prices that may have little or no relationship to their underlying values," says Spencer Jefferies, president of Dallas-based Partnership Profiles Inc., a research firm.  "They're working off of all the negative publicity about the problems that are out there, primarily in real estate partnerships."  As many as 12 million individuals hold interests in partnerships that own everything from shopping centers to cable-TV systems, shipping containers and oil wells.  Designed as long-term investments, they typically have lives of about 10 years before the assets are sold and investors are paid off.  Until then, the informal secondary market is practically the only place investors can sell partnership interests they no longer want -- albeit at steep discounts from the original offering prices.  The Journal survey, the third in a continuing study, covers secondary-market trading in 20 partnerships during the second quarter of this year.  Thirteen secondary-market firms supplied information.  That activity was compared with trading three months earlier.  Although the partnerships tracked are just a small sample of the overall market, many of them are among the largest offered back in the heyday of such syndications between 1980 and 1987.  The rising tide of partnerships going sour -- amid brokers' wails that some Wall Street firms selling the most partnerships pressured them to push highly risky deals -- has clearly spooked many investors.  During the second quarter, investors in some widely held real estate partnerships in the Journal survey accepted prices that were as much as 37% below the worst offers investors settled for in the first quarter.  Overall, the best prices investors got when selling averaged 39.3% below the original offering price, the same as in the preceding quarter.  With a growing number of secondary-market "players," several firms say there is less disparity in the prices buyers are willing to pay for partnership interests than there was a year ago.  In other words, they claim the market is becoming more efficient.  Perhaps, but clearly investors should still seek several bids before they sell.  There was a difference of more than $100 a unit between the high and low prices investors received for their interests in four of the real estate partnerships in the latest survey, one leasing partnership and one cable-TV partnership.  Many of the investors attracted to the partnership secondary market apparently want high current income.  And secondary-market investment yields certainly can seem terrific.  For example, the estimated secondary-market yields for several partnerships in the latest survey exceed 10%.  This estimate is calculated by dividing cash distributions in the latest four quarters by the most recent average prices investors paid for secondhand partnership interests.  But partnership yields can be illusory.  Payouts to partnership investors often fluctuate -- and they can suddenly dry up altogether.  Moreover, cash distributions of some types of partnerships, such as equipment-leasing syndications, frequently include not only earnings but a portion of the investors' original capital.  Most important, high yields in the secondary market reflect the steep discounts from the original offering price at which interests in many older partnerships trade.  Corporate Property Associates 3, the only real estate partnership in the survey to consistently trade above its original sales price, again fetched a handsome 17% premium.  "The reason is simple.  It produces good cash flow, something in excess of 15% on an original $500 unit," says Glen Bigelow, president of Bigelow Management Inc., a New York-based secondary-market firm.  Over the years, he adds, the partnership, which owns industrial warehouses, has produced modest but steady increases in those quarterly payouts.  On average, investors who sold their interests in the seven other "equity," or property-owning, real estate partnerships at the highest prices accepted discounts of 35.2% below their original cost.  That was three percentage points less than last quarter's average discount for this group.  Prices on the two real estate mortgage partnerships in the survey went in different directions.  The best price investors got when selling interests in Balcor Pension Investors VI in the second quarter was 2.4% higher than in the first quarter (although it was still more than 31% below the original offering price).  But the best price investors could get when selling units of Consolidated Capital Institutional Properties 2 sank almost 46%.  The Consolidated partnership suspended distributions last December.  The equipment-leasing partnerships in the Journal survey also presented a mixed picture this time around.  The best price investors got when selling interests in Polaris Aircraft Income Fund II was 8.8% higher than in the first quarter, while the best price for IEA Marine Container Income Fund III was 3.7% higher.  But the best price for interests in Phoenix Leasing Income Fund VII slipped 5.6% from the first quarter, and the best price for interests in PLM Transportation Equipment Partners VII-B fell 32%.  None of the oil and gas partnerships in the survey traded in the latest quarter, although secondary-market firms say they bought interests in other, similar energy ventures.  Sales of new energy offerings were also brisk.  Integrated Resources Inc., the troubled financial-services firm, is seeking to dissolve one program the Journal survey tracks, National Completion Fund Limited Partnership II-A.  Secondary-market prices of the two cable-TV partnerships in the survey also went in opposite directions this time around.  Investors who sold interests in Denver-based Jones Intercable Inc.'s Cable TV Fund 12-D got a premium of as much as 45% above the original offering price.  Three months earlier, the premium was 35%.  The best price investors got when selling interests in the far smaller Enstar Income/Growth Program Five-B was 17.2% below the original offering price.  In the first quarter, some investors sold interests in the Enstar partnership at a 135.6% premium.  ---  @ Secondary-Market Discounts  Average percent below (or above) original offering prices received by investors selling partnership interests at the best prices  @ QUARTER QUARTER  @ ENDED ENDED  @ TYPE 6/30/89* 3/31/89#  @ Real Estate -39.3% -39.3%  @ Leasing -40.9 -38.6  @ Oil & Gas N.A -40.0  @ Cable TV +28.0 +210.8  *10 real estate partnerships, 4 leasing partnerships, 0 oil-and-gas partnerships and 2 cable-TV partnerships traded at 13 secondary-market firms.  #9 real estate partnerships, 4 leasing partnerships, 2 oil-and-gas partnerships and 2 cable-TV partnerships traded at 12 secondary-market firms.  After an era of confrontation and three years without a contract, the Washington Post and the Newspaper Guild tentatively agreed on a new five-year labor contract.  The proposed agreement, which was reached Friday and will be voted on tomorrow by employees, would raise weekly salaries roughly 4% a year for the first three years and provides a formula for determining increases in the fourth and fifth years.  In addition, if inflation exceeds 6%, cost-of-living adjustments will be made in the last two years.  The contract covers some 1,400 of the Post's 3,000 employees, primarily newsroom employees, but also those in accounting, advertising, circulation and data-processing.  Both sides expressed satisfaction with the hard-won agreement, which took 120 bargaining sessions to hammer out.  Two years ago, the Post declared the negotiations at an impasse and imposed many of the conditions in its proposed new contract.  The Guild challenged the Post at the National Labor Relations Board, saying the impasse wasn't legitimate, and the two sides nearly went to court.  Negotiations resumed last May.  "What you're really talking about is the end of an era," said Franklin Havlicek, chief negotiator for the Post.  "In 15 years, we had a strike, attempted strikes and two three-year impasses.  This contract deals with every conceivable issue, from video display terminals to adoption assistance.  It's two years longer than any contract we've had before and it has the first no-strike and management-rights clauses we've ever had with the Guild."  The Guild has represented Post employees for 50 years.  Sandi Polaski, chief negotiator for the Washington/Baltimore Local of the Newspaper Guild, said she was pleased that the Guild had won significant increases -- as much as $100 a week -- in starting salaries for beginning reporters and photographers, and significant increases for all employees in medical benefits, though at a higher cost to employees.  Ms. Polaski said the Guild was disappointed it didn't get the Washington Post Co. to increase its contributions to an employee savings plan, nor did the Guild get a fifth week of vacation for long-term Post employees.  In addition to voting on the overall contract, Post employees will vote on whether to divert $3 a week of their increased compensation -- matched by the Post -- to a 401k savings plan.  Prince William Sound will likely lose much of its $100 million commercial fishing harvest following a weekend decision by Alaska fishery authorities to close two more major salmon-fishing areas because of pollution from the March 24 Exxon Valdez oil spill.  The closures of the Cannery Creek Hatchery and Esther Island fisheries -- areas that had thus far remained free of oil -- came as a "big nasty blow" to the sound's fishing fleet, which had already seen 30% of its salmon grounds closed because of oil pollution, a spokeswoman for the Alaska Department of Environmental Conservation said.  The closures are likely to cost fishermen much of an estimated $16 million in pink salmon harvests and put in jeopardy a substantial catch of silver salmon that are due to begin spawning later this month.  The sound's commercial herring season, with a catch valued at about $12 million, had previously been canceled because of the oil spill.  The shutdowns of Cannery Creek and Esther Island leave only one relatively minor fishery, known as the Copper River Flats, open to commercial salmon harvests.  "People are really disappointed," said Marilyn Leland, executive director of the Cordova District Fishermen United, a fishery group headquartered at Cordova on the eastern edge of Prince William Sound.  Nonetheless, Ms. Leland said fishermen support the decisions by the Alaska Department of Fish and Game to close the areas under a "zero tolerance program" designed to prevent any oil-tainted fish from reaching market.  The fear is that even a small number of contaminated salmon could undermine the value and reputation of the overall Alaska salmon harvest, which last year carried a retail value of about $3 billion.  The Prince William Sound closures represent only a fraction of the commercial fishing areas put off limits as a result of the 260,000-barrel spill, which has sent oil roaming hundreds of miles into the Gulf of Alaska.  Large swaths of fishing grounds in the gulf near Seward and Kodiak Island, and in Cook Inlet near Homer, have also been closed and will remain so probably for the rest of the summer fishing season.  Fisheries officials say they don't yet have any reliable estimates of losses, though they will likely run in the tens of millions of dollars.  The new closures amount to more bad news for Exxon Corp., which announced last week that it will spend about $1.25 billion, excluding litigation costs or court awards, cleaning up Prince William Sound and settling damage claims.  Of $600 million already spent, Exxon has paid out $38 million in damage claims, including some for fishing losses.  The International Trade Commission upheld an administrative law judge's ruling that most imports of Taiwanese power tools don't infringe on the trademarks of Makita Electric Works Ltd., the leading Japanese supplier of these products.  The decision not to review Makita's complaint opened the way for many of its Taiwanese competitors, including Jepson Inc. and Ko Shin Electric & Machinery Co., to re-enter the growing U.S. market for hand-held tools.  "The moral of the story is that it's difficult for anyone to walk into the ITC and prove that his trademarks are being violated," said Larry Klayman, attorney for the two Taiwanese firms.  Last June, the administrative law judge, John Mathias, found no basis for Makita's charges against 28 of 29 suppliers and distributors.  Makita claimed the Taiwanese tools unfairly imitate the shapes and blue color of its own products and thus are in violation of U.S. trade laws that authorize the ITC to bar imports of products that infringe on patents and copyrights.  However, Makita failed to convince the judge that its so-called trade dress is distinctive enough.  The ITC's call echoed its 1987 decision upholding an administrative law judge's ruling to dismiss Samsonite Corp.'s complaint that four Taiwanese manufacturers illegally copied one of the Colorado firm's popular luggage lines.  The ITC said it may order a ban on products that previously were imported by a Tacoma, Wash., distributor, Jet Equipment & Tools Inc. Paul Meiklejohn, a lawyer for Jet Equipment, said the alleged infringement of the Makita trademark was just a "one-time inadvertent thing."  He said the company wouldn't be hurt by an ITC exclusion order because it no longer imports the product line.  Makita's lawyers said they haven't decided whether to challenge the ITC decision before a federal appeals court here.  Xerox Corp. reported that second-quarter earnings climbed 7.1% on strength in business products and financial services and despite continued weakness in property-casualty insurance.  Net income rose to $179 million, or $1.67 a share, from $167 million, or $1.59 a share, a year earlier.  Revenue grew 7.6% to $4.38 billion from $4.07 billion.  "Improved financial returns from business products and systems in {the} second half and in the years beyond will result" from a restructuring announced in January and from tight cost controls, said David T. Kearns, the parent's chairman and chief executive officer.  Profit in business products and systems advanced 11%, to $96 million, on 8% higher revenue, Xerox said, as U.S. operations continued strong and European markets resurged.  Demand for copiers and duplicators, printing systems and facsimile equipment was particularly strong.  Financial services accounted for $83 million of earnings, up 3% from a year ago, as revenue rose 6.4% to $1.32 billion.  Within the segment, financing and investment banking operations, including Xerox Credit, Furman Selz and Van Kampen Merritt, stood out, Xerox said.  But higher capital gains and investment income at Crum & Forster's property-casualty operations was offset by increased reserves, primarily in personal insurance, and by losses from major storms in the Southwest and Southeast.  Life insurance activities were strong, reflecting higher operating earnings and capital gains.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Xerox shares closed at $67.50, down 12.5 cents.  Regarding C. Emily Feistritzer's attack on the National Education Association ("Does the NEA Really Speak for Teachers?" editorial page, June 30):  No national organization in the U.S. has a decision-making process that is more democratic than the NEA's.  The NEA, internally, practices the same democratic values-free speech, secret ballots, majority rule, minority protections -- that teachers teach every day in America's classrooms.  At a time when many unions are experiencing a decline in membership, the NEA is growing at a steady rate.  We've gained more than a quarter-million new members over the past six years.  In the past year alone, we attracted 75,000 new members.  Ms. Feistritzer's column misrepresented what the NEA is all about, which isn't surprising since Ms. Feistritzer has misrepresented continually what's happening in the NEA -- and education.  Take Ms. Feistritzer's assertion that teacher salaries have risen "way above the inflation rate in the past five years."  Actually, after adjusting for inflation, teacher salaries went up just 12.9% from 1983 to 1989.  A significant increase in teacher salaries is, in fact, just what America needs.  With a teacher shortage looming, we need to do more to attract young people into the teaching profession-and more to keep underpaid veteran teachers from exiting the profession.  Mary Hatwood Futrell  President, National Education Association  Washington  Societe Nationale Elf Aquitaine reached an agreement with the Federal Trade Commission permitting Elf to go forward with its $1.05 billion acquisition of Pennwalt Corp.  The agreement, which calls for the sale of a Pennwalt chemical plant, ended worries about antitrust snags for the $132-a-share transaction.  Those fears had caused Pennwalt's stock to seesaw in recent weeks.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Pennwalt shares closed at $131.625, up $4.625.  The fears stemmed from an earlier vote by the FTC authorizing its staff to seek a court order blocking the deal until lengthy administrative proceedings on antitrust questions had been completed.  But the staff delayed going to court because Elf, a Paris-based oil and chemical company, extended its offer and continued discussions on how to resolve the FTC's concerns.  Under the agreement, Pennwalt, a Philadelphia chemical company, will sell to an FTC-approved acquirer a plant in Thorofare, N.J., that makes a resin used in architectural coatings and electrical insulation.  It is known chemically as polyvinylidene fluoride and is sold under the trade name Kynar.  The plant also makes vinylidene fluoride, a chemical used in making Kynar and rubber-like compounds called fluoroelastomers.  Elf also sells both chemicals in the U.S.  An Elf spokesman said the Thorofare plant accounted for about 5% of Pennwalt's total 1988 sales of $1.02 billion.  However, Pennwalt will be allowed under the agreement to retain a plant in Calvert City, Ky., that produces the bulk of the company's Kynar and its vinylidene fluoride.  The agreement also provides that for the next 10 years Elf will need FTC approval before acquiring any interest in another company that makes or sells the two chemicals in the U.S.  The Elf spokesman said that at first Elf officials "didn't think we should be required to get rid of the plant, but at the end of the day, it was a reasonable solution" to the FTC's concerns.  An FTC spokeswoman declined to comment about negotiations leading to the agreement.  Elf extended its tender offer to 5 p.m., New York City time, Thursday.  The offer had been scheduled to expire today.  The agreement with the FTC won't become final until after a 60-day period for public comment.  The spokesman for Elf said it expects to complete the merger with Pennwalt by the end of September.  MDPT Inc., a consortium of companies from four countries, was awarded a $479 million Pentagon contract for development of homing devices for a multiple-launch rocket system.  The four companies in the group are Martin Marietta Corp. of Bethesda, Md., Diehl GMB & Co. of West Germany, Thomson CSF of France and Thorn EMI Electronics Ltd. of Great Britain.  The multiple-launch system, already deployed in parts of Western Europe, is designed to replace standard artillery shells with rockets that have longer range and greater accuracy.  Meanwhile, Honeywell Inc. won an $85.7 million Army contract for tank ammunition.  BMY, a division of Harsco Inc., got a $64.7 million Army contract for five-ton trucks.  Rockwell International Corp. was given a $59.3 million Army contract for Hellfire missiles.  AIL Systems Inc. received a $45 million Air Force contract for B-1B aircraft electronics.  Accudyne Corp. was issued a $34.2 million Army contract for mine parts.  Oshkosh Truck Corp. said it was awarded a $30 million Air Force contract for 205 snow-removal vehicles.  General Dynamics Corp. won a $22.1 million contract for M-1 tank improvements.  Aerojet Corp. was given a $17.1 million Army contract for explosives.  Kerfott Guidance & Navigation Corp. got a $13.7 million Army contract for armored-vehicle parts.  McDonnell Douglas Corp. was awarded a $13.4 million Navy contract for Harpoon missile support.  Chinese call them "KGB with little feet."  Officially, they are "neighborhood committees" -- a vast number of little old ladies employed by the state to monitor the lives of every Chinese.  Their primary task is to seek out and resolve squabbles among neighbors.  They also spot-check household hygiene, organize mass political study and report to higher-ups on everything they see.  They are part grandmother, part big brother, and serve as the eyes and ears of the Communist Party at the most basic level.  "They may look sweet," says a Chinese artist.  "But these ladies are trouble."  Li Xulan, a squat 56-year-old illiterate, runs the committee in Beijing's Xili neighborhood.  She offers warm, chalky orange soda to a visitor to her office and takes her seat in a tiny schoolchair, wiggling her ample backside to get comfortable.  Ms. Li jokes easily, grinning a mostly toothless smile.  "I know what every one of my people is doing," she says, pointing to a stack of notebooks filled with information on the neighborhood's 2,140 residents.  "We post people at the entrance to every building.  They see everything that happens, and report to me."  Her assistants, four elderly women perched on schoolchairs beside her, nod their heads in vigorous agreement.  Ms. Li and her aides are serving the party faithfully in its current campaign against political dissent.  Using their huge loudspeaker system, the Xili neighborhood committee broadcasts orders to residents to assemble for political-study sessions.  Committee members also make the rounds of homes, circulating photos of fugitive pro-democracy activists.  If needed, they can quickly mobilize residents to attend mass rallies or public executions.  "Our people all love the party and the government, and they all love socialism," says Ms. Li.  Her assistants again nod.  The old-lady network, set up in the 1950s as a "bridge between the party and the people," is China's most effective means of grass-roots social control.  There are one million neighborhood committees in cities and villages around the country, employing 6.4 million retirees, virtually all of them women.  In Beijing there is, on average, one old lady keeping watch on every 20 families.  What they see, for the most part, aren't signs of counter-revolutionary rebellion, but more mundane, affairs like family squabbles.  To keep petty cases out of the overburdened court system, the party grants the committees a mandate to snoop into small-time disputes and try to resolve them.  With the party's implicit backing they try to defuse tension through solutions that combine home-spun folk wisdom with socialist coercion.  At Daxing Lane, a quiet residential corner of Beijing, Su Zhiqing is trying to resolve a two-year feud between neighbors.  The battle-lines are clearly drawn.  An old woman, Li Yunying, complains that the man next door keeps a smelly barrel too close to her window.  The man, Chen Qingzheng, counters that the woman refuses to repair her door, which bangs day and night and keeps him from sleeping.  Ms. Su, the white-haired local committee director has summoned the neighbors together for the first time to try to settle the dispute amicably.  The two parties sit side-by-side on green, rubbery sofas in a dimly lit meeting room.  As they speak, things begin to heat up.  Ms. Li testifies her neighbor recently chased a chicken around the communal courtyard screaming, "You lay no eggs.  You're useless.  I'm going to kill you."  Since Ms. Li is childless, she took her neighbor's cries as a veiled personal threat.  So she cursed him: "You virtueless person.  I hope you get run over by a car or a truck."  At that point, she says, Mr. Chen slugged her.  Ms. Li stops her story and sobs.  "Sure, I was hit before liberation," she sniffs, glaring at Mr. Chen.  "Now, I have been hit after liberation -- in a socialist country?"  She weeps buckets.  The committee director has heard enough.  She begins pacing the floor and reels off a lengthy lecture, touching on many of the most common themes of modern Chinese propaganda.  "Establish a new socialist morality," she tells them.  "Seek truth from facts. . . .  Be happy about life. . . .  Practice the 'four speaks' and the 'five beautifuls'. . . .  Do a self-criticism."  When Ms. Su is finished, she sits back, obviously pleased with herself.  For a brief moment, there is silence.  But the neighbors soon start up again, trading insults and pointing fingers at each other.  Ms. Su, frowning, tries a new tack.  This time, she takes out a pad and several sheets of carbon paper and writes a "contract," in quadruplicate, that both parties must sign.  It contains promises to fix the door, throw out the smelly stuff and stop using vulgar language.  Article 4 says: "If anyone curses the other or refuses to listen to persuasion from the neighborhood committee, that person will be punished according to relevant security regulations."  Case closed.  China's tireless statisticians claim that mediators like Ms. Su solved 7.2 million disputes last year.  They also thwarted the murderous and suicidal intentions of no fewer than 120,000 people.  "If there is any kind of quarrel or dispute, we will certainly know of it," says Cai Yuqing, the 68-year-old boss of Beijing's Yuetan Street.  Indeed, neighborhood committees draw their inspiration from China's model mediator, the legendary "Aunty Wu," who won praise from the official press for dashing into homes to investigate disturbances she heard while walking along the street.  But while the neighborhood committees boast of their ability to know all that is happening in their realms, they bridle at being called the "KGB with little feet." ("Little feet" refers to the former tradition of binding women's feet.  Some elderly women have bound feet.)  True, says Ms. Su of Daxing Lane, the old ladies sometimes turn gamblers over to the police.  Yes, she adds, they file reports on any outsider who stays the night in the neighborhood without permission, and they routinely stop strangers, demanding to know who they've come to see.  They also perform spot-checks on household cleanliness every couple of weeks, she says, and pry into couples' plans for having children.  But Ms. Su rejects the notion that the old ladies are spies for the state.  "Some people don't like us," she concedes.  "But these are bad people.  Most Chinese believe in the government and they trust in their local neighborhood committee."  Liz Claiborne Inc., citing robust apparel sales as women continue to replenish their wardrobes, said second quarter net income jumped 57%.  Claiborne, based here, said its net rose to $28.8 million, or 33 cents a share, from $18.3 million, or 21 cents a share, a year earlier.  Sales climbed 9.1% to $271.6 million from $248.8 million.  The company also said its gross profit margin in the first half of 1989 reached 40.2%, up from 34.4% in 1988.  It said the improvement was a result of department stores selling a higher percentage of Claiborne merchandise at full price.  Claiborne's results are in line with a general improvement in women's apparel sales this year after two years of sluggish results.  Retailers say that new merchandise from Claiborne and several other women's apparel makers have been well-received -- including a variety of skirt lengths, for example -- inspiring women to buy more clothes at full price.  Moreover, Claiborne maintained lower manufacturing levels this year, which, coupled with strong sales, caused its unsold inventories to be "substantially lower" than a year earlier, the company said.  Liz Claiborne shares closed at $26.25, down 75 cents in national over-the-counter trading yesterday.  Despite the big earnings increase, results were only slightly better than analysts' forecasts and the stock has been climbing steadily in recent weeks.  In the first six months, net rose 40.2% to $73.1 million, or 83 cents a share, from $52.1 million, or 60 cents a share, a year earlier.  Sales increased 8.3% to $624.4 million from $576.3 million.  Claiborne also declared a quarterly dividend of five cents a share payable Sept. 5 to stock of record Aug. 11.  The board increased its number of directors to nine, naming Louis Lowenstein, 64 years old, former president of Supermarkets General Corp. and a professor of finance and law at Columbia University.  Add another animal to the endangered species list: the Rhode Island plastic duck, a close relative of the more common rubber duckie.  State officials have outlawed plastic duck races as a threat to the environment, sending the latest craze in fund raising in Rhode Island up the creek.  Rhode Island's Department of Environmental Management acted after a Rotary Club floated 7,000 ducks down the Pawtuxet River recently in a one-mile race to raise money.  The 3-inch-long yellow and pink ducks were each numbered and then tossed downstream toward a finish line, where spectators who paid $3 to "bet" on the ducks waited for the first-place duck to win one of them a trip to Florida.  News of the race alarmed department officials, who envisioned hordes of spectators destroying the river bank by running alongside their adopted ducks and cheering them on.  Worse still, department officials pondered, what if the ducks continued on past the finish line and ended up drifting into the ocean, where wildlife might mistake the ducks for an easy meal?  Fearing the worst, the department declared the birds a hazard to waterways and wildlife.  "We're not chasing ducks," a department spokesman says, adding that environmental officials have bigger fish to fry.  The Warwick Rotary Club, which sponsored the race, says the department is overreacting and ruining a profitable fundraising event.  "Unless we have alligators in the Pawtuxet River, I don't know what sort of wildlife is going to swallow {the ducks}," says Jack Frazier, club president.  The ducks would never reach the ocean, club members say, because volunteers follow them in rowboats, scooping up stray ducks in hand-held nets.  In addition, nets are strung across the river at the finish line.  "We accounted for all our ducks but four or five," Mr. Frazier notes.  Moreover, he adds, the Pawtuxet has heavily wooded banks, which make it impossible for crowds to trample the environment.  Ducking complaints, the department isn't budging on its new policy -- even though the proceeds from the fund-raiser are going to be donated to environmental support groups.  "It's too bad for the environment," says Mr. Frazier.  "It was the beneficiary of our activities."  New construction contracting for June fell 2% to an annualized rate of $249.7 billion, following a 5% decline in May, forecaster F.W. Dodge Group said.  For the first six months of 1989, new construction contracting was off 1% from last year's first-half level, the unit of McGraw-Hill Inc. said.  Despite the weakening in May and June, the second quarter's total was slightly above that of the first quarter.  "We've been seeing more than the usual volatility in contracting during the first half of 1989, but on balance, there's been surprisingly little slowdown from the strong 1987-1988 pace of building," said George A. Christie, Dodge's vice president and chief economist.  "Having weathered another period of monetary restraint, this time without serious damage, the construction sector's prospects for this year's second half are good."  The Dodge Index, which is seasonally adjusted and tracks total levels of construction contracting, slipped to 159 in June from 162 in May.  It uses a base of 100 in 1982.  Like the dollar level of contracting, Mr. Christie said, the index "suggests more stability than continuing decline from its peak in mid-1987."  For the second quarter, the index was at an average 161, up from 151 in the first quarter.  In August 1987, it reached a record high of 174.  Total construction contracting in 1989 will ease 2% to about $254 billion from $258 billion last year, Dodge had estimated in a separate report issued last month.  "An interest-rate retreat" is stimulating residential building, an important part of total construction, it said.  Previous Dodge forecasts anticipated a steeper decline than 2% in 1989.  In June, the nonbuilding construction sector, representing publicly funded works and utilities, set a weak pace for the month's overall construction contracting.  The category showed a 5% decline to an annualized $43.6 billion.  June slumped in comparison with May when a big electric power distribution project began in New York.  In the second quarter, nonbuilding construction averaged $47.1 billion, 3% over the annualized rate of the first quarter.  Nonresidential projects in June slipped 3% from May, to about $89.9 billion.  The downturn was somewhat anticipated because a surge of new contracts was recorded in May, Dodge said.  Second-quarter nonresidential construction contracting was 2% higher than in the first quarter.  Residential building was relatively flat in June compared with May.  Contracting stood at an annualized $116.2 billion in June.  "It is still too early to be looking for a recovery of new-home construction in response to falling mortgage rates," Mr. Christie said.  "It is encouraging, though, to see that sales of new homes have picked up since early spring."  Second-quarter residential contracting stabilized at an average of $120.3 billion.  The unadjusted total of construction contracting for the six months was $127.3 billion, 1% less than the same period of 1988.  By type of contracting, nonresidential building totaled $43.3 billion for the first half, 1% above 1988's six-month total.  Residential building was short of its comparable 1988 level by 1% at $60.2 billion.  And nonbuilding construction was off 5% from the year-earlier period at $23.8 billion.  The North Central region maintained a 1% lead over last year's first half and the Northeast was about even.  The West was off 1% and the South was down 3%.  ---  @ a-June '89 Seasonally  @ Construction Adjusted %  @ Contract Val.  Change From  @ (000,000) Prev.  Month  @Nonresidential bldg. ........... $89,931 - 3  @Residential building ........... 116,228 b  @Non-building constr. ........... 43,591 - 5  @Total construction ............. 249,750 - 2  @ a-Monthly construction contract values are reported on an annualized, seasonally adjusted basis.  b-unchanged.  @ 6 months 6 months Cumu-  @ 1989 1988 lative  @ (000,000) (000,000) % Chg  @Nonresidential bldg. ....... $43,268 $42,932 + 1  @Residential building ....... 60,228 60,533 - 1  @Non-building constr. ....... 23,801 25,096 - 5  @Total construction ......... 127,297 128,561 - 1  The prospect of falling interest rates sent stock and bond prices surging but depressed the dollar.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average climbed 25.42 points to 2660.66 in moderate trading.  Long-term bond prices climbed seven-eighths of a point, or about $8.75 for each $1,000 face amount.  But the dollar took a bad spill, falling sharply against most other major currencies.  Analysts said investors are betting that the Federal Reserve will drive short-term interest rates lower as evidence mounts that the U.S. economy is slowing rapidly.  They expect the federal funds rate -- the interest rate banks charge one another for short-term loans -- to continue slipping from its current level of just under 9%.  Two economic reports this week are expected to support the predictions of lower rates.  One is today's release of the National Association of Purchasing Management's July survey, which is expected to show a contracting economy for the third month in a row.  The other is the government's report on July employment, to be released Friday.  Predictions are that the report will show about 150,000 jobs were created last month, but some economists expect the manufacturing sector to show a net loss of jobs.  Bond prices are clearly reflecting the expectation of lower rates as traders focus on recent comments by Fed Chairman Alan Greenspan, who said the Fed is aware of the risks of recession.  Stock prices benefited from the bond market's expectations, too.  As bond prices climbed, they triggered two rounds of computer-driven buy programs related to stock index arbitrage.  The two spurts pushed broad market indexes to record highs and boosted the Dow Jones industrials to within 62 points of the all-time high.  The continued rise in stock prices in the face of a slumping economy confounds some analysts.  David Bostian, president of Bostian Research Associates in New York, said he is advising clients, many of which are conservative pension funds, to reduce their exposure to equities to 10% of their portfolios from 20%.  He said his analysis suggests it's increasingly unlikely that the economy will achieve a "soft landing," modest economic growth with declining inflation and interest rates.  The drop in the fed funds rate below 9% Friday and expectations of further declines turned currency traders against the dollar.  Graham Broyd, a vice president at Manufacturers Hanover Trust Co., said that at the moment, "The currency markets are dominated by the fed funds rate."  The big drops in the dollar came early in the day in European and Far Eastern activity.  In major market activity:  Stock prices zoomed up in moderate trading.  Volume on the New York Stock Exchange totaled 166.7 million shares.  Advancing issues on the Big Board were ahead of losers, 1,054 to 490.  Bond prices rallied.  The yield on the Treasury's benchmark 30-year bond slid to 7.91%.  The dollar fell against other major currencies.  In late New York trading, the U.S. currency was quoted at 1.8648 marks and 136.95 yen, compared with 1.8805 marks and 139.20 yen late Friday.  LIN Broadcasting Corp. said its board is considering other options after its deadline for a merger agreement with McCaw Cellular Communications Inc. expired yesterday.  Several analysts expect LIN to proceed with plans to spin off its television operations or offer shareholders a high cash dividend.  McCaw recently lowered its bid for LIN to $110 a share, although LIN has been holding out for $127.50 a share, or $6.9 billion.  The two companies discussed the higher price last month, and LIN has rejected the current $5.9 billion offer as inadequate.  LIN shares yesterday closed at $109 in national over-the-counter trading.  McCaw, of Kirkland, Wash., is the nation's largest cellular-telephone operator.  It has been pursuing LIN's valuable cellular franchises in major cities.  The firms have been sparring since June 6, when McCaw began a hostile bid for the 90.2% of LIN's stock it doesn't already own.  The $110-a-share offer expires Aug. 11.  No other buyers have emerged.  "The onus is on LIN to make its stock worth more than McCaw's $110-a-share offer," said Jack Grubman, an analyst with PaineWebber Inc.  "One of the things I think they have to do is leverage themselves up and give out dividends of $50 a share or more."  Alvin Mirman, vice president of Gruntal & Co., agreed.  "I think in all probability LIN will go ahead with some major restructuring," he said.  "They may spin off their broadcasting properties," he added.  LIN previously proposed spinning off its seven TV stations into a separate company.  Company officials wouldn't comment on that possibility yesterday, except to say in a statement, "LIN's board of directors intends to pursue other options in order to protect and enhance stockholder values."  LIN's broadcasting properties could be "an attractive spinoff" with a value of about $1.3 billion, according to Mario Gambelli, chief investment officer for Gamco Investors.  He told Barron's magazine last week that if those properties were spun off without debt into a company with 50-odd million shares the shares would be valued at about $25 each and would trade on the open market for $15 to $16.  Without its stations, LIN might be even more attractive to buyers because suitors would face fewer regulatory hurdles, said Thomas Friedberg, an analyst in Seattle for Piper Jaffray & Hopwood, Minneapolis.  The remaining entity would include LIN's interest in cellular-phone systems in New York, Los Angeles, Philadelphia, Dallas-Fort Worth and Houston.  A subsequent option for the company, he said, would be to leverage itself up to acquire other cellular-telephone concerns.  "Management is in a very tough position," said Mr. Friedberg.  "If it does anything that can be construed as diminishing shareholder value there will probably be a lot of lawsuits."  Many of LIN's shares are held by institutions that want to see the company act soon, he said.  Consumer confidence last month matched its highest level in two decades, a monthly Conference Board survey shows.  The New York-based research concern said its consumer confidence index rose to 120.7 in July from a revised 117.2 in June.  The nonprofit industry-supported group uses 1985 as a base of 100 in the survey.  The level of 120.7 is equal to the February 1989 level, which was the highest since late 1969.  "The continued high level of consumer confidence despite signs that the economy may be slowing can be attributed to the strength of the particular economic circumstances which affect the daily life of the average citizen," said Fabian Linden, executive director of the board's consumer research center.  He pointed out that unemployment is hovering around 5% and that about 200,000 jobs are being created each month in the U.S. Declining interest rates and inflation that is "fluctuating between modest and barely visible" also contribute to the high level of confidence, Mr. Linden said.  In July, 31.8% of respondents said business conditions were good, compared with 28.3% in June.  Only 15.2% said conditions were bad, compared with 17.2% in June and 19.1% in July 1988.  The 5,000-household survey is conducted in the first two weeks of each month by National Family Opinion Inc., Toledo, Ohio.  On employment, however, more people said conditions were bad in the latest month, according to the board, and fewer said conditions were normal.  About the same amount said employment conditions were good in the two months.  Expectations for business conditions, employment and income moved in different directions between June and July.  Just 18.6% of the July respondents expect business conditions to improve in the next six months, compared with 20.1% in June.  The proportion of respondents expecting business conditions to worsen fell to 8.3% in July from 8.7% in June.  Expectations of future employment levels turned more positive in July, with 18.6% expecting levels to rise in the next six months, compared with 17.9% a month earlier.  Fewer people in July said employment levels would fall.  Income expectations were marginally less positive; in July, 26.8% said they would improve, while 27% said so in June.  Plans to buy cars ticked up a bit in July after a sharp drop the month before, as 7% said they would buy a car, compared with 6.7% in June.  Last July, 8.9% planned a car purchase.  Home purchase plans also improved slightly, as 3.7% said they expected to buy a home in the next six months, compared with 3.3% a month earlier.  In July 1988, 3.5% said they would buy a home.  Thirty percent of respondents said they plan to purchase a major appliance in the next six months, compared with 26.8% a month earlier.  West Germany's economy, often described as the motor of Europe, could begin slowing down in 1990 after a spurt of unexpected growth this year, according to a new forecast.  In a study of West German business trends, the Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development predicted that West Germany's gross national product would slow to an inflation-adjusted 2.75% growth rate in 1990 after expanding by a brisk 3.25% rate this year.  The 1989 rate was revised upward from the OECD's 3% forecast issued only last month.  In 1988, West German GNP expanded by 3.4%, the sharpest acceleration in West German business activity in a decade.  GNP measures a nation's total output of goods and services.  The OECD, whose regular economic forecasts are widely used by government policy-makers and business leaders, last year expected West German growth to slow to an anemic 1.75%, and other economists expected even worse.  An unusually mild winter intervened, allowing builders to work throughout the first quarter and giving the rest of the economy early momentum this year.  As business confidence swelled, West German industry tapped its vast cash holdings to buy new plants and equipment as companies expand in preparation for the integration of European markets after 1992.  In the second quarter, for example, West Germany's capital-goods industry reported a 27% rise in domestic orders for machinery and plant equipment from the year-earlier period.  Foreign machinery orders also poured in, rising 24% in the same period from a year ago.  The West German government is brimming with confidence.  Periodically criticized by U.S. officials for failing to enact economic-growth policies, Bonn declared at the summit of industrialized nations in Paris this month that it expects 3.5% growth this year, trumping expected U.S. economic growth this year of around 1.5%.  The 140-page OECD report had mostly praise for West Germany's economic policies, but urged a clear concept to reduce corporate tax rates to promote investment.  It praised this year's first significant drop in unemployment since the 1981-82 recession.  It predicted that West Germany's unemployment rate could ease to 7% next year from the 1988 average of 8.7%.  Yet it reprimanded Bonn for its slow progress in dismantling obstacles to growth, particularly in the services sector.  It cited high wage-and-benefit structures, rules on trade crafts and shop-closing hours, and transport and telecommunications regulations.  West Germany's economy will continue to thrive on foreign business next year, assuming that the Deutsche mark doesn't get too strong and that European trading partners' demand for West German imports continues to grow between 7% and 7.5%.  The OECD forecast a 1990 West German foreign trade surplus of $83 billion, after a 1989 surplus of $78 billion, reduced in dollar terms from $78.8 billion in 1988.  Similarly, the nation's current account balance, measuring trade, services and certain transfers, could swell to $53 billion in 1990 from $48 billion in the current year.  President Bush, citing constitutional objections, vetoed a congressional resolution adding conditions to an agreement with Japan on joint production of the FSX advanced jet fighter.  The veto means the project can go forward with only the conditions agreed upon previously by the administration and the Japanese government.  Opponents are unlikely to be able to muster the votes to override the veto.  While the resolution passed 72-27 in the Senate, the House vote was 262-155, short of the two-thirds required for an override.  Mr. Bush's veto, the second of his administration, was expected, in part because he has long complained about what he considers excessive congressional involvement in foreign policy.  His veto message said the resolution violates the separation of powers by injecting Congress into an area that is exclusively the president's: that of negotiating on behalf of the U.S. with foreign governments.  Mr. Bush also opposed a provision requiring the General Accounting Office, the investigative arm of the Congress, to report every 12 months on Japan's compliance with terms of the agreement.  He said the reports would constitute intelligence gathering, which he said is an inappropriate activity for the GAO.  Chiefly, however, Mr. Bush said the additional restrictions sought by the Congress are unnecessary and would tie his hands in other such negotiations.  He cited a provision barring Japan from selling or transferring any U.S.-designed technology, such as cockpit systems or engine technology.  He noted that the existing agreement with Japan bars such sales without U.S. consent.  Mr. Bush's veto stirred some strong reactions on Capitol Hill, where relations with lawmakers are already strained over differences in the defense budget and the tax on capital gains.  Some lawmakers, moreover, continue to complain that the production agreement could allow Japan to assist its domestic aerospace industry to the detriment of U.S. companies.  "When the administration enters into an agreement with a major trading partnerin this instance Japan -- that will make Japan a major trading competitor at the expense of hundreds of thousands of American jobs and billions of dollars of American wealth, I think it is time for the Congress to step in," said Sen. Alan Dixon (D., Ill.).  The strong language aside, Congress failed to pass a resolution specifically prohibiting the transaction.  And anti-Japan sentiment has cooled since the restrictive resolution was passed, especially now that Japan has been cited on other trade matters.  Moreover, the veto would come up for a vote as the Mideast situation is heating up and lawmakers may be more sensitive to Mr. Bush's insistence that the U.S. speak with one voice on foreign policy.  The vetoed measure would have written into law and in some cases toughened the wording of provisions in the negotiated agreement to protect American technology and ensure that American companies get 40% of the revenue from the project.  The resolution would have required the president to give the commerce secretary, who usually seeks to promote U.S. companies, a clear role in deciding details of the eventual production agreement for the FSX.  Mr. Bush's advisers, especially the National Security Council staff, objected to the stipulation.  In his veto message, Mr. Bush criticized Congress for such "micromanagement" of foreign affairs.  General Dynamics Corp. is the chief U.S. participant on the FSX project.  The Japanese counterpart is Mitsubishi Heavy Industries Ltd.  Inco Ltd. said it expects non-communist world nickel demand this year to roughly equal last year's record level of about 1.45 billion pounds with demand softening only slightly in 1990.  Donald Phillips, Inco's chairman, president and chief executive officer, said in an interview that world-wide "demand is still good" for the metal, particularly in Asia, though there are "signs of some easing" in the U.S., where Inco expects a gradual economic slowdown.  Inco, which accounts for about a third of Western world nickel supplies and ranks as the leading producer of the metal in the Western world, has in recent years reduced its reliance on the U.S., where it now sells about 25% of its output.  That's about equal to Japan's share and below that of Europe, where Inco sells 40% of its production.  As for 1990, Mr. Phillips said, "We don't see any dramatic change, a little less demand, a little more production," with nickel supplies remaining tight and inventories at low levels.  Fred Demler, a metals analyst with Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc., said world-wide nickel inventories currently total 82,000 metric tons, or about 6.7 weeks' supply, below the "equilibrium" level of eight weeks' supply.  Mr. Phillips said many stainless steel producers, who account for about 60% of nickel consumption, have "no pipeline inventory" currently and are buying nickel on a "hand-to-mouth" basis, keeping spot prices high and setting the stage for possible price increases if supplies are disrupted.  Mr. Phillips wouldn't offer a specific forecast for the rest of the year, but he said if orders remain firm through September, nickel prices "could be surprisingly strong in the fourth quarter," holding near current levels.  Inco realized an average of $5.97 a pound for its nickel during the second quarter, down about 9.4% from the first quarter, but 24% higher than its 1988 average of $4.81 a pound.  On the London Metal Exchange yesterday, nickel closed at $5.91 a pound in spot market dealings.  Mr. Phillips said Inco sees its strong earnings and debt-reduction performance so far in 1989 as a vindication of its controversial decision last fall to issue a special $1.06 billion, or $10-a-share, dividend.  At the time, many analysts and fund managers criticized Inco for taking on $750 million of additional debt to help fund the payout.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Inco shares closed at $30.75, up 25 cents.  One unfortunate consequence of federal expansion is that the bureaucracies often are distracted from their primary responsibilities.  Lawmakers constantly are finding new missions for federal agencies.  For most departments this diversion of effort is not of major consequence.  But when it happens to the Department of Defense, the primary function of the federal government, national security, is at risk.  The bureaucratic problems of the DOD are no secret even though, by most accounts, its pool of managerial talent is of higher quality than that in other federal departments.  There are long delays in developing weapons systems.  Costs often balloon and systems sometimes don't work well.  The Bradley fighting vehicle is an oftcited case.  Yet Congress seldom focuses on this problem, as it is demonstrating once again while grinding out a new defense authorization bill.  When it comes to weapons procurement, lawmakers often take a butterfly approach, lighting on expensive projects then flitting away, cutting back financing and sharply raising the cost of each weapon.  The Stealth bomber is getting that treatment now.  Instead of focusing on the problems caused by its spread-the-wealth approach to procurement, Congress has been compounding them.  The Pentagon has been drawn into what can only be called industrial policy, although few politicians are brave enough to call it that.  The DOD is being used to funnel federal money into various industry consortia, theoretically to make the U.S. more competitive against the Japanese.  For example, the DOD is helping fund Sematech, a semiconductor industry consortium that will try, if it ever gets untracked, to develop more advanced methods of producing microchips.  It never has been clear how Sematech could be expected to do a better job than, say, IBM, but that question didn't deter anyone.  Some corporate executives simply shrug and take the federal money, but complacency about this diversion of Pentagon financial and managerial resources isn't shared by everyone.  A lobbying group called Business Executives for National Security (BENS) is applying some political muscle to the task of getting the Pentagon back to its knitting.  Stanley A. Weiss, chief executive officer of an El Paso minerals-processing company called American Minerals Inc., started BENS seven years ago.  Mr. Weiss, a product of Georgetown's foreign-service school and a onetime fellow at Harvard's Center for International Affairs, wanted to bring influences to bear in every congressional district that would be counter to the normal quest for Pentagon pork.  Today, BENS has some 5,000 members with a wide range of political views but with a common desire to get better results from defense spending.  Among the members are J. Peter Grace, who ran the Grace Commission study of government waste, and Felix Rohatyn, the investment banker who figured out how to refinance New York after its virtual bankruptcy.  BENS has no position on industrial policy as such.  What Uncle Sam's role in "competitiveness" should be is a partisan issue.  "But where we have no problem coming down," says Mr. Weiss, "is that we think the Department of Defense should not be involved with it."  The Pentagon has quite enough problems just doing its job, Mr. Weiss thinks, without getting into trade, mergers and acquisitions, or other business issues where lawmakers are seeking influence.  BENS lobbied to get the Pentagon to set up a five-year spending plan, noting that a minimum requirement for a $300 billion enterprise should be a long-range business plan of some sort.  One thing learned: What the Pentagon figures it will need to spend in five years for programs now in the works far exceeds what the federal budget is likely to be able to accommodate.  That discovery made it imperative that some programs be dropped.  Secretary of Defense Richard Cheney proposed killing the F-14D fighter and the vertical takeoff troop carrier called the V-22 Osprey, only to have them voted back into being by the House at the expense of cutting back the Stealth bomber to a less economic level of funding.  At least the House was willing to kill one project, the Midgetman missile, but the latest exercise shows that defense authorization remains, at heart, a matter of distributing goodies.  Another BENS success was the creation of an office of independent operations testing in the Pentagon.  Mr. Weiss hopes to see that office strengthened so that it can, in practice as well as theory, challenge projects that are not going well.  Why, he asks, should the Bradley fighting vehicle have been 10 times more costly than its predecessor?  For one thing, Mr. Weiss theorizes, the Pentagon is not good at managing innovation.  Business, with its focus on markets and competition, is far more agile.  Things would work better, he says, if contractors took charge of innovation and the Pentagon bureacracy "filled in the squares," which is what bureaucracies do best.  One way of making that happen, says Mr. Weiss, is to spend the taxpayer's money up front to finance prototype competitions.  Indeed, the highly successful F16 fighter was developed that way.  The producer of the best prototype would then be awarded a production contract and held to contract commitments.  If the contractor failed, he would be allowed to go broke or, more likely, go into Chapter 11 reorganization.  If he made a better-than-expected profit he would be allowed to keep that money.  One of the worst mistakes Congress makes is trying to restrict contractor profits, thereby destroying incentives for good performance, Mr. Weiss thinks.  Contractors often are in an impossible position.  Their shareholders naturally want earnings.  Government contract managers fear they might look bad if the contractor makes too much money, even if the government saves money too through good results.  BENS is "trying to work out the kind of system that could best satisfy the concerns of a business and at the same time be best for the national good."  Of course, anti-contractor politics is rife in Washington.  Some is generated by forces that don't like either private business or military spending.  The Pentagon must "look tough," for the benefit of the critics while at the same time trying to actually get things done.  The "look tough" approach, backed up by reams of legislation, has had the upper hand almost to the point of self-parody.  There are some 500,000 people engaged in acquisitions in the DOD, trying to live by 30,000 pages of laws and rules.  Two-thirds of what the Pentagon buys could be off-the-shelf items, purchased in the market through competitive bidding.  You don't need 30 pages of specifications for a whistle, for example.  But open-market buying cuts the influence of politicians, which is why there is so little of it.  BENS, as it continues to build membership and influence, hopes to reduce such perverse influences.  The best "industrial policy" the federal government could have would be one that would reduce waste of resources by government itself.  There again, that entails keeping the political focus on the problems of government, rather than sending the DOD out to reshape American industry.  Lawmakers investigating the scandal at the Department of Housing and Urban Development strongly suggested that crimes, including perjury and conspiracy to violate federal regulations, probably were committed by former officials of the agency.  "We may be dealing with perjury," said Rep. Tom Lantos (D., Calif.), chairman of the House Government Operations housing subcommittee.  At a hearing, Mr. Lantos and other members of the panel focused on contradictions in the testimony of several witnesses who have appeared before the subcommittee, including former HUD Secretary Samuel Pierce, and in the 1987 congressional testimony of Mr. Pierce's powerful executive assistant Deborah Gore Dean.  In May, Mr. Pierce told the subcommittee that he didn't make funding decisions in a rent-subsidy program or overrule the recommendations of his staff.  But in testimony before the Senate Banking Committee in 1987, Ms. Dean said that Mr. Pierce made all decisions in the so-called moderate rehabilitation program.  "All funding decisions are made by the secretary," she testified.  "We do recommend to him areas of concern.  Many times we are overruled."  Former Sen. William Proxmire (D., Wis.), who heard Ms. Dean's 1987 testimony and appeared as a witness said: "Either he {Mr.  Pierce} did not state the facts or she {Ms.  Dean} did not."  Ms. Dean refused to testify before the subcommittee in June, citing her constitutional right against self-incrimination.  Mr. Pierce and Ms. Dean both have been unavailable for comment.  Another contradiction in testimony involved John Knapp, a former HUD general counsel, who recanted earlier statements made before the panel.  Earlier, he indicated that he had issued an oral legal opinion that lifted competitive, "fair-share" requirements for allocating HUD's scarce rent subsidies.  But yesterday, Mr. Knapp said he had never issued such an opinion and didn't know who, if anyone, might have.  Ms. Dean's influence over the allocation of moderate-rehabilitation funds greatly increased after the department stopped adhering to fair-share requirements, committee investigators and HUD documents disclose.  Recently released HUD documents also show that in 1985, Mr. Knapp unsuccessfully sought a promotion to be HUD's undersecretary and that Ms. Dean lobbied for him.  Rep. Bruce Morrison (D., Conn.) suggested that HUD officials who circumvented competitive requirements without legal authority and instead used political considerations to award funds may have conspired to break the law.  Mr. Knapp reluctantly agreed.  Lawmakers also were critical of former Federal Housing Commissioner Maurice Barksdale, another witness before the panel yesterday.  They questioned whether Mr. Barksdale, after leaving HUD, should have lent $2,000 to a HUD deputy assistant secretary, Dubois Gilliam.  Before the loan, Mr. Gilliam had dealt with a St. Louis housing project in which Mr. Barksdale's employer had an interest.  Mr. Gilliam, who is no longer at HUD, pleaded guilty in federal court here to accepting $8,100 in illegal gratuities and in a separate case, is under federal indictment in Biloxi, Miss., for allegedly using his influence to steer HUD grant money to a contractor in Jackson, Miss.  "I agonized over it {the loan to Mr. Gilliam}" Mr. Barksdale testified.  "In hindsight, perhaps it was not the correct thing to do."  Mr. Barksdale estimated that he has earned $300,000 as a consultant on nine HUD projects since leaving government.  He was also rebuked for authorizing a recent fund-raising letter that was sent to local housing officials, urging them to contribute to the legal defense fund of another indicted former HUD official.  Mr. Knapp also came in for criticism.  In 1985, the Office of Government Ethics assailed HUD's compliance with federal ethics laws, which came under Mr. Knapp's purview as general counsel.  Rep. Charles Schumer (D., N.Y.) yesterday suggested that Mr. Knapp return part of his government salary because of his lax performance as his agency's ethics officer.  "I am disappointed at myself," Mr. Knapp conceded.  A buy-out group led by Kohlberg & Co. said it controls about 88% of Colorado Prime Corp. as of last Friday's expiration of its $17-a-share offer for the Farmingdale, N.Y., direct marketer.  Colorado Prime has about 4.7 million shares outstanding.  Closing is expected in late September.  The court-appointed examiner in the Public Service Co. of New Hampshire Chapter 11 bankruptcy case recommended that the company be given until Aug. 31 to file an amended reorganization plan that has the support of creditors and shareholders.  Paul L. Gioia, the examiner, noted in his report that the troubled utility has been building a "consensus" among various parties for an internal reorganization plan that would value the company at $2.2 billion.  Such a plan, similar to one suggested by Mr. Gioia to break the stalemate in the negotiations, would require rate increases of 5.9% annually for three years and 5.5% annually for another five years.  However, Mr. Gioia noted that New Hampshire state officials have indicated their opposition to the proposal because they consider the rate increases too high.  State officials last week endorsed a revised proposal by Northeast Utilities, of Hartford, Conn., to buy PS of New Hampshire for about $1.9 billion; Northeast's plan would require seven annual rate increases of 5.5%.  Bankruptcy Court Judge James Yacos earlier gave the company the exclusive right to negotiate a reorganization plan with various parties until Aug. 11, when the court will meet to consider Mr. Gioia's recommendations.  Mr. Gioia also recommended that any parties interested in acquiring PS of New Hampshire "be assured of a fair and equal opportunity to submit acquisition proposals" that would compete with an internal reorganization plan.  In addition to Northeast Utilities, New England Electric Service has said it plans to make a second, improved proposal for assets of PS of New Hampshire.  PS of New Hampshire, which owes creditors some $1.72 billion, filed for bankruptcy-court protection in January 1988 because of problems related to its 35.6% stake in the long-delayed Seabrook, N.H., nuclear-power plant.  Under Chapter 11 of the federal Bankruptcy Code, a company operates under protection from creditors' lawsuits while it works out a plan to pay its debts.  Separately, PS of New Hampshire reported a second-quarter loss of $3.5 million compared with net income of $9.7 million, or 22 cents a share, in the year-earlier period, on a slight decline in revenue to $132.8 million from $135.2 million.  The company took a charge of $16 million in the 1989 second quarter because of expected pre-operational expenses related to Seabrook; it currently expects Seabrook to begin operating in March 1990, instead of Jan. 1 as previously forecast.  A former manager of Merrill Lynch & Co. was arraigned Saturday in criminal court here, charged with stealing $30,000 in bearer bonds.  Jose Benabe, 42 years old, was a section manager and custodian for the securities firm in 1986 and 1987, according to a news release from Manhattan District Attorney Robert M. Morgenthau.  The prosecutor alleged that Mr. Benabe used his position to order that computer records be falsified to conceal his theft of the securities.  A friend of Mr. Benabe cashed the bonds and turned the proceeds over to him, Mr. Morgenthau said.  The friend hasn't been charged with any crime, but the investigation is continuing, the district attorney's office said.  Mr. Benabe couldn't be reached for comment.  An investigation by the New York City Police Department's Special Frauds Squad and statements Mr. Benabe made indicate that the total amount stolen is more than $700,000 and may be as much as $1 million, Mr. Morgenthau said.  Bearer bonds aren't registered to a particular individual and proceeds can be paid to whomever presents them for redemption.  Mr. Benabe was arraigned on charges of third-degree grand larceny and third-degree criminal possession of stolen property.  He was held on $50,000 bail; Judge Edward McLaughlin adjourned the case to Wednesday.  A Merrill Lynch spokesman said the firm cooperated fully with the authorities and that no customers were affected.  TV or not TV?  That was the question.  The answer trumpeted by the New York State Board of Regents in June was a resounding, unanimous "no," banning Whittle Communications' Channel One (and all other commercially sponsored television programs) from public schools.  The board's action, which followed California's decision not to reimburse schools for the time during which commercials are aired, raised doubt about the venture's viability.  A decade ago I would have cheered.  As a high-school English teacher, I worried that in my students' eyes -- glazed from too many hours in front of the tube -- Huckleberry Finn was no match for the Fonz.  But that was before I attended a provocative workshop sponsored by the National Council of Teachers of English.  It was taught by a teacher who shocked his colleagues by confessing right from the top that he actually likes (gasp) TV.  Not just "educational" programs, mind you, but the whole gamut] Unrepentant, he boldly asserted that there's nothing inherently wrong with students -- or teachers -- who share his passion.  We frowned until he added that there is something wrong with the way many people watch.  We nodded as one, eager to learn their sin.  All too often, he continued, viewing is purposeless, undirected and continuous.  That's the problem.  The solution, then, is not to wage a hopeless war on the medium.  It's to teach our students how to become critical, selective viewers who watch to be informed as well as entertained.  In his own home, the teacher had established one rule.  There must be a reason for watching.  If not, off it goes.  A few weeks earlier, his young daughter had sauntered up and asked, "Why are you watching the football game, Daddy?"  Not quite sure who was playing, he began a tortured explanation that he dropped in mid-sentence.  His daughter had already switched it off.  At school, he assigned programs he knew most of his students watched anyway and planned lessons to integrate them.  Was there anything heroic about the Fonz?  How did he compare with the heroes in their readings?  These exercises evolved into a "Valuable Viewing" guide that he prepared and distributed to his students each week.  Along with about a dozen recommendations (including one or two "educational" broadcasts), the guide provided questions for students to consider while viewing.  The sample the teacher handed out at the workshop, for example, contained this note on MASH: "Alan Alda is normally a pacifist, but in this episode he is moved to violence.  Is the situation which causes Hawkeye to act in an uncustomary manner sufficiently developed to allow us to accept his behavior?"  Students loved it.  And the teacher discovered they weren't alone.  Occasionally he was too busy to prepare a guide.  He was flooded with phone calls.  Where is it?  Why didn't I get one?  The irate consumers weren't his students; they were parents.  Unfortunately, the Board of Regents didn't attend this workshop.  In banning the 12-minute news broadcasts from the classroom, the board rejected more than an opportunity to obtain free televisions, video equipment and satellite dishes offered by Whittle -- equipment that could be used for a variety of educational purposes.  They also passed up a chance to present students with a positive model of engaged, directed television viewing.  Their reason?  Commercials.  But the Board of Regents doesn't seem to understand that even these can be used for education.  Whittle insists students watch two minutes of commercials that accompany the broadcasts.  The company has nothing to say about what happens afterward, however.  English teachers have long used printed advertising when they teach argumentative writing.  Ads provide a catalog of persuasive techniques that can be analyzed in class -- an exercise increasingly valuable as advertisements, especially TV commercials, play an ever more prominent role in politics.  It's time we recognized that television is educational, whether or not we like what it teaches.  The average teen-ager watches more than three hours a day, according to Nielsen.  The longer educators ignore that, hoping it will go away, the less likely children -- or their parents -- will learn to use the medium intelligently.  ---  Mr. Hechler is a free-lance writer living in New York.  The Wall Street Journal's ravening editorialists, famished after nine years of defending corporate hijackers, military procurement racketeers and Reagan-Bush scoundrels, finally worked up an appetite, sharpened their beaks and pecked away ("Kings of the Trough," July 7).  The Journal is atwitter that I, together with virtually the entire Armed Services Committee, refused to authorize $500 million to build a new NATO base in Italy rather than forcing our allies to shoulder more of the cost.  Had the Journal sent a reporter to the committee markup, rather than an editorialist masquerading as a reporter, your readers might have learned that the amendment was offered by a Republican and was adopted without opposition.  Your readers also might have learned that the amendment would save the American taxpayers upward of $250 million.  Rep. Pat Schroeder (D., Colo.)  Washington  ---  Contrary to your assertions, the House Armed Services Committee restoration of the V-22 Osprey program was an act of responsibility to American taxpayers.  Based on the advice of Pentagon budget crunchers, Secretary Richard Cheney recommended the elimination of the V-22 program and proposed that we fulfill the mission of that aircraft with existing helicopters.  While the alternatives cost less than the V-22 this year, they represent savings only to the shortsighted.  Ultimately, the American public will pay up to $8.5 billion more for an inferior fleet of antiquated aircraft.  Unfortunately, the deceptive numbers game that Pentagon pencil pushers are playing with the V-22 program may be the least cause for concern.  More sobering is the fact that the proposed V-22 alternatives are militarily inadequate.  Given a defined military need and the choice between the revolutionary V-22 aircraft and the costly, risky alternatives to meet it, the Armed Services Committee had a responsibility to restore funding for the Osprey.  Rep. Curt Weldon. (R., Pa.)  Washington  ---  It is poor public policy to terminate three of the Navy's most effective aircraft along with the company that builds them, locking the Navy into total reliance on next-generation aircraft of unproven design and questionable affordability.  With the potential for reduction of U.S. troops around the world, the need for naval air power is even greater.  It is puzzling then that the Pentagon recently cut some of the naval air "punch" by calling for fewer aircraft in each air wing.  Could it be an attempt to mask the shortages?  The gutting of naval aviation is irreversible because Grumman builds the four aircraft that are in shortage and the Cheney budget puts Grumman out of business.  This eliminates competition, leaving the Navy with only one major company actively building naval aircraft, McDonnell Douglas Corp.  Rep. George J. Hochbrueckner (D., N.Y.)  Washington  ---  Funding the F-14D keeps Grumman in a position to offer competitive alternatives for future naval aircraft.  Experience has shown that competition is necessary to produce the weapons systems we need at the costs we can afford.  W.B. Jones  Vice President, Public Affairs  Grumman Corp.  Bethpage, N.Y.  The Commodity Futures Trading Commission fined the commodities unit of Salomon Inc. $4 million -- the agency's largest fine ever -- for allegedly fraudulent trading in cocoa-futures contracts from 1981 until 1984.  In a settlement with the CFTC, the unit, Philipp Brothers Inc., agreed to pay the fine without admitting or denying the allegations.  Philipp Brothers had said it originally brought the trading problems to the attention of the CFTC after an internal investigation, and had fired the employees responsible in 1984.  The CFTC didn't dispute that yesterday.  "We won't comment on how we start investigations," said Dennis Klejna, the CFTC's enforcement chief.  "I will say they have provided cooperation."  Nonetheless, Mr. Klejna said the regulatory agency imposed the large fine partly because the violations continued for so long.  "It was a lot of wrongdoing over a long period of time," he said.  The CFTC also charged in the scheme five former traders of Philipp Brothers or its affiliates.  None of the five settled.  Providing details of the charges for the first time, the CFTC said the traders working for Philipp Brothers bought and sold about 100,000 futures contracts for commercial customers without actually executing the orders on an exchange floor or completing the transactions through an exchange member.  That practice is called "bucketing" and is illegal because brokers may arrange trades for customers at a higher price than a market open to all bidders would produce.  The CFTC said Philipp Brothers earned about $1,650,000 in commissions on the trades.  But it didn't say whether Philipp Brothers then tried to earn more by buying the contracts itself at lower prices to sell to customers at unfairly high prices.  The highest fine the CFTC had previously imposed was $1.5 million on Conti-Commodity Services Inc. for allegedly manipulating silver prices in 1979 and 1980 in connection with the Hunt brothers' purported attempt to corner the silver market, and for allegedly faulty record-keeping and false statements to customers in sugar trading.  The company paid the fine in a 1986 settlement.  In a statement, Philipp Brothers said, "The settlement regards trading activities that were directed by Philipp Brothers' London-based cocoa merchants operation from the time it was acquired in 1981 until the summer of 1984.  This period was prior to Philipp Brothers coming under control of present management. . . .  No present employees of the company were involved."  Asked whether the relatively large fine was a signal that the CFTC is concerned that such practices may be common, a spokesman said, "We don't think this is pervasive.  But you can see that a major firm did this for a long time.  By its nature it's hard to detect because it involves actions occurring off the exchange."  The former employees of Philipp Brothers or its affiliates named in the administrative complaint yesterday were Anthony H.D. Weldon of London; Daniel Tulig of Sparta, N.J.; Peter Gilliam of Surrey, England; Esther Lander Greenfield of Monsey, N.Y.; and Mark Glowatz of East Meadow, N.Y.  They couldn't be reached immediately for comment.  The Cabbage Patch Kids are trying to make a comeback.  Hasbro, which acquired them and a few other product lines from Coleco Industries earlier this year for about $85 million, is gambling that there's still a lot of steam left in the cuddly dolls.  The toymaker is planning a giant reintroduction of the Kids in September in the hope of restoring them to their former glory.  The Cabbage Patch Kids craze -- who can forget it? -- hit its zenith in 1985, raking in nearly $600 million in sales that year for Coleco.  Demand was so great that anxious parents battled each other at shopping malls nationwide, and there was even a Cabbage Patch store on Manhattan's Fifth Avenue.  But like all fads, Cabbage Patch Kids quickly ran out of gas, and today it's hard to find a four year old who even knows what they are.  Hasbro thinks it's positioned to change all that.  "We fully believe it has the potential to become our No. 2 selling brand," says Al Carosi, senior vice president of marketing services at Hasbro.  An ambitious goal indeed.  Sales of Cabbage Patch Kids have been in sharp decline since 1985.  Analysts predict they will bring in about $30 million to $40 million this year.  Not bad for a toy, but nowhere near Hasbro's No. 1 champ, G.I. Joe, which delivers about $200 million.  Moreover, Hasbro is planning to ride on the laurels of the dolls' original success.  The company plans, for example, to resurrect the adoption feature that was such a hit with kids.  But some marketing experts question whether recycling old themes will be enough to make Cabbage Patch Kids a stable performer like G.I. Joe or Mattel's Barbie.  Kransco Group tried to do just that last year with an ad campaign aimed at revitalizing the Hula Hoop.  But the craze, most analysts agree, never reignited.  To add to Hasbro's challenge, Coleco left the Cabbage Patch Kids franchise in a colossal mess.  Coleco, which is in Chapter 11 bankruptcy-court proceedings, ceased distributing the dolls widely and terminated all advertising and marketing programs about 18 months ago.  Hasbro and Griffin Bacal, the New York ad agency that was recently awarded the account, are faced with a new generation of young consumers who haven't been exposed to the Kids.  Griffin Bacal's first TV commercials, which are being shot in Ireland this week, seek to combat that problem.  Mr. Carosi says the $7 million campaign will stress the qualities that made the product a hot seller in the first place: the adoption factor (the idea that every Cabbage Patch doll "needs" a kid) and the uniqueness of each product (no two dolls are identical).  "In the later years, Coleco walked away from those two things, and we think that was a mistake," he says.  "We're taking Cabbage Patch back to its heritage."  But marketing consultants warn that may not be enough to grab and hold the attention of consumers.  "They've got to breathe some new life into the product," says Gary Stibel, principal at New England Consulting Group in Westport, Conn.  "Hasbro will need to identify what enhancements to the collection are still available to make the bells ring."  Mr. Stibel says one thing Cabbage Patch desperately needs is a story that children can associate with the dolls.  To bring a personality to the dolls, it would be wise to develop a family or a central group of characters, he says, much like that of the Barbie doll.  She has a pal, Midge, and a boyfriend, Ken.  "With Cabbage Patch, there are all kinds of possibilities," he says, adding it might mean developing new varieties of dolls, like Cabbage Patch adults or Cabbage Patch animals.  "Cabbage Patch is a wonderful brand name," Mr. Stibel says.  "There's a lot of equity here.  It is limited only by the creativity of the people who'll relaunch it."  Mr. Carosi insists Hasbro has made some advances in the area of line extensions.  The company is readying Sippin' Cabbage Patch, a variety where the doll appears to drink when a child puts a bottle in its mouth.  After a swig, Mr. Carosi says, the doll burps.  And then there's the Designer Cabbage Patch line that features dolls dressed in trendy fashions.  Executives at Griffin Bacal say the challenge of reintroducing a fading toy isn't new to them.  The agency worked with Hasbro in designing the marketing plan that successfully relaunched G.I. Joe in the early 1980s, the toy that is Hasbro's top performer today.  In that case, however, the product got more than fresh ads.  The original doll, a 12-inch mannequin that lost its luster in the early 1970s, was reintroduced as a more hip 3 3/4-inch action figure in 1982.  "We want Cabbage Patch Kids to be forever," says Paul Kurnit, the agency's president.  "The Cabbage Patch concept is wonderful and has a right to be a forever product," he says.  Still, marketing experts caution Hasbro in managing profit expectations for the brand.  "If they go into this with the expectation that they will be able to reignite the euphoria of 1985, they're mistaken," says Marc Particelli, senior vice president at consultants Booz-Allen & Hamilton in New York.  "They will be lucky to build this up to a smaller, stable business."  ---  Ad Notes. . . .   NEW ACCOUNT: Safeway Stores Inc., Oakland, Calif., awarded its $5 million account for its Seattle division to Stanton Bondo & Co., Seattle.  The account was previously handled by Chuck Snyder Advertising, Seattle.  RADIO ON TV: National Public Radio, the nonprofit organization of public radio stations, will use TV for the first time to advertise two news programs.  Two animated commercials, developed by ad agency Soghigian & Macuga, Washington, D.C., promote "Morning Edition" and "All Things Considered."  Myerson & Kuhn said that three of its bankruptcy-law partners have quit after less than five months to join Milgrim Thomajan & Lee.  Bankruptcy-law specialists Leon Marcus, Peter Wolfson and Barry Burten are scheduled to join Milgrim today, according to the general counsel at Maxicare Health Plans Inc., Alan Bloom.  Messrs.  Marcus, Wolfson and Burten were three of at least seven Myerson & Kuhn partners handling Maxicare's reorganization, which is expected to generate $6 million in billings this year, Mr. Bloom said.  Mr. Bloom said Maxicare, based in Los Angeles, will continue to use the three partners in their new law firm.  "No way we can lose the services of these three attorneys," he said, adding that Myerson & Kuhn partner Alan Gelb has failed to convince him that Maxicare should stay exclusively with his firm.  Mr. Bloom says he met with the three partners last week in his offices in Los Angeles.  Mr. Burten left Shea & Gould's Los Angeles office last March to join Myerson & Kuhn, which was formed in January 1988.  Messrs.  Marcus and Wolfson were former partners at Booth Marcus & Pierce, a New York bankruptcy boutique that merged with Myerson & Kuhn last April.  None of the three could be reached for comment.  Myerson & Kuhn, which was formed from the ashes of Finley, Kumble, Wagner, Heine, Underberg, Manley, Myerson & Casey, has been troubled by a spate of recent defections.  Early this month, corporate partners Gerald Eppner, Paul Tang and Richard Green left to join Reid & Priest, a New York firm.  Prior to that, the 21-lawyer Stadtmauer and Bailkin real estate group dissolved its three-month merger with the firm.  Daniel Cooper, a partner at Myerson & Kuhn, contended that the most recent departure "represents sort of the cleaning up of the two dissident groups {headed by Messrs.  Marcus and Eppner} that had developed."  Mr. Cooper added that Myerson & Kuhn still has partner Arthur Ruegger as lead litigator on the Maxicare case.  "Our expectations are that there will be some joint effort," he said.  Actor Telly Savalas grips the wheel of a dirt-spattered Mustang as it sloshes through shallow water, towed by a flatbed camera truck.  Crew members for the TV movie "Hollywood Detective" follow Mr. Savalas on foot.  They are stepping very carefully, as if on ice, just as actors James Whitmore and James Arness did near this downtown location 35 years ago while searching for the lair of giant ants in the science-fiction classic, "Them]"  No mutant ants are in sight today.  The cause for caution has to do with the location: the murky bed of the Los Angeles River, site of countless Hollywood films.  Because this is L.A., it shouldn't come as much of a surprise that even the city's river, with little water, is paved for most of its course with concrete.  A trench for the river and for treated sewer-system effluent runs down the center and sometimes overflows onto the concrete bed, creating the muck hazard for film crews.  It was once a real river, abounding with steelhead trout and frogs.  But because it sometimes got a bit wild, it was tamed by a reservoir system -- built after a 1938 flood that took 50 lives.  Now more of a trench than a river, it is the focus of a struggle over its future course.  This fun-loving, traffic-congested city may finally have to decide what it wants its river to be: wasteland, waterway -- or expressway.  State legislator Richard Katz, from nearby Panorama City, believes the time has come to consider using part of the river as a 30-mile-long commuter expressway from the San Fernando Valley to just south of downtown.  Besides allowing commuters a quick way in and out of the city, the road might allow travelers to bypass the city's infamous congestion without having to cut through, say, Denver.  Others would rather turn back the clock and have a real river again.  "This is a desert," notes writer Lewis MacAdams, walking along the bank near Frogtown, a community north of downtown that still has lots of water and frogs in the riverbed.  "You'd think people here would worship water.  Instead, they treat it like an enemy."  Co-founder of an environmental group called Friends of the Los Angeles River, Mr. MacAdams is tired of the jokes about the concrete river.  He points to the unpaved Frogtown riverbed as a sample of what was and what could be.  For a lush, two-mile stretch of dense marsh, the concrete stops because the high water table would entail constant repaving.  The forces of Mayor Tom Bradley, among others, believe that the expressway idea just doesn't hold any water.  They suggest releasing more effluent from two nearby sewage treatment plants and using inflatable dams to create artificial ponds for rafting and other recreation.  "I assume they're kidding about that," scoffs Mr. Katz, the backer of the expressway idea.  "I don't think many people would want to go rafting in treated water," he says.  Deputy Mayor Mike Gage says the treated water is "absolutely fine" except when the city's 700 storm drains overflow into the riverbed.  "They tend to be fairly polluted," he concedes.  Ideally, he says, the mayor would like to clean out the drains and beautify the riverbanks for hiking and biking.  The project could take a decade or two.  Formed by the merging of the Calabasas and Bell creeks in the San Gabriel Mountains northwest of here, the river winds from the San Fernando Valley, past Griffith Park and Dodger Stadium, through downtown Los Angeles and past industrial communities such as Compton and Bell before unburdening itself into San Pedro Bay and the Pacific Ocean.  It was once vigorous and unpredictable, regularly laying waste to vast areas.  Still, paving the waterway beyond recognition was a hard sell for the Army Corps of Engineers, until the flood of 1938.  Now held at bay by three reservoirs, the river is the main artery of a 100-mile-long system of concrete channels that cost $370 million to build.  The cemented, sloped riverbed is 45 to 300 feet wide.  The channel down the middle, from two to 39 feet wide, is several feet deep, carrying 60 million gallons of treated water per day.  The overflow reaches the outer banks of the concrete in some places, while other sections of concrete are left completely dry.  "It's an amazing thing they've built here," marvels actor Rod McCary during the TV movie filming.  Some rivers have cafes and romantic walkways lining their banks.  This river has railroad tracks, warehouses and barbed wire to ward off mischief.  No chance of gondolas or ferryboats here, just a few ducks, scattered debris and plenty of grafitti.  Also, plenty of camera crews.  With its majestically arched bridges in the background, the downtown section of the riverbed has been used in many films such as "Grease" and for TV shows and commercials.  It often masquerades as a freeway or city street for car-crunching chase scenes.  The filming fee of $300 a day is relatively cheap, and access is gained easily through long, tunneled ramps.  The river has other uses, too.  Toyota test-drives new cars there.  Student bus drivers learn to back up in the river.  Bicycles, motorcycles and skateboards go rollin' on the river too.  Pilots have made emergency landings in it.  Victims of murder, accident and suicide sometimes turn up there.  During the rare rainy periods, when the river's at its roiliest and Angelenos stop their cars to watch and marvel at its transformation, cars and people have been swept away to the ocean.  Someone once tried surfing, but wiped out and had to be rescued.  It has been several years since the last such flooding.  These days, some call the Los Angeles River home.  Take Daniel Adams, who camps in what at first appears to be a six-foot-wide tunnel several feet up the sloped bank.  It is one of the river's "transverse sill stabilizers," situated every 3,000 feet to impede those occasional flood waters.  They penetrate the bank in the shape of triangles, as if someone has removed a huge slice of pie.  Mr. Adams resides with three shopping carts in a tunnel leading into the river near Sixth Street.  "There's something about the sound of running water," he says.  "It just gives you peace of mind."  Unless, of course, there is another flood.  Few Angelenos remember the days of trout, frogs and red-winged blackbirds along the river.  In 1920, says 77-year-old Joe McGuigan of Laguna Niguel, Calif., the river was as clear and as cold as a mountain stream.  He fished and skinnydipped in the river.  "Sometimes, snakes would come slithering down the river, quite often with fish in their jaws," he recalls.  Like many, Mr. McGuigan considers the river wasted space today.  An expressway, he says, isn't a bad idea.  A center channel could continue to carry the effluent, under this plan.  And the expressway could be closed in those rare periods of flooding.  County transportation officials are spending $100,000 to study the costs of the expressway, saying traffic alternatives are dwindling.  Deputy Mayor Gage, who publicly dismisses the expressway idea as "ludicrous," says the mayor's office is working on its own study.  In Frogtown, where groups of wild ducks swim unaware that their home is awash in controversy, Mr. MacAdams still believes the river will get by with a little help from its friends.  Walking near the noisy Southern Pacific train yards, he points out that the buildings all have their backs turned toward the river, as if in embarrassment.  "The river's not going to go away," he says.  "No matter what people do or say.  It can be ugly, or it can be beautiful.  But the water's going to keep on flowing."  Corporations have been taking it on the chin lately in court decisions that hold the companies, rather than their insurers, responsible for toxic-waste cleanup.  In the past month, Technicon Electronics Corp. and Diamond Shamrock Chemicals Co. have been denied insurance coverage for such cleanups.  And last December, a jury found Shell Oil Co. -- and not its insurers -- liable for an estimated $1 billion cleanup of a toxic-waste site near Denver.  While delighting the winners, the decisions have been criticized by others because they turn on narrow issues of contract and insurance law rather than on any coherent vision of how to pay for a nationwide toxic-waste cleanup.  The current approach, however, is supported by environmentalists because of its inherent anti-pollution incentives.  The stakes are enormous: The bill now coming due for years of pollution is expected to approach $100 billion.  And there's a growing sense among participants in the high-stakes insurance battles -- including some judges, lawyers and industry executives -- that the courtroom is not the best place to decide who should bear most of the cost.  The Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation and Liability Act of 1980, commonly known as Superfund, was designed to set the rules.  Under Superfund, those who generated, transported or stored hazardous waste are liable for its cleanup, regardless of whether their actions were legal at the time they took place.  However, it soon became evident that corporations alone were unable to handle the cost of cleaning the nation's waste sites.  So they undertook a hugely expensive legal effort to compel their insurance carriers to help foot the bill instead.  Corporate policyholders argue in their suits against the insurance carriers that the policyholders paid millions of dollars in comprehensive general-liability insurance premiums to protect themselves against business risks.  And they say the carriers, who accepted the premiums, also accepted the risks -- and must now pay the price.  The insurance industry counters that general-liability policies were never intended to cover the cleanup of pollution released gradually into the environment.  In addition, argues David Ichel of Simpson, Thacher & Bartlett, an insurance lawyer, intentional polluters are barred from insurance protection, which is designed to cover accidental calamities only.  The insurers have won some key early rounds but have lost on some issues as well.  With many courts simultaneously considering the same basic issues in numerous states, it's likely that the results will continue to be inconsistent.  Moreover, say lawyers involved in the legal fights, the decisions are resting less on good policy than on legal niceties, such as interpretations of the precise wording of the insurance agreements and legal precedents that took shape long before the term toxic waste was coined.  U.S. District Judge J. Frederick Motz expressed frustration about being bound by such narrow considerations in his June 20 ruling denying Allied-Signal Inc. insurance coverage for the cleanup of two toxic-waste sites in Maryland.  Judge Motz wrote that he was bound by precedents set by a federal appeals court and thus had to rule against Allied-Signal on the ground that government-ordered cleanups are not covered by insurance.  But he nonetheless said that, as a matter of logic and policy, there was something to be said for the argument that an insurer that collects huge premiums on general-liability policies should share in the waste-cleanup costs.  Robert Bates of Phelan, Pope & John, a lawyer for an insurance company in a coverage dispute with Diamond Shamrock, notes that judges in these cases often become frustrated.  Bound by legal rules, they aren't always in a position to weigh the advantage of placing responsibility squarely on polluters against the risk that the price of the cleanup will wipe out the offending corporation.  And they are in no position to rule that neither party should bear the entire burden.  One alternative approach that is gaining advocates is a no-fault system that would permit the costs to be shared.  Such a system is particularly appropriate in this instance, says Peter Huber, a senior fellow with the Manhattan Institute, because at the time the dumping began few people were aware of the dangers posed by toxic waste.  "When costs arise from a change in mores, we need to share the costs," he said.  The law has traditionally followed what Harvard Law School professor Morton Horwtiz describes as the "individualist" approach that holds each individual -- or corporate entity -- accountable for his own behavior.  But Mr. Horwitz agrees that the current crisis calls for a newer approach, known as loss spreading.  Loss spreading is based on the premise that everyone shared the benefits of industrialization and everyone must now share its costs.  At a speech to the National Press Club in Washington last March, Maurice Greenberg, chairman of American International Group Inc., a multinational insurer, took a step in this direction by urging the creation of a National Environmental Trust Fund.  The trust fund would be used to pay for the cleanup of old waste sites where no evidence existed that pollution regulations had been violated at the time.  In other instances, polluters would be liable, Mr. Greenberg said.  Funding for the program would come through a separate fee added to all commercial and industrial property-casualty insurance premiums.  Corporations that are self-insured would also make some form of monetary contribution.  Most pollution, Mr. Greenberg declared at the time, is not the result of deliberate acts but "the residue of progress" as the U.S. became industrialized.  "The insurance industry did not provide coverage for gradual pollution," Mr. Greenberg said in a later interview.  "But companies did not believe they were doing anything wrong."  Supporters of the fund -- including chemical manufacturers and insurers -- are trying to mobilize congressional support by 1991, when Superfund must be reauthorized.  A congressional staffer working on the issue said the proposal has received considerable attention but would likely be opposed by environmental groups who favor the current approach because it provides strong incentives against future pollution and holds past polluters accountable.  He added that the mood of the current administration also favors individually funded cleanups.  In the meantime, both sides are faced with prolonged litigation.  For American International's Mr. Greenberg, that means the prospect of more "funds being used for litigation instead of for cleaning up the sites."  Speaker Jim Wright and Whip Tony Coelho are gone from the House, but the network of influential contributors they assembled has become an enduring feature of U.S. politics.  The case of Richard Swann shows how it works and what a baleful influence it may have on government.  Mr. Swann, an Orlando, Fla., lawyer and thrift owner, popped up briefly in the inquiry into Speaker Wright, and was quickly forgotten when a cursory House Ethics Committee investigation found nothing wrong in the two men's dealings.  Indeed, there has been no suggestion that what Mr. Swann has done is illegal.  But he and his law firm, Swann & Haddock, are famous in Florida for their political influence.  His deal with Mr. Wright, a real-estate development near Orlando that earned the speaker about $50,000, is small potatoes compared with Mr. Swann's impact on state government.  That is precisely the point of the Wright affair.  The damage comes from the kind of behavior that is condoned and found "appropriate," not from the deeds that are censured.  House Ethics Committee Special Counsel Richard Phelan detailed the damage that Messrs.  Wright and Coelho did to the S&L industry by pressuring the regulators to go easy on their large contributors.  These two bear much of the responsibility for turning a $20 billion thrift problem into a $300 billion national disaster, costing $1,250 for every man, woman and child in the U.S. Yet the Ethics Committee refused to endorse its counsel's finding of "undue influence."  Mr. Swann's career in Florida shows where this influence can lead.  No other state leaves its banks, thrifts, insurance companies, credit unions and HMOs so exposed to the political pull of campaign contributions.  All financial regulation lies in the hands of two elected state officers -- the comptroller, who also supervises banks and thrifts, and the insurance commissioner, who also serves as state treasurer.  During the past decade Comptroller Gerald Lewis and then-Insurance Commissioner Bill Gunter turned their posts into a powerful joint fund-raising apparatus.  Friends like Richard Swann played a crucial role, "bundling" contributions from allies and clients who sometimes had business pending before the regulators.  According to one former fund-raiser, the system was so well coordinated that a bank could contribute to the insurance commissioner and an insurance company could contribute to the comptroller to avoid improper appearances.  Mr. Swann came to prominence in this system as Jimmy Carter's most important Florida fund-raiser, collecting about $1 million for Mr. Carter in both 1976 and 1980.  He sponsored lavish political barbecues at his Orlando home.  One guest remembers a helicopter shuttling a stream of federal dignitaries from the airport to Mr. Swann's lawn.  In 1976, Mr. Swann backed his friend Bill Gunter, a former congressman from north Florida, in a successful campaign for state insurance commissioner.  Mr. Swann became known as Mr. Gunter's alter ego.  According to former associates, the connection fostered the rapid growth of his law firm.  Mr. Swann also took control of a troubled insurance company and an Orlando thrift.  In 1980, the state banking code expired under Florida's Sunset Law.  Mr. Swann had a big hand in drafting a new law for S&Ls that greatly expanded their investment powers.  This law, and even more liberal counterparts in Texas and California, let thrifts invest in "unconventional assets," such as shopping malls, junk bonds and corporate subsidiaries, that federal officials blame for the extreme cost of the S&L debacle.  The new code helped Mr. Swann pull off an unusual "reverse merger" of his insurance company (with a $7.4 million net worth) and thrift (with a $5 million net worth) to produce a conglomerate called American Pioneer Corp. According to several former state regulators, State Comptroller Lewis made a special exception to allow the smaller thrift to swallow the larger insurance company.  Using the broadened thrift code he helped draft, Mr. Swann then applied his thrift's assets to recapitalizing the insurance company.  A series of mergers expanded both the thrift and Mr. Swann's influence.  In 1985, American Pioneer Savings Bank announced a merger with Heritage Federal Savings & Loan Association of Daytona Beach.  A lawyer with Heritage Federal, State Rep. Samuel Bell, became vice chairman of American Pioneer, drawing a salary of $150,000.  Mr. Bell also was speaker-designate of the Florida House of Representatives.  At the same time that Mr. Bell went on the payroll, Mr. Swann's law firm was an active and very effective lobbyist before the legislature.  Mr. Swann's arrangement with Mr. Bell went far beyond anything in the House Ethics Committee complaint against Jim Wright, yet in Florida such actions have not even been raised before the state's ethics commission.  But Swann & Haddock's dealings with the State Insurance Department raised eyebrows even in Miami.  In 1983, Mr. Swann's Tallahassee office obtained fast-track approval for two clients buying a Miami auto-insurance company, American Risk Assurance.  The two turned out to be convicted fraud artists who had met in prison.  They diverted about $1 million before the Insurance Department forced them into receivership.  The end came quickly in part because the company's holdover president refused to pay Swann & Haddock's legal fees.  In addition, Swann & Haddock represented Miami-based Universal Casualty Insurance Co., until it collapsed in 1985 in the state's largest insurance failure.  The owners of the cut-rate auto insurer subsequently pleaded guilty to federal fraud charges.  During Universal Casualty's gaudy career, the State Insurance Department ignored vehement complaints from competitors that its television advertising and low premiums defied all the economic laws of insurance.  Mr. Swann himself blames these cases on the bad judgment of the former head of his Tallahassee law office, a former assistant insurance commissioner.  The two have since split, and Mr. Swann has abandoned his Tallahassee business.  Mr. Gunter resigned as insurance commissioner in 1988 for an unsuccessful run for the U.S. Senate.  Comptroller Lewis is up for re-election next year.  But much as the faces change, few in Florida expect the system to reform.  Once the habits of political pull become entrenched, they don't easily give way.  And even though Jim Wright is now gone, few in Orlando count Mr. Swann out.  He also raised funds last year for the presidential campaign of Missouri Rep. Richard Gephardt, who is now majority leader of the U.S. House of Representatives.  ---  Mr. Adams is writing "The Big Fix," a book on savings and loan and bank scandals, for John Wiley & Sons.  Most major banks cut their prime lending rates half a percentage point to 10.5%, a move that could finally reduce borrowing costs for consumers and small businesses.  Yesterday's long-awaited reduction follows a similar cut Friday by San Francisco-based Bank of America.  The banks took their time in following Chase Manhattan Bank, which often leads prime-rate changes and which reduced its own prime rate from 11% three weeks ago.  The prime rate is closely watched because bankers say they use it as a base to calculate more than one-third of fixed-rate and adjustable-rate consumer and business loans.  "Some people who have variable-rate loans could benefit right away" from yesterday's action, says Irwin Kellner, chief economist at Manufacturers Hanover Trust Co., one big bank that cut its prime.  Consumers should look for lower rates on home equity loans and personal lines of credit, he says.  But credit card rates aren't expected to decline.  General Motors Acceptance Corp. said the lower prime rate will immediately affect the rate it charges automobile dealers for cars.  However, it will take awhile before the prime rate cut "follows through to the consumer" in the way of lower auto financing costs, a spokesman said.  Consumer borrowing costs generally have been falling more slowly than rates in the financial marketplace.  The prime rate changes periodically to reflect banks' own borrowing costs in the financial markets.  The prime rate has fallen from 11.5% in early June, mainly because the rates that banks pay on certificates of deposit, Eurodollars and savings accounts have declined.  For example, interest rates on three-month Eurodollars, or U.S. currency held in foreign accounts, have declined to just above 8.5% from 10% in early May.  And the rates on three-month CDs in the U.S. now are about 8.4%, off from 9.45%.  The nation's largest corporations aren't directly affected by prime rate changes because many can borrow at rates well below the prime.  Bankers are willing to offer these companies attractive rates to keep them from turning to alternative sources of credit, such as foreign markets or the short-term corporate IOUs known as commercial paper.  Many companies in recent weeks already have taken advantage of falling interest rates by rushing to borrow through the credit markets, where rates have fallen faster than at commercial banks.  Economists have been waiting for banks to cut the prime rates again after it became clear several weeks ago that the Federal Reserve was seeking an easier monetary policy.  At its meeting July 5 and 6, the Federal Reserve's policy-setting committee voted to supply enough additional credit to the economy to reduce the federal funds interest rate half a percentage point, to about 9%.  With that now accomplished, the Fed is unlikely to ease further before the committee meets Aug. 22 -- unless new signs of a sharp economic slowdown emerge before then.  The federal funds rate, at which banks lend to one another overnight, is the market interest rate over which the Fed has the most direct control.  It drifted as low as 8 7/8% yesterday, down from Friday's 8 15/16%.  Some bankers say they hesitated to follow Chase's move three weeks ago, in part, because they wanted more evidence that the Fed would continue to ease.  Confirmation came last week when the Fed allowed its closely watched federal funds rates fall to 9%.  One economist said, however, that other banks "lagged beyond what one would normally be expected, out of greed," deciding to hold on as long as possible before passing along their own lower borrowing costs to consumers.  Considering how long it took the others to follow, some people question whether Chase -- which has often led prime rate increases -- will take the lead again anytime soon.  "They were out on a limb for a long time," one banker said.  First National Bank of Chicago was the first big bank to cut the prime yesterday, doing so shortly before the opening of the stock market.  Citibank, Continental Bank and Chemical Bank quickly followed suit.  By the end of the day, all of the nation's 30 major banks cut their prime rate to 10.5%.  The following were among Friday's offerings and pricings in the U.S. and non-U.S. capital markets, with terms and syndicate manager, as compiled by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report:  @ CORPORATES  Envirodyne Industries Inc. -- $324.59 million two-part issue of discount notes and debentures was priced late Friday by Salomon Brothers Inc.  The $124.59 million proceeds of senior discount notes due Aug. 1, 1997, were priced at 49.836.  The note issue is a zero-coupon security until Aug. 1, 1994, thereafter the notes pay interest of 14 1/2%.  The senior discount notes are rated single-B-2 by Moody's Investors Service Inc. and single-B by Standard & Poor's Corp.  The $200 million of 14% senior subordinated debentures due Feb. 1, 2001, were priced at par.  The senior subordinated debentures are rated single-B-3 by Moody's and single-B-minus by S&P.  The issuer is a subsidiary of Emerald, a recently formed corporation to facilitate the acquisition of Envirodyne.  John Deere Capital Corp. -- $150 million issue 8 5/8% subordinated debentures, due Aug. 1, 2019, was priced at par.  The debentures are non-callable for 15 years and are puttable at par on Aug. 1, 1997.  The issue was priced at a yield spread 96 basis points above the seven-year Treasury note.  Rated Baa-1 by Moody's and triple-B-plus by S&P, the issue will be sold through underwriters led by Goldman Sachs & Co. Selling concession is $3 and reallowance is $2.50.  Delivery is scheduled for Aug. 7 with interest accruing from Aug.1.  The issuer is a unit of Deere & Co.  Limited Inc. -- $100 million of 8 7/8% notes, due Aug. 15, 1999, was priced at par.  The non-callable notes were priced at a yield spread 103 basis points above the 10-year Treasury note.  Rated Single-A-2 by Moody's and single-A-minus by S&P, the issue will be sold through underwriters led by Salomon Brothers Inc.  @ OTHERS  Thailand -- $200 million issue of 8.70% bonds, due Aug. 1, 1999 was priced at par.  The issue is non-callable and was priced at a yield spread 88 basis points above the 10-year Treasury note.  Rated single-A-2 by Moody's and single-A-minus by S&P, the issue will be sold through underwriters led by Salomon Brothers Inc.  @ EUROBONDS  Denmark -- $150 million of 8 1/4% bonds due Aug. 17, 1994, priced at 101 3/8 to yield 8.37% less full fees, via Nomura International Ltd. Fees 1 7/8.  Nisshin Steel Co. Ltd. (Japan) -- $400 million of bonds due Aug. 17, 1993 with equity-purchase warrants, indicating a 4 1/4% coupon at par, via Nomura International Ltd. Simultaneously, $200 million Asian portion via Yamaichi.  Each $5,000 bond carries one warrant, exercisable from Sept. 5, 1989 through Aug. 10, 1993, to buy company shares at an expected premium of 2 1/2% to the closing share price when terms are fixed August 8.  Central-secured Investments NV (vehicle) -- $70 million of secured floating-rate notes due Aug. 22, 2000, paying 0.20 point over six-month Libor (London Interbank Offered Rate) priced at par, via Morgan Stanley International.  Callable from Aug. 22, 1990, and on every interest payment date thereafter, at par.  Guaranteed by Financial Security Assurance Inc.  Eurofima (agency) -- One billion French francs of 8 5/8% bonds due Sept. 1, 1999, priced at 101 7/8 to yield 8.64% less full fees, via Credit Commercial de France.  Fees 2.  Nisshin Steel Inc. (Japan) -- 300 million Swiss francs of privately placed convertible notes due Sept. 30, 1994, with an indicated coupon of 1/2% at par, via Banque Paribas (Suisse) SA. Put option on Sept. 30, 1991 at an indicated 107 3/4 to yield 4.039%.  Callable on Sept. 30, 1991 at 107 3/4 and beginning March 31, 1992 at 102 1/2, declining by 1/2 point semi-annually to par.  Each 50,000 Swiss franc note is convertible from Sept. 5, 1989 to Sept. 20, 1994 at a 5% premium over the closing share price Aug. 7, when terms are fixed.  West LB Finance Curacao NV (West German parent) -- 300 million Swedish kronor of 11 1/8% bonds due June 15, 1994, priced at 101 7/8 to yield 11.13% less full fees, Westdeutsche Landesbank.  Guaranteed by Westdeutsche Landesbank.  Fees 1 7/8.  Caisse Centrale Desjardins du Quebec (Canada) -- 10 billion yen of 5.3% bonds due Nov. 29, 1990, priced at 100.80 to yield 5.34% less full fees, via Yamaichi International.  Fees 7/8.  Because of a production error in some editions yesterday, a logo titled "The Liberal Plantation" appeared improperly.  It should have run in the text of the editorial titled "De Facto Nonsense," which discussed the current effort in Washington to prevent confirmation of William Lucas's nomination to become assistant attorney general for civil rights in the Justice Department.  David N. Dreman, one of the highest-flying stars in the money-management business, plans to sell control of his investment-advisory firm to a partnership formed by buy-out specialists Lodestar Group.  Mr. Dreman spent yesterday informing clients of his plans and reassuring them that the buy-out wouldn't affect his investment performance.  "The only thing that I worry about is that he stays motivated," said one client who spoke with Mr. Dreman.  "I asked him point-blank why he was doing it, and he said it was just for the money," the client said.  The Lodestar partnership would pay $96 million for control of Dreman Value Management Inc., with Mr. Dreman retaining a 20% stake in the firm, according to a report in Wall Street Letter, a trade publication.  Late yesterday, Mr. Dreman said, "I have to contact all my clients before I can comment at all."  Lodestar also declined to comment.  One individual familiar with the planned transaction said Mr. Dreman and other officials of the Dreman firm eventually could hold almost a 40% stake under an incentive arrangement included in the buy-out.  Mr. Dreman would remain in charge of the firm, one of Wall Street's fastest-growing investment advisers with almost $4 billion under management.  Investment professionals who learned of the proposed buy-out said the reported price was astounding.  It's an example of "the kind of premium that a firm with a name like Dreman can command," said Mary Pat Thornton, principal in Putnam Lovell Inc., an investment-banking firm specializing in buy-outs of money managers.  Until recently, the Canadian-born Mr. Dreman, 53 years old, was the sole owner of the investment firm he founded in 1978.  Worried about losing some of his top aides, he started sharing a small interest in the firm, though he is thought to have retained as much as 95%.  The firm has been an enormous profitmaker.  In 1987, for example, it had revenue of $21.7 million on its money-management business, according to Dreman Value Management's income statement for the year.  Of that, $16.9 million was paid out in salaries to Mr. Dreman and his top lieutenants.  Other money managers estimate that Mr. Dreman would have kept at least $10 million for himself.  The money-management field has become increasingly competitive in recent years.  More managers are fighting for clients at a time when many corporate pension funds are adequately funded and, therefore, aren't adding new money.  But top-flight money managers, such as the Dreman firm, continue to grow on the strength of their reputations and favorable performance, making them attractive to acquirers.  These include foreign banks and others entering the U.S. market and U.S. insurance companies trying to expand their money-management operations.  Buy-out firms such as Lodestar have started to enter the picture.  In a deal completed last year, Delaware Management Co. was bought for $300 million by a group including its management and a leveraged buy-out fund organized by the New York investment firm Harlan Castle Inc.  "It sounds like a very favorable transaction for him," said a client of Mr. Dreman.  "It's a way for him to realize the equity he built in the business while still keeping the business."  High Technology Holding Corp., which has launched a hostile bid for 35% of Newport Electronics Inc. for $9.50 a share, said it filed suit against the maker of electronic-measuring equipment and four of its five directors.  The suit, filed in federal court here, seeks to enjoin Newport's directors from recommending a rival tender offer by Sensor Control Corp. until Newport amends a related Securities and Exchange Commission filing.  Newport has said it intends to recommend acceptance of a merger agreement it has with Sensor, a Sunnyvale, Calif., maker of pressure sensors and gauges.  Under the agreement, Sensor would acquire Newport for $9 a share.  Newport officials couldn't immediately be reached for comment on the suit.  In national over-the-counter trading, Newport closed at $9.125 a share, up 12.5 cents.  Lawrence Walsh's failure to convict Oliver North on a serious charge has only increased the zeal of his $40 million prosecution team to pin something on someone.  The latest sacrificial offering is Joseph Fernandez, the former CIA station chief in Costa Rica.  Unless the Bush administration stops him, Mr. Walsh will divulge the identities of intelligence agents and operations to get Mr. Fernandez.  This Iran-Contra sideshow would be laughable if it weren't for the pointless anguish it imposes on Mr. Fernandez and the intelligence community.  He isn't accused of violating any of the Boland amendments.  The claim is that he obstructed and made false statements to a CIA investigator and the Tower Commission looking into Iran-Contra.  This is a highly unusual charge.  Allegedly misleading other executive-branch officials is a matter for internal discipline, not a criminal court.  Proving the charges would be very hard; the statements weren't made under oath or into a tape recorder.  The merits aside, the fatal problem of the case has been clear from Day One: Any trial would require disclosure of mountains of top-secret information.  To prove he told the truth, Mr. Fernandez would have to divulge many secrets, including all he knew about Costa Rica building an airstrip to defend against a Nicaraguan invasion.  Independent Counsel Walsh, of course, hasn't followed the laws or rules for prosecutors handling sensitive cases.  His earlier failure to consult the intelligence community meant he had to drop the main charges against Mr. North and Mr. Poindexter when it became clear that classified materials would come out at trial.  The Fernandez case now has become a game of chicken between Mr. Walsh and the Bush administration.  Mr. Walsh filed court papers that in his expert opinion, there's no reason to "protect a fictional secret" or the "artificial deniability" of intelligence information.  Affidavits from intelligence experts disagree.  At a recent White House meeting, Defense Secretary Cheney, NSC Adviser Scowcroft, John Sununu and others decided to have the Justice Department try to override Mr. Walsh by appealing the trial judge's ruling that classified information would have to be introduced.  A federal appeals court now is wrestling with the hilarious issue of whether the U.S. government has legal standing to appeal the judge's ruling, which Mr. Walsh refuses to do.  While he's getting a grip on Independent Counsel Walsh's antics, Attorney General Thornburgh also needs to cool off the loose-cannon U.S. Attorneys on the regular payroll.  In a related case recently, Florida Federal Judge Norman Roettger Jr. dismissed charges brought by the local U.S. Attorney against six Contra supporters alleging violations of the Neutrality Act.  The judge said the case was "absurd," "meritless" and "lacks common sense" because the U.S. obviously has not been at peace with Nicaragua.  "The facts demonstrate the unceasing efforts of the executive branch to support the Contra cause," the judge said.  The Bush administration ought to file a court order in the Fernandez case to protect its classified information, even if it means the case must be dropped.  None of the charges against Mr. Fernandez warrant a trial, certainly not a trial risking national security for little more reason at this point than to allow Mr. Walsh and his supporters to claim what little justification is left for spending tens of millions of dollars to "defeat" finally a former President's political policies.  As a columnist for the New York Law Journal, Stanley S. Arkin is used to drawing on his experience as one of the city's better known trial lawyers.  But in a recent column, Mr. Arkin may have drawn a little too much.  In a column in June, Mr. Arkin concocted what appeared to be a hypothetical case in which a major corporation resorted to dirty tricks by spreading lies about a competitor.  "Spreading false or malicious rumor or flat-out lies . . . may well amount to a criminal fraud," Mr. Arkin reflected in his regular "Business Crime" column for the daily law journal.  Mr. Arkin didn't say so, but at the time he was representing an international banker who claimed that American Express was engaging in a smear campaign against him.  Last week, the financial and travel services giant publicly apologized to Mr. Arkin's client, Edmond J. Safra, and agreed to pay $1 million each to four of his favorite charities.  People familiar with Mr. Safra's push for the American Express concessions have said in recent days that the Arkin column was a deliberate part of that effort.  Now some lawyers and journalists, including the journal's publisher, are wondering whether Mr. Arkin acted inappropriately.  "Obviously, it's a matter of some concern," said James Finkelstein, the law journal's publisher.  "Our purpose in the column is education, and that's what the column should be used for, educating lawyers in strategy and ideas," he said.  For his part, Mr. Arkin maintained that the references to Mr. Safra's situation, while not entirely coincidental, were intended to help him develop a legal point in the column and were not meant to send a hidden message to American Express executives.  Mr. Safra contended that American Express had initiated a publicity campaign against him last year that resulted in articles in several European publications linking him to drug-money laundering.  Investigators for Mr. Safra, a resident of Geneva who controls New York's Republic National Bank and other international banking companies, traced the campaign to representatives of American Express, but initial complaints to American Express from Mr. Safra went unheeded.  Mr. Arkin, the noted lawyer, then became Mr. Arkin, the noted columnist.  Using facts resembling the Safra case, he created a "hypothetical" example to show the possibility of criminal charges in such a case.  Mr. Arkin also appeared to make a veiled reference to American Express Chairman James D. Robinson.  Settlement negotiations began shortly after the column was published.  Reached while on vacation in Santa Monica, Calif., Mr. Arkin denied that he used the column to prompt settlement negotiations on behalf of his client.  "The basic thing about my articles is that my articles come out of the stuff of my life," Mr. Arkin said.  "I don't use any of my articles to harpoon anyone.  I can do that directly . . . .  When I write, the experience of my life comes out of my pen."  Responded Mr. Finkelstein, the Journal publisher, "Obviously, lawyers use their own experience and what they know about in writing columns."  Nevertheless, he added, "we'll speak to Stanley Arkin."  National Bancshares Corp. of Texas said it will defer the interest payment due today on its $25 million of 10% convertible subordinated debentures while it assesses its options.  An agreement to recapitalize the banking concern was announced last month.  The transaction calls for new investors to pump $117 million into the company, including about $31 million that will come from Equimark Corp.  As part of the bailout, the Federal Deposit Insurance Corp. has pledged about $250 million to restore the net worth of some subsidiary banks and cover losses from problem assets.  National Bancshares said it has a 30-day grace period in which to make the $1.3 million interest payment.  The company didn't make its Feb. 1 payment on time either.  But it paid the bondholders in late May to stave off a threat that creditors would force the company into bankruptcy-law proceedings.  National Bancshares also said it had a net loss of $31.2 million for the second quarter, compared with a $107.5 million loss in the year earlier.  For the six months, it had a net loss of $74.9 million, compared with a loss of $118.9 million.  Novell shares rose in active trading, and the Nasdaq over-the-counter market crept closer to its all-time high.  The Nasdaq Composite Index gained 1.02 to 453.84, only 1.42 points below its record.  The Nasdaq 100 Index advanced 2.26 to 428.55, while the Nasdaq Financial Index improved 1.59 to 446.39.  Volume totaled 111.9 million shares.  Of the 4,405 issues that change hands, 1,061 advanced and 884 declined.  Some traders and market analysts are expecting a swell of stock buying soon by investors who have been earning near double-digit returns on money-market securities.  The traders and analysts are speculating that the prospect of falling interest rates will make stocks more attractive to those small investors.  That could bode well for the OTC market, say the analysts, who say many Nasdaq stocks are undervalued and represent great bargains.  Novell climbed 1 5/8 to 29 on 725,000 shares, compared with an average daily volume of 447,000.  Rich Edwards, an analyst at Robertson Stephens & Co. in San Francisco, reiterated his buy recommendation on Novell and urged investors to sell the stock of its competitor, 3Com.  He lowered his earnings estimate on Santa Clara, Calif.-based 3Com to $1.20 a share from $1.40 a share for fiscal 1990, ending next May 31. 3Com gained 1/8 to 17 1/4 on 346,000 shares.  Mr. Edwards made the recommendations after surveying a group of retailers who sell the computer-networking software products of both companies.  He quoted retailers as saying demand for 3Com's new products is weak, and he said many of them reported that the products of Provo, Utah-based Novell are beginning to dominate the market.  "Novell has momentum and perceived leadership" in the industry, Mr. Edwards said.  "It is taking market share from 3Com."  Officials at 3Com didn't return phone calls seeking comment.  LIN Broadcasting slipped 5/8 to 109 on 664,000 shares.  The New York broadcasting and cellular communications concern said McCaw Cellular Communications didn't accept its invitation last week to negotiate a definitive merger pact.  Therefore, LIN said, it will pursue other options to "protect and enhance" shareholder value.  McCaw Cellular finished at 37, down 1, on volume of 673,000 shares.  LIN has been seeking a merger pact with McCaw at a price of $127.50 a share.  But McCaw of Kirkland, Wash., hasn't budged from its $110-a-share tender offer.  PCS gained 1/4 to 14 1/2 on 105,000 shares.  The prescription-drug claims processor said McKesson is considering alternatives regarding its 86.2% interest in the company, including either selling or increasing its stake.  Last week, PCS announced that its president, Donald B. Dahlin, resigned.  The board yesterday named a director, John C. Pfeiffer, as interim president.  PCS also said it earned $1.7 million, or 12 cents a share, on revenue of $24 million in its first quarter, ended June 30.  In the year-earlier quarter, the company earned $3.5 million, or 24 cents a share, on revenue of $22.3 million.  Shares of Digilog were unchanged at 4 3/4.  The company agreed to merge with CXR Telecom.  Under the agreement, the two companies would be wholly owned subsidiaries of a new company, CXR Corp. CXR Telecom supplies systems, instruments and modems for the data and telecommunications markets.  Digilog makes communications testing and control equipment.  B.A.T Industries PLC increasingly appears up for grabs.  Though B.A.T Chairman Patrick Sheehy wants to keep the British conglomerate whole, he might have to dismember his empire to fend off the unwelcome #13.2 billion ($21.8 billion) bid from Sir James Goldsmith, the Anglo-French financier.  A growing number of counterbid proposals points to such a scenario.  The prospect is focusing attention on the breakup value and possible U.S. and European buyers for B.A.T's assets spanning 47 countries.  Many institutional investors "would like to see a breakup under the auspices of B.A.T management, because then shareholders would get all the advantages and all the gain," Bruce Davidson, an analyst at London brokers Smith New Court, said.  Heightened shareholder pressure, especially after an expected sweetened Goldsmith bid, means Mr. Sheehy "may be forced into . . . chopping {B.A.T} up himself," Arnab Banerji, head of research at Citicorp Scrimgeour Vickers in London, said.  Broken up, B.A.T's financial services, retailing and paper operations could reap more than #14 billion, analysts figure.  The tobacco business alone might fetch between #4.6 billion and #6 billion.  But tobacco might be the last business sold because of its consistent cash-generating capacity.  Also, antitrust barriers would keep tobacco makers from acquiring B.A.T cigarette brands such as Kool, Lucky Strike and Benson & Hedges.  Friendly and hostile counterbid ideas are swirling around London and New York.  Two rival groups have approached some B.A.T institutional investors with alternative breakup bids.  More will surely come, as almost every major U.S. and British securities firm that isn't already involved looks for ways to jump into Europe's biggest takeover.  "Everybody who is anybody has their slide rule out," said John Emly, head of British operations at Robert Fleming Asset Management, an arm of Robert Fleming & Co. and a B.A.T shareholder.  AIM Group Zurich AG, a mergers advisory company based in Switzerland, claims a half-dozen big British institutions are studying its plan.  The British merchant bank Baring Brothers & Co. also has sounded out institutional holders about a breakup proposal.  A spokesman for B.A.T said that it hasn't had any contact with AIM, and that "We aren't in discussions with any parties about the sales of any businesses."  Hanson PLC, the British conglomerate renowned for its trans-Atlantic takeovers, is seen as another likely architect of a consortium bid.  "It is possible there could be a counteroffer from Hanson with or without arbitragers," said Alistair MacLennan, a senior fund manager at Norwich Union Insurance Group, which holds about 2% of B.A.T shares.  Hanson appears to want a role in B.A.T's camp -- as seen in its recent decision to refrain from joining the Goldsmith group as a backer.  "We are watching what's going on with interest," John Patterson, a Hanson director, said.  Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. and Forstmann Little & Co., the two biggest U.S. leveraged buy-out funds, are known to be studying the B.A.T situation, as well.  But Forstmann probably would have more freedom than KKR to jump in and buy assets put up for sale by Sir James, a rival bidder or Mr. Sheehy, the B.A.T chairman.  Here is a look at what B.A.T's major chunks probably would command in any breakup, and at who might want the businesses, based on a Wall Street Journal survey of about 10 British and U.S. analysts:  FINANCIAL SERVICES: The operation has a value of #5.7 billion to #8 billion, depending on your view of Farmers Group, the U.S.-based insurer that was acquired by B.A.T last December for $5.2 billion.  Farmers unsuccessfully hunted for a friendly suitor to fight off B.A.T and even explored a leveraged buy-out through KKR.  Recalling this lack of rival bidders, some analysts said Farmers now may sell for as little as $3.5 billion.  Analysts also cite the slowed pace of U.S. insurance industry profits and a recent voter referendum to trim insurance rates in California, Farmers' home market.  Allianz AG heads the list of possible buyers for Farmers or for B.A.T's British insurers, Eagle Star and Allied Dunbar.  Last week, the West German insurance concern listed the U.S. as its first goal for any large acquisitions.  Allianz considered a rival bid for Farmers during B.A.T's takeover fight and might do so again in a less expensive deal.  In 1984, B.A.T outbid Allianz in a fierce three-month contest for Eagle Star, ultimately paying #968 million.  Italy's powerful Agnelli family, which has agreed to join the Goldsmith group as investors, also might seek Farmers.  It has U.S. insurance interests through a substantial stake in a Luxembourg holding company with an 18% voting stake in Firemen's Fund Corp.  But the family, which controls the Fiat S.p.A. empire, describes the insurance holding as an investment.  Other potential European buyers include the giant Assicurazioni Generali S.p.A. of Italy and Zurich Insurance Co. of Switzerland.  Allianz and Zurich Insurance spokesmen played down the speculation, and a Generali spokesman couldn't be reached for comment.  RETAILING: These interests, including U.S.-based Marshall Field and Saks Fifth Avenue and the British catalog retailer Argos, might fetch between #2 billion and #3.6 billion.  Marshall Field, which B.A.T bought for $368 million in 1982, would go for at least $1 billion, but less-profitable Saks would command just under $1 billion, suggested William N. Smith, a retailing analyst at Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co. in New York.  Henry Kravis, KKR's chief, might pursue Saks Fifth Avenue because his wife, Carolyne Roehm, is a fashion designer.  Among other potential U.S. bidders for the two well-known U.S. chains: May Department Stores Co.; Dillard Department Stores Inc.; Sears, Roebuck & Co.; and General Cinema Corp. Analysts speculated that Argos might be bought by the British jewelry chain Ratners Group PLC or the British retailer Sears PLC, which isn't related to Chicago-based Sears Roebuck.  PAPER: The business largely consists of U.S.-based Appleton Papers, the world's biggest producer of carbonless copying paper, and Wiggins Teape, a leading British paper and pulp producer with operations throughout Europe.  Together, they may fetch between #2 billion and #2.5 billion, analysts estimated.  "Who would buy them becomes a difficult question to answer," a London analyst said.  "In the U.K., a lot of the {paper} companies aren't very big.  It would have to be a major U.S. player or someone who wants to diversify into that business."  Buyers also might be scarce, because the world's paper industry appears headed for a downturn.  But PWA AG, one of West Germany's largest paper product makers, might bid for Wiggins Teape, suggested Smith New Court's Mr. Davidson.  So far, Mr. Sheehy remains opposed to selling big chunks of the conglomerate, after spending nearly a decade trying to diversify.  Some analysts see the B.A.T chairman breaking it up another way: floating the four major pieces as separate public companies.  If Sir James "stands any chance of successs, B.A.T advisers will do something along those lines, and try to release value for its shareholders without fat profit being creamed off" by the Goldsmith group, Charles Pick, an analyst with Nomura Research Institute in London, said.  "Everything could be demerged."  Faced with a hostile takeover bid from Nortek Inc., Eljer Industries Inc. said it toughened its shareholder-rights plan.  Directors of Eljer, a building-products manufacturer based in Plano, Texas, said they will not consider the Nortek bid until after they review an updated strategic plan for Eljer at a meeting Aug. 15.  In the meantime, Eljer said it lowered the threshold at which its stockholders can purchase discounted stock to thwart a hostile acquisition.  Holders will be able to purchase a specified amount of stock at 50% of market value if a bidder acquires 10% or more of the company's shares.  Previously, holders could make discount purchases when a bidder acquired 20% or more.  Nortek, a Providence, R.I., maker of products for the building, aerospace and electrical industries, offered $32.50 a share for Eljer stock in a July 14 letter to the board.  Nortek currently holds 7.9% of Eljer stock and has sought clearance from the Securities and Exchange Commission to purchase more than 50%.  Eljer was spun off from Household International Inc. April 14.  In composite trading yesterday on the New York Stock Exchange, Eljer shares closed at $32.50, down 62.5 cents.  The Veterans Administration is paying billions of dollars in disability payments to veterans who don't qualify, a General Accounting Office report suggests.  In fiscal-year 1986 alone, the VA paid $1.7 billion in disability benefits resulting from diseases "that our physicians concluded were neither caused nor aggravated" during military service, according to the GAO, the audit arm of Congress.  By law, veterans are entitled to VA benefits only for disabilities resulting from injuries or diseases incurred or aggravated while "in the line of duty."  But the GAO found that veterans were getting disability benefits for a number of diseases that weren't related to military service.  These include diabetes, chronic bronchitis and emphysema, arteriosclerotic heart disease, osteoarthritis, multiple sclerosis and hemorrhoids.  Despite these findings, the GAO said current law prevents the VA from denying compensation in some of these cases.  The law "doesn't require the VA to examine the nature of certain diseases or to determine a causal connection to military service," the agency said.  The GAO said Congress may wish to tighten the current law, but it suggested that any change be prospective, so as not to stop benefits to veterans who are currently receiving them.  The signs multiply that Rudolph Giuliani's campaign for Mayor of New York is faltering.  Until the past few weeks, everyone had been writing off Ronald Lauder, his opponent in the Republican primary.  But the recognition has been spreading that only a fraction of the city's paltry 400,000 Republicans will vote in the Sept. 12 primary, and that Mr. Lauder has the endorsement of many local leaders and the support of Senator Alfonse D'Amato.  So over the past two weeks, much Gotham press has been devoted to how Mr. Lauder, heir to the cosmetics fortune and former Ambassador to Austria, has been spending gobs of his own money while other candidates subsist on a public-spending dole.  Local pundits are complaining that the GOP "doesn't want to win," and the Giuliani campaign has just signed up Roger Ailes, who earlier quit the Lauder campaign on the grounds that it was nothing more than a stop-Giuliani effort.  This raises the issue of whether elements of the national Republican Party will come through with backdoor aid for the Giuliani campaign on the grounds that he might be an electable candidate.  The question is, what kind of Republican is Mr. Giuliani, if any?  GOP voters in Brooklyn and Queens no doubt remember the last Republican mayor of New York, John V. Lindsay.  Elected as a Republican in 1965, Mr. Lindsay was defeated as an incumbent in the Republican primary in 1969.  He went on to win re-election on the Liberal line, continuing the expansion of welfare bureaucracy, cave-ins to public-employee unions, ruinous tax increases and raids on the capital budget that propelled the city toward its brush with bankruptcy in 1975.  Voters with such memories will have no trouble recognizing John V. Giuliani.  Mr. Giuliani wants the Republican nomination to add to the Liberal Party line with which he's already been endowed, so that he can call himself a "fusion" candidate.  The alliance with the Liberals cost him any chance with the Conservative Party, which has designated Mr. Lauder, ensuring a three-way race with one of the Democratic contenders -- incumbent Ed Koch, Manhattan Borough President David Dinkins, businessman and former subway chief Richard Ravitch or Comptroller Harrison Goldin.  Mr. Giuliani solicited the Liberal Party nomination, he actually says, partly because many of his friends and relatives would have been too embarrassed to vote for a Republican.  Mr. Giuliani campaigned for Bobby Kennedy and says he voted for George McGovern.  His campaign staff includes at least one former Mike Dukakis aide.  He told a TV interviewer, "I do not look to see what the catechism of conservatism says about how to solve a problem."  As an example of what this means in practice, take Mr. Giuliani's position on the city's disastrous rent-control laws.  They are, he says, "an important part of keeping the middle class in New York City."  He supports the so-called anti-warehousing law that forces landlords to rent apartments they own, instead of keeping them vacant while converting them to co-ops.  He took this position to ease the housing shortage, he says, because he's seen "the terrible things it's done to federal agents who have to live two hours away."  The would-be Republican nominee, in fact, has come out for extending rent control beyond apartments to commercial property as well.  Readers of this space will not be surprised that we find this opportunistic pandering of a piece with Mr. Giuliani's supposed selling point, his performance as U.S. Attorney in Manhattan.  He did go after Mafia dons, but he also turned RICO into a cudgel against legitimate businesses, making the assumption that investment banking is somehow "organized crime."  In his zeal, Mr. Giuliani paraded investment banker Richard Wigton in handcuffs before having to drop charges against him and co-defendants Robert Freeman and Timothy Tabor.  He promised to bring new charges against the three in "record time," but left office first, leaving them still in legal limbo.  He also lost his case against Bess Myerson, which never belonged in federal court in the first place, but did advance the corruption issue against her friend Ed Koch.  It is certainly true that a viable Republican Party could do a lot for New York City.  The Democratic Party has held absolute power, and many of its leaders have become absolutely corrupt.  To an important extent, though, this is merely another reflection of the ideological hegemony to which Mr. Lindsay and Mr. Giuliani bow.  We're far from confident that a D'Amato-Lauder party would give the city the kind of Republicanism it needs.  And Roger Ailes just might, if the candidate doesn't get in his way.  What New York desperately needs from the Republican Party is the fresh thinking of Jack Kemp, Bill Bennett and Charles Murray on economic opportunity, drugs and welfare.  The last thing either the city or the national GOP needs is another Lindsay liberal to give Republicanism a bad name.  Pinnacle West Capital Corp., Phoenix, Ariz., said it failed to meet yesterday's deadline set by federal regulators for $192 million in added capital at its troubled MeraBank thrift unit.  The Federal Home Loan Bank Board of San Francisco ordered the additional funds last week.  "Negotiations are continuing and they will probably go on for several weeks," said Gene E. Rice, chairman and chief executive officer of MeraBank, Arizona's largest savings and loan.  Although Pinnacle is disputing the bank board's order, Mr. Rice said it hadn't filed any legal action opposing it.  A company spokesman declined to comment on weekend reports by Arizona papers that Pinnacle might sidestep the order by filing for protection under Chapter 11 of the federal Bankruptcy Code.  Meanwhile, the FBI yesterday began and ended what it called a routine inquiry into the financial problems of Merabank, which had a net loss last year of $208.6 million on assets of $8.3 billion at Dec. 31.  It "determined that the Bank Board doesn't have a matter for the FBI at this time," an agency official said.  Broad Inc. posted a six-fold increase in fiscal third-quarter net income to $9.2 million, or 28 cents a share, and raised its profit forecast for its abbreviated 1989 fiscal year.  The Los Angeles financial services concern, formerly Kaufman & Broad Inc., had restated net of $1.5 million, or four cents a share, in the quarter ended June 30, 1988.  For the seven months ended June 30, 1989, net more than tripled to $17.8 million, or 54 cents a share, from $5.3 million, or 16 cents a share.  The seven-month period reflects a change in the company's fiscal year end to Sept. 30 from Nov. 30.  The sharply higher earnings resulted mainly from the divestiture this year of most of the company's traditional life insurance operations and its concentration on more profitable retirement-planning products, a company spokeswoman said.  Eli Broad, chairman and chief executive officer, told analysts recently that the company expected to earn about 72 cents a share in the 10-month fiscal year.  "We now hope to do even better than that," the spokeswoman said yesterday.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading, Broad rose 25 cents, to $11.  The House passed a bill that would require a wide range of drug and alcohol testing for all railroad workers.  Under the legislation, approved on a voice vote, testing would take place after train accidents, before employment, during regular physical check-ups, on a random basis and "on reasonable suspicion."  The bill would permit those who test positive to return to work only if they undergo an approved drug-rehabilitation program.  Although the bill sailed through the House, it isn't clear whether any drug-testing bill will be enacted.  Transportation Secretary Samuel Skinner has criticized the legislation, saying it would complicate matters for his department, which is soon to come out with its own drug-testing rules.  Also, the Bush administration has threatened a veto, charging the bill is too soft on drug offenders.  The bill also faces an obstacle in the Senate.  Last year, the House passed identical legislation, but the Senate refused to compromise on its bill, which mandated testing for airline, trucking and railroad workers.  The Senate Commerce, Transportation and Science Committee today will consider drug-testing legislation that is similar to its version last year.  Another independent entertainment company succumbed to financial ailments, as AEG Acquisition Corp., parent of Atlantic Entertainment Group Inc., filed for protection from creditors.  Atlantic, a closely held motion-picture production and distribution concern, said the filing resulted from an arrangement it negotiated with its principal creditor, the First Bank N.A. unit of Minneapolis-based First Bank System Inc., under which First Bank N.A. agreed to fund the company's operations while it is in Chapter 11 proceedings.  Under Chapter 11 of the federal Bankruptcy Code, a company is protected from creditor lawsuits while it works out a plan to pay off debts.  At the request of First Bank N.A., Atlantic has agreed to "market aggressively" its film library, consisting of rights to about 100 feature films, only about one-third of which are fully owned by Atlantic and AEG. Atlantic said it plans to sell the rights that it owns by year end and use the proceeds to pay off First Bank N.A. and reorganize its operations.  Atlantic didn't say how much it owes the bank.  The protest over U.S. aid to El Salvador included demonstrators carrying coffins and others dressed as atrocity victims with painted "blood" dripping from their necks and wrists.  They crowded into a senator's office, accusing him of abetting a Hitler-like regime.  But this recent slice of guerrilla theater wasn't aimed at the usual conservative, anti-communist legislator supporting military aid for Central America.  This demonstration was against Sen. Christopher Dodd, the liberal Connecticut Democrat who has led the fight against such aid for nearly a decade.  Liberals like Sen. Dodd are becoming the prime targets of a network of left-wing protest groups that once mostly bashed right-wingers.  The groups contend that an immediate end to all U.S. aid to El Salvador is the only way to stop violence there, despite reports that the guerrillas there are responsible for half of it.  But they promote nonviolence by employing some hostile tactics against lawmakers they're trying to influence-lawmakers they say once espoused their cause but have since gone soft.  In an angry confrontation with Rep. Stephen Solarz, protesters called the New York congressman, who authored the original amendment linking aid to El Salvador to human-rights improvements, a "death squad Democrat."  Demonstrators covered the walls of California Rep. Douglas Bosco's office with white hand prints -- the symbol of the right-wing extremists who murder Salvadoran civilians.  And activists recently broke into newspaper vending machines in Sen. Dodd's home state and substituted a phony front page with stories insinuating he was in league with murderous elements in El Salvador.  "We're going to put liberal congresspersons in the position of being villains," vows Hugh Byrne, political director of the Committee in Solidarity with the People of El Salvador, or Cispes.  Other groups in this network that has long opposed U.S. involvement in Central America include Pledge of Resistance, Neighbor to Neighbor and Witness for Peace.  "If it weren't so bizarre and slanderous, it would be almost humorous," says Sen. Dodd.  "I've been called a lot of things before, but Nazi isn't one of them," adds Mr. Dodd, whose father was a prosecutor at the Nuremburg Nazi trials after World War II.  So far, the protest groups aren't making any new friends or converts on Capitol Hill.  And some legislators charge that their calls for an end to violence in Central America reflect an ideological agenda.  For instance, the groups appear to be much more concerned with right-wing death squads than with the violence committed by the Marxist guerrillas waging a civil war against the government.  "Some of these people are more interested in facilitating the triumph of the guerrillas, whom they believe embody the interests of the Salvadoran people, than they are in human rights," complains Rep. Solarz.  Americas Watch, a respected human-rights monitoring group, says the guerrillas are responsible for at least half the violence committed against Salvadoran civilians this year.  Nevertheless, Ken Buttigan, national coordinator of Pledge of Resistance, insists that the way to end the violence is to eliminate aid to the government.  "We want to see a peaceful resolution, and we believe that if the U.S. were to cut off aid, the right conditions for that would exist," he says.  Other prominent liberal Democrats who are targets of this campaign include California Congressmen Mel Levine and Howard Berman, Sen. John Kerry of Massachusetts and Rep. Sam Gejdenson of Connecticut.  The protest groups were energized earlier this year when the right-wing Arena party candidate, Alfredo Cristiani, was elected president of El Salvador.  In 1988, Arena had swept the legislative elections.  The U.S. groups feared a return to the violence of the early 1980s by death squads that have been linked to some Arena party leaders.  "We believe the line has to be drawn very clearly on El Salvador," says Mr. Byrne of Cispes.  "The liberal members need to be put on the spot.  We believe putting them on the spot will be a lot more effective than protesting outside the office of conservatives like Jesse Helms."  At the same time, these groups lost faith in congressional Democratic leaders after many of them joined with the Bush administration earlier this year in a bipartisan accord on Nicaragua.  The protest groups backed a complete cutoff of aid to the U.S.-backed Contras who were battling Managua's leftist Sandinista government.  Instead, Congress agreed to provide the Contras with non-lethal aid until the Sandinistas fulfilled their pledge to hold elections in February 1990.  Having lost that battle, the protest groups turned their attention to El Salvador.  Sen. Dodd, who played a major role in the bipartisan accord on Nicaragua, says that in El Salvador the U.S. should give Mr. Cristiani a chance, rather than immediately cutting off U.S. funds.  He and others believe that Mr. Cristiani, a businessman, isn't linked to Arena's dark past, and, indeed, is involved in a struggle against these elements for control of the party.  Cutting off U.S. assistance only undercuts Mr. Cristiani, reasons Sen. Dodd.  Congress is supporting this view.  Earlier this month, the House approved $85 million in military aid for El Salvador, the same level it provided last year.  The Senate hasn't yet acted but it is expected to approve a similar amount.  But the protest groups aren't letting up.  In a recent newspaper advertisement in Connecticut attacking Rep. Gejdenson, the groups said his support for aid to El Salvador was like supporting foreign aid for Hitler.  Mr. Gejdenson says his mother was "deeply offended by the parallel to Hitler."  His parents are Holocaust survivors who lost much of their family in Nazi death camps.  ---  @ U.S. Aid to El Salvador  @ MILITARY ECONOMIC  @ FISCAL AID AID TOTAL  @ YEAR (in millions) (in millions)  @ 1986 $122 $261 $383  @ 1987 112 414 526  @ 1988 87 251 338  @ 1989 86 269 355  @ 1990* 99 248 347  @ *Administration request  @ Source: House Foreign Affairs Committee  CFM International, a joint venture of General Electric Co. and Snecma, a French engine maker, received an order valued at as much as $900 million for engines to power Airbus planes.  Alitalia of Italy and Iberia International Airlines of Spain ordered the engines for planes built by Airbus Industrie, the European consortium.  Alitalia and Iberia are scheduled to begin taking delivery of their new planes in 1994.  CFM is based in Evendale, Ohio.  GE is a Fairfield, Conn., electrical products, financial services and broadcasting company.  Farm prices fell for the second straight month, after three months of sharp increases, the Agriculture Department said.  Farm prices dropped 0.7% in July, a slowdown from last month's 2% decrease.  However, prices are still 2.8% higher than in July 1988.  Declining prices for oranges and broilers were partially offset by rising prices for potatoes, tomatoes and hogs.  Increases in prices for cattle, potatoes and lettuce contributed the most to the rise over last year's prices, the department said.  Orange prices dropped $3.06 a box, to $5.04, in July, contributing greatly to the 20% decrease in fruit prices.  Lemons and peaches were the only fruits with small price gains, according to the monthly report.  Broiler prices dropped to an average of 39.1 cents a pound from a revised 42.6 cents in June.  Potato prices were up 82 cents from a month earlier at $9.27 per hundred pounds.  Tomato prices, at $32.60 per hundred pounds, have resumed climbing after falling sharply in June to a revised $27.90.  Tomato prices hit a record high in May at $43.60 per hundred pounds.  Hog prices increased 90 cents in July to $46 per hundred pounds.  Barrow and gilt prices rose to $47.30 from a revised $46.40 per hundred pounds in June.  Cattle prices remained at $67.60 per hundred pounds in July, but were up $4.40 from July 1988.  Occidental Petroleum Corp. said it resumed production in the North Sea, more than a year after a fiery explosion on an oil platform off Scotland killed at least 160 workers.  The oil company said production was restarted from two nearby platforms, the Claymore and Scapa fields, that had also been closed since the July 6, 1988, accident.  Production is expected to reach about 100,000 barrels a day later this year.  Substantial safety and platform-maintenance work has been done on the platforms in the nearly 13 months they have been idle, Occidental said, including the installation of underwater emergency shutdown valves.  Occidental, operator of both fields, has a 23.4% interest in the Claymore field and a 36.5% interest in the Scapa field.  Loss-plagued Elxsi Corp., a mini-supercomputers maker, said it is firing half its work force and closing its San Jose, Calif., manufacturing facilities to concentrate on its computer-maintenance business.  It said it would continue to manufacture models of its 6000 and 6400 systems of computers to "meet the requirements of existing customers" but would scrap a program aimed at developing a faster version of its mini-supercomputers.  Company officials couldn't be reached for elaboration.  The announcement follows a decision last March by Elxsi to hire an investment banker to seek additional capital or other "strategic alternatives."  For the nine months ended last Sept. 30, Elxsi posted a net loss of $6.1 million on revenue of $15.1 million, compared with year-earlier profit of $643,000, or one cent a share, on revenue of $19.7 million.  Elxsi was unchanged in national over-the-counter trading at 9.375 cents a share.  Southmark Corp. said it asked a federal bankruptcy judge to appoint an examiner to investigate allegations that former executives and its former auditors defrauded and misled investors in the company.  The Dallas real-estate and thrift concern said it made the request to allow an independent person to look into charges made in several lawsuits filed before Southmark sought protection from creditors under Chapter 11 of the federal Bankruptcy Code last month.  The lawsuits allege that Gene E. Phillips, former chairman and chief executive officer, and William S. Friedman, former vice chairman, mismanaged the company and engaged in transactions that benefited them personally.  The suits also charge that the executives and the accounting firm of Grant Thornton misrepresented the company's financial condition.  Mr. Friedman said he believes asking for an examiner is an appropriate way to investigate the charges.  Robert A. Kleckner, a partner with Grant Thornton, said he wasn't aware of the request but said, "I would be confident that an examination will not find anything adverse regarding Grant Thornton."  President Bush extended U.S. copyright protection to works first published in Indonesia, under a reciprocal agreement that ensures U.S. authors equal protection in that country.  Over the past year, the U.S. government has focused increasing attention on countries, including Indonesia, deemed to provide a legal haven for bootlegged books, films and records.  The U.S. has urged these countries to extend protection to foreign copyright owners equal to that afforded to their own nationals.  In a proclamation yesterday, President Bush certified that Indonesia will grant U.S. nationals, and works first published or created in the U.S., the same copyright protections extended to Indonesian nationals and works.  The agreement goes into effect today.  Western Digital Corp. of Irvine, Calif., said net income in its fourth quarter ended June 30 fell 71% to $4.3 million, or 15 cents a share, on lower revenue.  In the year-earlier quarter, the company earned $14.7 million, or 52 cents a share.  Revenue fell 12% to $243.5 million from $276.8 million.  Profit in recent quarters has been depressed by costs related to developing, manufacturing and marketing new products to meet shifting demand in the computer industry, said Roger W. Johnson, chairman, president and chief executive officer.  The company makes semiconductor parts and digital subsystems for use in the computer, computer peripherals and communications markets.  In American Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Western Digital shares slipped 25 cents a share to $8.75.  An amazing transformation has taken place since the stock market crash: Americans are saving more money.  Or, at least, so it seems according to official statistics.  As recently as 1987, at the height of the consumption binge, personal saving had sunk to an abysmally low 3.2% of after-tax income.  But in the aftermath of the turbulence in the equity market, consumers began to adopt a more precautionary approach to spending.  As a result, the personal saving rate staged a moderate recovery to 4.2% in 1988 and then jumped to 5.5% during the first six months of 1989.  The stunning snapback in saving, if genuine, is of no small consequence.  At the rate reported for early 1989, households are stashing away almost $100 billion more per year than they were in 1987.  Presumably, those additional domestically generated funds represent a potential source of financing for federal budget deficits or for new investment.  Yet despite this impressive rebound, the personal saving rate is still well below the 7% to 8% norm of the 1960s and 1970s.  Speculation about the causes of the revival of saving runs from claims that the baby-boom generation has suddenly matured into its high-saving years to suggestions that much of the rebound is a statistical illusion.  While these extreme positions may contain some small kernel of truth, they distract attention from a more obvious explanation: namely, the timing of discretionary purchases has been heavily influenced during the 1980s by large fluctuations in household wealth and by prices of big-ticket items.  The current softness in consumer spending should be viewed in part as a natural payback period to compensate for earlier overconsumption now that households no longer perceive that the value of their assets will continue to soar.  Any explanation of the gradual recovery in personal saving must also come to grips with the reasons it dropped so dramatically earlier this decade.  The flip side of deficient saving, of course, is overconsumption.  At its peak in 1987, household expenditure as a percentage of national income was 74%, almost four percentage points above the highest levels reached during the previous two decades.  Strikingly, however, almost all of the overconsumption can be traced to a buying binge on discretionary items.  Of the 3.6 percentage-point increase in the consumption-to-income ratio between 1981 and 1987, 3.5 percentage points were attributable to discretionary purchases.  The essence of discretionary purchases is that they can be timed to coincide with periods of well-being or can be postponed when households feel that their fortunes look less bright.  As a result, there is a tendency for big-ticket purchases to be bunched into periods when times are good, especially when real incomes and wealth are rising rapidly.  By their nature, buying sprees often borrow from future sales not only because durable goods do not need to be replaced frequently but also because the additional debt and depleted saving frequently associated with big-ticket purchases damp enthusiasm for subsequent buying.  During most of the 1980s, Americans felt exceptionally rich on at least two counts.  First, household net worth soared, led by the spectacular rallies in the stock and bond markets and extraordinary gains in house prices on the populous east and west coasts.  Between 1980 and 1987, household wealth as a share of national income climbed 40 percentage points, retracing all the decline over the previous two decades within just seven years.  Second, discretionary items became exceptionally cheap during the 1980s.  The average price of discretionary purchases relative to that of all other consumer goods and services fluctuated within a fairly narrow range throughout the 1960s and 1970s.  But beginning in 1980 and continuing throughout the decade, prices of big-ticket items fell precipitously compared with the cost of other consumer expenditures.  That decline is all the more impressive given that one important nondiscretionary expense -- energy costs -- also plummeted.  At first, the availability of inexpensive imports probably contributed to overconsumption in the 1980s.  The relative price of imported consumer durable goods, including automobiles, began to head down in the late 1970s, long before the dollar soared.  But by the early 1980s, U.S. manufacturers were coming to grips with intensified foreign competition by slashing costs.  Between 1982 and 1988, unit labor costs for manufacturers of durable goods fell by about 11%.  For all non-farm businesses, unit labor costs rose by 17% over the same period.  Much of the buying binge can be understood as Americans with their new-found wealth rushing out and snatching up bargains.  Most of the remainder of the increase in consumption occurred because national income had been redistributed in such a way so as to depress the average saving rate.  For example, by 1987, the share of national income received as pension payments by retirees had risen 1.2 percentage points above its average value during the 1970s.  Similarly, government transfer payments to low-income households and retirees rose about two percentage points as a share of national income, despite cutbacks in some benefits in recent years.  Both these groups tend to spend most, if not all, of their current income.  Retirees with accumulated capital may even spend more than all of their income flow.  The other main beneficiaries of income redistribution were recipients of interest payments, whose share of total income in 1987 had climbed almost 50% above the average value for the 1970s, thanks to historically high real interest rates and the spread of interest-bearing accounts under the deregulation of financial institutions.  Here again, retirees tend to own a disproportionate share of interest-earning assets.  Conversely, income received by high-saving proprietors was on the decline in the 1980s.  Taken together, these shifts in income distribution accounted for about 40% (2.1 percentage points of national income) of the overconsumption through 1987.  This characterization of the changing distribution of income as a cause of the decline in personal saving during the 1980s stands in sharp contrast to other explanations that stress the importance of the changing age profile of the work force.  According to one of these views, baby boomers were responsible for the decline in saving as they entered their high-spending, and hence low-saving, years earlier this decade.  And now they are supposedly maturing into their high-saving years, which is elevating the saving rate.  This thesis rests on thin ice.  For one thing, there is no direct evidence that the baby-boomers were a generation of low savers.  As long as the government subsidized consumer financing through tax deductions for interest charges and as long as real interest rates were high, it made good sense to borrow and save as much as possible.  Between 1970 and 1983, the proportion of families with no financial assets declined, and average holdings increased 15% in constant dollars primarily because of a greater proportion of small holdings.  Besides, wages and salaries, which represent the wherewithal for spending by the baby-boom generation, actually declined as a share of national income during the 1980s.  Even if baby boomers were low savers, which does not seem to be the case, they simply did not receive sufficient earned income to explain the buying binge.  Likewise, to rationalize the recent recovery in personal saving since 1987 in terms of a maturing of the baby boomers into their high-saving years is purely fanciful.  After all, the proportion of the population between the ages of 20 and 44 will not begin to decline until 1991, and by 2000 it will have returned only to the level of 1979.  Any foundation for a secular rise in saving throughout the 1990s will not be built on demographic changes but rather on real wage gains and hence productivity performance.  Since 1987, two developments have helped to discourage overconsumption and hence to promote greater saving.  First, the stock market crash depressed household wealth, both directly by lowering equity values and indirectly by slowing the rate of appreciation in house values especially in the Northeast.  This reduction in net worth could explain a good deal of the consolidation in consumption spending.  By early 1989, household net worth still had not recovered its previous heights.  Second, many big-ticket items have become considerably more expensive now that income-tax deductions for consumer interest charges are being phased out.  As of 1988, the after-tax cost of the average car purchase with a standard four-year loan had risen 3.3% relative to what it was when interest rates were fully deductible.  By 1990, the after-tax cost will have increased by 4.2%.  None of this is to say that the U.S. has resolved its saving problem.  Although the current payback period for earlier excesses may persist for a while, it will not last forever.  Perhaps within the next year or two, the personal saving rate could be restored to the norms of previous decades, but further actions -- both public and private -- to stimulate saving are still needed if the U.S. is to wean itself completely from the premium interest rates that have been required to finance new plant and equipment.  ---  Mr. Gay is vice president and senior economist at Morgan Stanley.  Ford Motor Co. will idle one of its midsized car plants later this month because of slack dealer orders, and it is expected to announce today a new round of sales incentives aimed at jump starting demand.  Ford will shut from Aug. 7 to 16 the Atlanta assembly plant that builds Taurus and Mercury Sable mid-sized cars.  Ford's previous program of cut-rate loan deals and cash rebates ended last night.  This morning, the company plans to announce a new marketing program that has "a different approach than our competitors," a company spokesman said.  He declined to elaborate.  General Motors Corp. and Chrysler Corp. already have pumped up rebates on many of their models in recent weeks.  Chrysler last week doubled rebates on its Omni and Horizon subcompacts to $1,500.  GM extended its incentive programs, added generous dealer incentives, and launched a companywide marketing campaign to promote the latest round of discounts as the "Big Easy Sale."  The combination of big discounts, reports of sharp price increases planned for 1990 models, and easing interest rates contributed to a modest rebound in consumer demand during the first 20 days of July.  But the sales improvement hasn't been enough to clear dealer lots glutted by aggressive Big Three production during the first half of this year.  Medalist Industries Inc. said 52-year-old Edward D. Hopkins was named chairman, president and chief executive officer of the maker of leisure and industrial products.  Mr. Hopkins was formerly president and chief operating officer of Interlake Corp., Oak Brook, Ill.  As Medalist president and chief executive, he succeeds Peter A. Fischer, 46, who resigned but remains a director.  The post of chairman had been vacant since 1981.  Mr. Fischer had announced in April his intention to step aside.  President Bush called for the 50 state governors to meet this fall to discuss the nation's education problems.  The conference, to be held Sept. 27 and 28, would look for ways to "strengthen our schools, to enlarge opportunities, and to improve our nation's educational performance," Mr. Bush said.  Speaking at the National Governors' Association here, the president didn't give a location for the meeting, but aides said Washington, D.C., would probably host it.  The president called the September conference before cutting short a planned trip to Nevada and Oklahoma in the wake of reports that a U.S. hostage, Marine Lt. Col. William Higgins, had been executed in Lebanon.  Although the president routinely confers with governors on an informal, smaller scale, Mr. Bush said that the September meeting would be only the third such presidential-gubernatorial conference.  The first was held by President Theodore Roosevelt to discuss the environment, and the second by his cousin, President Franklin Roosevelt, to discuss the nation's economic problems during the Depression.  Baker Hughes Inc. said it completed its sale of 89% of its mining-equipment group to a Finnish company after reaching an agreement with the U.S. Justice Department.  Terms weren't disclosed for the transaction, which involved selling all of Baker Hughes's mining-equipment group except for its hydraulic-drill business in France and the U.S. to Oy Tampella AB, Tampere, Finland.  The status of the hydraulic operations prompted the Justice Department's request for additional information, which delayed the completion.  Baker Hughes is an oil-field-services concern.  Oy Tampella is a mining-equipment, forest-products, packaging and pulp, and paper-products company.  Separately, Baker Hughes said it signed five-year revolving-credit agreements totalling $300 million with a group of 20 foreign and U.S. banks.  The agreements replace existing credit agreements for $181 million, Baker Hughes said.  Chrysler Corp. posted a 6.6% increase in second-quarter earnings, but a top company executive forecast a deteriorating profit picture for the rest of the year.  The company said net income rose to $341 million, or $1.46 a share, from $320 million, or $1.45, a year earlier.  Per-share results were about flat because the number of shares increased.  The results were in the middle of the range forecast by analysts, and the company's stock rose 50 cents a share to $24.375 in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  Sales in the quarter climbed 8.2% to $10.11 billion from $9.34 billion.  But the No. 3 auto maker expects "pretty skinny" profits during the current quarter, R.S. Miller Jr., executive vice president and chief financial officer, said in an interview yesterday.  He added, however: "I don't see red ink" for the quarter, which, because plants prepare to produce new models, is usually the weakest of the year for auto makers.  Last year, Chrysler was only marginally profitable in the third quarter, earning $112.5 million, or 50 cents a share.  Mr. Miller didn't specify how earnings in the third quarter might compare with those year-earlier results.  But he did back off last spring's forecasts by company executives that Chrysler would have higher earnings during each quarter of this year.  "I can't give you any assurance of continuing year-over-year (earnings) gains," Mr. Miller said.  "That would be a hell of a stretch.  Incentive programs are coming at us like crazy."  The company said its second-quarter results were hurt by a 20% increase in buyer-incentive costs.  Mr. Miller said those costs now average about $900 on each vehicle sold, compared with about $700 a vehicle a year ago.  And those costs could head higher, because Chrysler last week doubled the incentives on some slow-selling models.  Rebates on the Omni/Horizon subcompacts now total nearly 25% of the cars' base sticker price.  "We are deeply concerned about the more competitive market facing us in the third and fourth quarters," Mr. Miller said.  This concern prompted the $1 billion cost-cutting program, which includes shedding 8% of the white-collar work force by year end, that Chrysler announced last week.  Chrysler was alone among Detroit's Big Three auto makers in reporting higher earnings for the quarter.  General Motors Corp. and Ford Motor Co. both released earnings last week, and posted declines of 3.5% and 15%, respectively.  Chrysler Financial Corp. fared relatively better than the financial units at GM and Ford, though its earnings did drop 6.6%.  Chrysler's share of the U.S. car market slipped during the quarter to 10.7% from 11.3%.  The company is increasing its emphasis on trucks, where its Jeeps and minivans are among the industry's strongest-selling vehicles.  In June, Chrysler sold more trucks than cars for the first time ever, and that pattern may continue.  Part of the reason, though, is weakness in the company's car lineup.  Chrysler is trying to address that problem by selling a richer mix of vehicles.  This fall the company will introduce two new luxury cars with familiar names, Imperial and Fifth Avenue.  Both will be "considerably larger and more upscale," the company said, than its current top-of-the line model, the New Yorker.  Later this year, the company also will launch a new luxury Town and Country minivan.  Still, major weak spots remain.  One is the subcompact segment, where Omni and Horizon are more than a decade old.  The Sundance and Shadow compact cars haven't sold well lately in the face of stern competition.  And sales of cars under the company's Eagle nameplate are sluggish.  For the first half of 1989, Chrysler's net income rose 37% to $692 million, or $2.96 a share, from $504 million, or $2.27, a year ago.  The 1988 results, however, were hurt by a charge of $93 million, or 42 cents a share, to cover plant closings.  First-half sales increased 12% to $20.06 billion from $17.91 billion.  Lotus Development Corp. said it agreed to acquire a minority interest in Rational Systems Inc., a closely held computer-software developer in Natick, Mass.  Terms weren't disclosed.  Rational Systems recently agreed to provide its DOS/16M for Lotus's Lotus 1-2-3 Release 3.  One month after it spent US$350 million to acquire Quebec Cartier Mining Co., Dofasco Inc. sold half of its interest in the big iron ore mine to a Japanese trading company and a Brazilian industrial concern.  Dofasco said Mitsui & Co. of Japan and Companhia Auxiliar de Empresas de Mineracao, or Caemi, each purchased 25% stakes in Quebec Cartier and its associated companies.  Dofasco said its contracts with the two buyers preclude it from divulging the terms of the transactions.  Hamilton, Ontario-based Dofasco, Canada's largest steelmaker, bought a 25% interest in Quebec Cartier March 31 from a unit of Pittsburgh-based USX Corp. and took full control June 30.  It had said it would sell part of the mine.  Quebec Cartier, in Port Cartier on the northern shore of the St. Lawrence River in Quebec, produces about 17 million tons of iron ore in concentrate and pellets annually.  Dofasco said Quebec Cartier's current management and work force will remain in place.  Dofasco said Mitsui is the largest importer of iron ore into Japan and Caemi owns 70% of MBR, Brazil's second largest iron ore producer.  A federal judge found dog-food giants Ralston Purina Co. and Alpo Petfoods Inc. guilty of lying in their advertisements for puppy food.  Ralston came in for particularly harsh criticism and was ordered to pay Alpo $10.4 million in damages for claims made for Purina Puppy Chow, which dominates that market niche.  Ads for the product had contended that eating it could help dogs avoid painful canine hip dysplasia when they mature.  The dysplasia is a common skeletal defect that occurs most frequently in larger breeds of dogs.  U.S. District Court Judge Stanley Sporkin found that Ralston's internal research was flawed and distorted.  The bone condition is largely inherited "and not affected by the nutritional balance in a dog's diet," he concluded.  His decision also alludes to an unnamed company official who ordered "that certain adverse information be destroyed."  Ralston, based in St. Louis, said it would appeal the decision, said the judge didn't understand the evidence, and said if it is not overturned "is certain to have a chilling effect on corporate research. . . .  Ralston stands behind its research and will continue its commitment to improve the quality of life for dogs."  Advertising lawyers said they believe the damage award to be one of the largest ever in a false-advertising case.  Judge Sporkin also found that Alpo had engaged in false advertising for its product, Alpo Puppy Food, in claiming that the product was preferred by veterinarians over Ralston's Puppy Chow.  But the court said it had decided against awarding Ralston damages because "the magnitude of the wrongdoing by Ralston in comparison to that of Alpo is so much greater."  Alpo is a unit of Grand Metropolitan PLC.  In declining to fine Alpo, the judge noted that the company had "acknowledged its misconduct and has ceased its offending advertising program, whereas Ralston persists in its position that its thoroughly inadequate and distorted research permits it to continue to claim its dog food can ameliorate" canine hip dysplasia.  The court also concluded that Ralston had brought allegations of false and misleading advertising against its rival "only as an afterthought, solely to counteract the more serious charges leveled against it by Alpo."  When it sued Ralston, Alpo contended that its rival had ignored a regulatory letter from the Food and Drug Administration expressing doubts about Puppy Chow's advertised claims and asking that the ads be pulled.  Allentown, Pa.-based Alpo said it was suing because "it is difficult to predict when the overburdened FDA will be able to take formal action."  A onetime Securities and Exchange Commission director of enforcement, the judge said he was "particularly disturbed" to find that two leading manufacturers and distributors of dog food "engaged in serious, deceptive advertising practices."  Accordingly, Judge Sporkin enjoined both companies from engaging in such practices in the future.  Ralston's ads, which began in 1985, were directed primarily at veterinarians and professional dog breeders.  In his decision, the court alluded to internal Ralston memoranda which found that those audiences "offered an excellent opportunity to increase puppy food sales."  The campaign touting Puppy Chow as an aid to sound bone development was intended in part to "blunt any national introduction of Alpo Puppy Food," the court found.  Indeed, the ads began several months after Alpo had introduced its version of a dry puppy food.  The court cited statements within Ralston's hierarchy that Alpo represented "potentially the greatest threat faced by Puppy Chow."  All told, Ralston spent $5.2 million on its campaign to link consumption of its Puppy Chow to lower hip joint laxity in dogs, thereby reducing the incidence of dysplasia and degenerative joint disease, the court found.  "To veterinarians, dog breeders and owners, Ralston's claims were spectacular because canine hip dysplasia is one of the most feared dog diseases," the court said.  But in its findings of fact, the judge laid out what it concluded was a series of flawed research efforts aimed at supporting the advertised claims.  In some instances, negative results were omitted and at least two doctors had warned Ralston that more research was required, the court found.  In a news release yesterday, Ralston struck back.  "We believe Judge Sporkin simply failed to grasp either the facts or the relevant law in this case," it said.  "Ralston Purina's advertising claims were supported by many years of research and testing. . . .  We find Judge Sporkin's ruling totally unjustifiable. . . ."   Alpo officials said they had no immediate comment on the judge's decision.  Ventura Entertainment Group Ltd. said it completed the purchase of the 100,000 square-foot Osmond Media Center in Orem, Utah, for $6.6 million in cash, debt and equity, from OCG Corp.  James Osmond, president of OCG, will serve as president of the facility, renamed the Ventura Media Center.  He also was named a director of Ventura Entertainment, a producer of television shows.  Sunstar Foods Inc. said it reached a definitive agreement to sell its consumer foods division for $6.8 million plus assumption of certain Sunstar liabilities.  Sunstar didn't disclose the buyer's identity, but it said holders of a majority of its shares had agreed to approve the sale.  Sunstar sold its beef division last month.  The consumer foods division, based in Streator, Ill., is the company's remaining operation.  Sunstar said that following the sale its board intends to recommend liquidation of the company, with proceeds to be distributed to shareholders.  {Second of a Series}  The images race across the television screen with such frequency they tend to blur: Another actor or athlete enters a drug-rehabilitation center, another drug-related murder occurs on a city street.  Drug addiction has captured the nation's attention, but consider also these government estimates: More than 1,000 people die daily from complications related to cigarette smoking; there are three problem drinkers in this country for each of its six million drug addicts.  From cigarettes and prescription drugs to cocaine and heroin, virtually every American knows personally someone who suffers from addiction.  Epidemics of addiction aren't new, but the size of the problem in this country has even most addiction experts baffled.  "It's almost as if there's something in the water," says Stephen Holtzman, a professor of pharmacology at Emory University in Atlanta.  "Whether it's a late-afternoon caffeinated soft drink to fend off fatigue or the nip of nicotine to calm the nerves, we as a people {turn to chemicals} instinctively."  While medical experts have long identified certain states of mind that are more accommodating to addiction -- stress, insecurity, fear -- scientists remain unsure as to why some people become addicted and others don't, why some extremely unhappy people reject drugs while some otherwise normal thrill seekers develop a debilitating addiction from just one use.  "Finding the addictive personality has been like finding the Holy Grail," says Dr. Ronald Siegel, a University of California, Los Angeles researcher who has written a book on drug addiction.  In fact, medical experts don't even agree on their definition of addiction.  Some apply a broad definition that includes such things as gambling and sex, while others insist that there must be a biochemical interaction involved, as in drugs, alcohol, caffeine and nicotine.  Nicotine was classified only last year by the surgeon general as having the addictive power of cocaine or heroin.  There have been a few medical breakthroughs.  Researchers have discovered that one-fourth to one-half of all children born of alcoholics are genetically predisposed to alcoholism.  Scientists also have developed some understanding of how addictive substances interact with the chemicals in the brain, but they have yet to discover why this interaction sometimes produces an addiction or how this chemical process can be arrested.  Yesterday, the National Institute on Drug Abuse released a new survey showing that the number of people using illicit drugs, while still huge, has actually declined in recent years.  But the survey said the number of chronic users is rising.  Officials blame the rise on crack, the smokable and easily affordable form of cocaine that is also the most addictive substance on the market.  President Bush's drug czar, William Bennett, yesterday credited enhanced public awareness of the dangers of drug use for the overall decline.  But he added, "Drug crime is up, drug trafficking is up, drug deaths are up, drug emergencies in our hospitals are up -- all since 1985, and much of this can be explained in one word: crack."  Largely because of crack, drug-related emergency-room cases increased at hospitals in 16 of the nation's 19 largest cities, a new congressional study found.  Such cases were up 210% in New Orleans, 199% in Philadelphia and 134% in the nation's capital.  Treatment centers nationwide also report that their average patient is getting steadily younger and becoming addicted in a shorter period of time.  The nationwide Cocaine Hotline, a toll-free call-in service that advises cocaine abusers where to get help, estimates that 5,000 people are introduced to various forms of cocaine every day.  Crack can unleash a vicious streak of violence in the abuser unlike almost any other substance.  In suburban Boston recently, a young mother who was strung out on crack flung her young baby against a wall so hard the child died of a broken neck.  Case workers describe the mother as coming from "a respectable middle class family."  This illustrates another facet of the U.S. drug addiction problem: Far more than in comparable European countries, drugs have penetrated all strata of American society.  A recent survey of callers to the Cocaine Hotline showed that while 55% of those who identified themselves as addicts said they were unemployed, 34% said they had jobs paying more than $25,000 a year and 30% said they were college graduates.  Consider the case of the Oliva family of Boston: Stephen is a jeweler, his wife was a corporate lawyer.  Described by Mr. Oliva as "flower children," the Olivas, like many who grew up in the 1960s, experimented first with marijuana as a form of recreation.  As he got older, Mr. Oliva says he found that harder drugs, particularly heroin, blocked out the frustrations and anger of daily life.  He and his wife both slid slowly from recreational use to addiction.  Two years ago, while he roamed the streets looking for a heroin fix, Mr. Oliva's wife was found dead on a park bench of a cocaine overdose.  Now, after years of sharing heroin needles with other addicts, Mr. Oliva is himself dying of AIDS.  Lately, Mr. Oliva has been spending a lot of his time attending funerals of fellow addicts who have succumbed to the disease.  "Speaking from my experience," he remarks, "the drug epidemic makes the Black Plague look like the common cold."  In addition to its tremendous emotional toll, the nation's addiction problem also has broad economic effects.  A recent Congressional report estimates that last year drug abuse cost Americans more than $100 billion in drug purchases, lost productivity of addicted employees and the medical cost to treat addiction.  General Motors Corp. estimates that drug abuse alone costs it more than $1 billion annually in worker absenteeism and the expense of addiction treatment programs that can run as high as $20,000 a year.  GM says that in the year before seeking treatment, the average substance abuser works only about 140 days.  All this heightens the urgency for drug researchers seeking some clues that would allow physicians to identify those at high risk in order to head off addiction.  Drug researchers now know that different addictive substances attack different sections of the brain.  Marijuana affects the area of the brain that governs memory and learning, while amphetamines work on the brain area that controls voluntary movement.  Cocaine works directly on the hippocampas, or pleasure center, that responds to such stimuli as sex and food.  Inside the brain, such pleasurable sensations are normally passed from one nerve cell to another by a chemical called dopamine.  The transmitting cell releases dopamine, which triggers the nerve endings on the adjacent cell.  The transmitting cell then draws the dopamine back inside it to be reused.  Cocaine, however, prevents the transmitting cell from reclaiming its dopamine, and thus the pleasurable sensation continues to be transmitted long after it would have ended.  As a result, blood pressure rises, muscles constrict, breathing quickens and the heart beats faster.  After taking about 25 miligrams of cocaine, a drug user's heart begins to pump at about the same level it would during strenuous exercise.  It takes about 45 minutes for the heartbeat to return to normal.  Repeated cocaine use causes the nerve endings to develop a tolerance to dopamine, and ever increasing doses of the drug are then needed to produce the increasing levels of dopamine needed to produce a pleasurable sensation.  Cocaine addicts often suffer a type of withdrawal caused when cells temporarily run out of dopamine and lose any ability to transmit pleasure signals.  Feelings of unhappiness, irritability or apathy often result.  Crack, because it is smoked, gets to the brain in eight seconds, or much faster than regular cocaine or most other drugs.  It also reaches the brain in purer form, which explains the drug's potency.  Scientists don't yet understand whether the key to addiction lies primarily in personality traits or in some chemical predisposition.  Some researchers believe there are those who are destined to become addicts the moment they begin consuming an addictive substance because of the chemical make-up of the brain; others believe the answer lies with the state of mind of the user, and still others believe it is a combination of these forces.  The hunt for an addictive personality has been confounded by the seemingly inexplicable variety of those who become addicts.  Emory's Dr. Holtzman says he remains stunned by the case of an exceptional physician colleague who despite being a specialist in cardio-pulmonary medicine "smoked himself to death."  Another curious fact, says John Hughes, an addiction specialist at the University of Vermont School of Medicine, is that "we don't see alcohol and drug abuse in the Amish and Mormon communities, regardless of biochemistry and personality."  This leads him to conclude that the role of upbringing and environment should be studied more carefully.  Searching for a chemical or genetic predisposition to addiction has proved equally problematic.  For one, scientists have been studying the drug issue seriously only for less than a decade, compared with about 20 years studying alcoholism, where they have made progress.  Researchers have identified single genes as well as combinations of genes that are sometimes passed from alcoholics to their offspring that they believe create a predisposition toward alcoholism, much like blue eyes or nearsightedness.  And a few minor discoveries have been made with regard to drugs and other chemicals.  Preliminary studies show that those people born with a shortage of tranquilizing neurochemicals, called endorphins, may have a greater tendency toward addiction than others.  Likewise, research on caffeine shows that about 5% of all people are immune to its addictive powers because of their chemical makeup, according to Emory's Dr. Holtzman.  The National Institute for Drug Addiction says its researchers have discovered that many young addicts -- those generally under the age of 21 -- were led to drugs or alcohol by some form of clinical mental disorder that had gone untreated.  "The early recognition and effective treatment of psychiatric disorders should be able to prevent a sizable portion of the drug problem among the young," the federal drug agency said in a recent report.  Physicians have also begun to catalog a host of side effects stemming from long-term drug use.  The University of Connecticut's health center reports a spate of heart-attack cases among drug users in their teens and early 20s.  Hospitals are also reporting that cocaine use can cause brain seizures or even hemorrhages.  Heroin and morphine abuse has been known to cause serious memory loss and even blindness.  Most dangerous is the mixing of various drugs or drugs and alcohol.  Joan Patterson, a rehabilitation worker at the Mount Vernon Community Mental Health Center in Fairfax, Va., tells of a 24-year-old treated at the center who was once a top high-school student, but whose brain was damaged by repeated use of combinations of different drugs.  Now, he needs help to mow the lawn; when he gets to the end of a row, someone has to turn him and the machine around.  Ms. Patterson says he has little chance of recovery.  In interviews, addicts themselves claim to be aware of the risks they are taking.  But with their logic clouded by drugs, many aren't willing to attempt rehabilitation.  Eric Robinson, 18, began taking drugs five years ago while growing up in Wisconsin.  His hair is dyed platinum blond, his fingers bear rings with skulls on them and his fingernails are painted black -- all he says, manifestations of "my interior state of hell."  Eric's addiction is so bad he often takes LSD, marijuana and alcohol at once.  He says he can't do without the escapist visions that the drugs produce in his mind: "In a room, you see things like the stitches on the sofa, dust and shadows that you wouldn't see otherwise," he says.  Four times he has attempted suicide with deliberate overdoses, only to be saved by friends.  Once, while using LSD, he carved the words "I hate you" into his arm with an old razor.  He occasionally attends free drug-counseling sessions at Bridge Over Troubled Waters in Boston, where he now lives in an abandoned building.  But he resists the center's recommendation that he seek detoxification help.  "I can't quit," he says.  Lawyer Johnson, a fellow street dweller in Boston, says he wouldn't quit even if he could.  The 37-year-old, who says he lacks any marketable job skills or education, spends his days and occasionally his nights on the street looking for money and drugs.  He sometimes checks into a homeless shelter at night.  "Life has lost its appeal for me," he says, while admittedly high on crack.  "I ain't got nothing to do, I ain't got a job, I ain't got no money.  And I can't sleep.  This is life for me.  This is life for many people I know.  That's why I take drugs."  Minnesota Power & Light Co. said it sold its Universal Telephone Inc. unit to Century Telephone Enterprises Inc. for $90 million.  Century Telephone is based in Monroe, La.  Maxwell Communication Corp. reported pretax profit of #192 million ($316 million) for the 15 months ended March 31 vs. #166 million for the 12 months ended Dec. 31.  Maxwell changed its fiscal year to end in March rather than December.  Profit attributable to shareholders, or net income, rose to #190 million from #131.8 million, largely because of a #42 million extraordinary gain.  Sales rose to #1.39 billion from #884.1 million.  As part of its transformation into a specialized publishing company from a communications group, British-based Maxwell last year made two major U.S. acquisitions, buying Macmillan Inc. for $2.5 billion and Dun & Bradstreet Corp.'s Official Airlines Guide for $750 million.  Since then, the group has raised $2 billion from the sale of Macmillan units and several British businesses, in an effort to reduce debt.  Further disposals, including Maxwell Graphics Inc., are expected to raise an additional $1.4 billion by March, Maxwell said.  Holiday Corp. said its Embassy Suites Inc. subsidiary completed the sale of its hotel in Irvine, Calif., to an offshore investor for $42.6 million.  Holiday, a lodging and casino concern, said it expects to report a pretax gain in excess of $12 million and will realize approximately $32 million in net proceeds from the sale.  The company didn't say when it might realize the gain.  Holiday said it would use the funds for general corporate purposes.  Embasssy Suites will continue to manage the property.  Montedison S.p.A. said it plans to acquire the shares in Himont Inc. and Erbamont N.V. it doesn't already own in two cash-and-warrants transactions valued at a total of $1.07 billion.  Montedison owns 81% of Himont, the world's leading supplier of polypropylene, which is based in Wilmington, Del.  The Milan chemicals and pharmaceuticals concern holds 72% of Erbamont, a maker of pharmaceuticals incorporated in the Netherlands.  A Montedison spokesman said taking full control of the units would give his company more flexibility in international markets and let it "manage in a more direct way its chemicals and pharmaceuticals activities."  Listing the companies separately "has developed into a somewhat unrewarding experience," said James T. Harmon, president of Wertheim & Co., which helped Montedison make initial public offerings for the two companies and now is advising it on the current offers.  Having separate companies indirectly controlled by Montedison made "managing them more cumbersome," Mr. Harmon said.  "It created potential conflicts of interest within the group."  For each Himont share, Montedison will offer $47 in cash and a warrant to purchase one share of Montedison stock, valued at $2, for a total of $49.  Erbamont holders will be offered $35 in cash per share, plus a warrant for a share of Montedison, for a total of $37.  In New York Stock Exchange trading yesterday, Himont shares rose $3.625 to $47.75, while Erbamont shares gained $5 to $36.125.  Wertheim's Mr. Harmon, who clashed sharply with Montedison Chairman Raul Gardini over the price offered minority shareholders of Ausimont N.V. in a similar offering this year, was less critical of the current operation.  Mr. Harmon said the market prices of Himont and Erbamont had been high because of rumors that Montedison was planning to buy the remaining shares.  He noted that the price Montedison is offering for Himont is 75% above the stock's price when the company went public in 1986 for $28 a share, while the price offered for Erbamont is more than double its initial offering price of $18 a share.  "That isn't terrible," he said.  Himont's and Erbamont's boards are expected to meet within a few days to study Montedison's bids, which are subject to their approval.  Montedison should be able to finance the operation with existing credit lines, a company spokesman said.  The company's restructuring program, which included the formation of the Enimont chemicals joint venture with state-owned Enichem S.p.A. last month, has reduced Montedison's debt to 2.2 trillion lire ($1.62 billion) from more than eight trillion lire at the end of 1987.  About 3.8 trillion lire of debt was erased from Montedison's balance sheets through the formation of the Enimont joint venture.  Montedison denied that the purpose of the offers was to include Himont and Erbamont in the Enimont venture.  Mr. Gardini in June set off a political storm when he declared that after three years, he would like to bring additional Montedison chemicals activities into Enimont and thus gain control of the company.  Actually, his state partners would be able to block such a move.  A Montedison spokesman conceded that purchasing the Himont and Erbamont shares would provide some tax benefits for the Milan company, but couldn't say how much.  The European Community is studying whether to open an investigation into special tax credits of close to one trillion lire Montedison will receive for the formation of Enimont.  Iomega Corp. said it signed a contract with Eastman Kodak Co., Rochester, N.Y., to supply 20-megabyte removable mass storage drives for use in the Kodak Ektaprint Input Processor.  Terms weren't disclosed.  The processor is part of a new Kodak high-speed electronic printing system being marketed to direct-mail advertisers, commercial print shops and government agencies.  Iomega makes and sells high-performance removable mass storage products for desktop computers.  McKesson Corp., San Francisco, said it retained an investment banker to help it "review alternatives" regarding "increasing or disposing of" its 86.2% interest in PCS Inc., a processor of prescription drug claims for the health care industry.  McKesson declined to say why it was considering changing its stake in the Scottsdale, Ariz., concern, which it began acquiring more than 20 years ago.  A McKesson spokesman, however, said that the decision would be made "expeditiously."  Based upon recent trading ranges, McKesson's 12.5 million shares in the company is valued at about $187.5 million; an additional two million PCS shares are publicly owned.  Separately, the PCS board announced that it named John C. Pfeiffer, a PCS director, as president and chief executive officer.  He succeeds Donald B. Dahlin, whose resignation was announced July 24.  Mr. Pfeiffer, 63 years old, retired as a McKesson vice president in 1988; he will serve until a permanent replacement is named, McKesson said.  A seat on the Chicago Mercantile Exchange was sold for $510,000, equal to the previous sale on July 24.  Seats currently are quoted at $500,000, bid, and $530,000, asked.  The record price for a full membership on the exchange is $550,000, set last March 9.  Divi Hotels N.V. said negotiations with Kohlberg & Co. to raise additional equity capital were terminated.  The resort operator said it has entered into a consulting agreement with Palmer Group, based in Chicago, to help raise equity capital at terms more favorable than those offered by Kohlberg.  Kohlberg is a closely held merchant bank based in New York.  Divi and Kohlberg two weeks ago said they were discussing a transaction in which Divi would receive $30 million in cash from Kohlberg in exchange for certain assets and warrants in the company.  ACQUISITION: Capital Cities/ABC Inc. acquired the 86% it didn't own of Satellite Music Network Inc., Dallas, for about $48 million.  Satellite Music broadcasts live music in various formats via satellite on more than 1,000 AM and FM radio stations.  ABC had paid $5.5 million for a stake in 1987.  WHO'S NEWS: David Nicksay, 36, was named president of Morgan Creek Productions, an entertainment concern.  He was senior vice president, motion picture production, at Paramount Communications Inc.'s film division.  He succeeds Joe Roth, who became Fox Film Corp. chairman.  Falling interest rates sent institutional investors on a buying spree, sending broad stock market indexes to all-time highs.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average gained 25.42 to 2660.66, a post-crash high.  The bellwether average is now just 61.76 points short of its record close of 2722.42, set in August 1987.  Broader averages vaulted past their highs to establish new records, as the Standard & Poor's 500-stock index gained 3.93 to 346.08 and the New York Stock Exchange composite index rose 2.03 to 192.41.  Big Board volume was 166,650,000 shares.  Advancers led decliners, 1,054 to 490.  In morning trading, big block trades accounted for much of the activity -- a sign of institutions committing more money to the stock market, traders said.  Falling interest rates were the catalyst for institutions' heavy stock buying as the bond market rallied and a number of banks reduced their prime lending rates.  Two waves of stock-index arbitrage buy programs -- where traders sell futures and buy the underlying stocks to take advantage of small, temporary price differences -- propelled the market higher in afternoon trading as well.  The industrial average would have gained an additional 2.28 points except for the fact that Alcoa, USX and Westinghouse traded ex-dividend.  Robert L. Kahan, partner and manager of equity trading at Montgomery Securities in San Francisco, said that while program trading helped boost the industrials, some sectors of the market were gaining for more fundamental reasons.  He said financial stocks were strong in response to the declining interest-rate environment.  Bank stocks were responding to prospects of lower-cost funds for lending, he said, while insurance stocks gained along with the value of their portfolios, which are largely invested in long-term Treasury bonds.  Among major banks, Manufacturers Hanover gained 1 3/8 to 43 3/8 and J.P. Morgan advanced 1 1/4 to 41 1/8.  Federal Home Loan Mortgage, or Freddie Mac, rose 1 3/8 to 78 7/8, and Federal National Mortgage Association, or Fannie Mae, advanced 2 3/8 to 99 1/8.  In the insurance group, Travelers Insurance gained 1 to 44 1/4 and Chubb rose 1 1/4 to 75 1/4.  Ryder Systems rose 1/4 to 29 1/8.  A news report said investor Sam Zell has acquired about 5% of the company's stock.  Ryder Systems declined to comment.  Bristol-Myers and Squibb crowded the most active list, with trading in the two issues amounting to nearly 4% of total volume on the Big Board.  The two companies have agreed to merge into the world's second-largest drug company after Merck.  Bristol-Myers was unchanged at 48 1/4 on volume of 4.4 million shares.  Squibb was unchanged at 110 3/8 on volume exceeding 2.4 million shares.  Merck slipped 1/4 to 76.  Other drug stocks were active.  Upjohn rose 1 3/8 to 36, while SmithKline-Beecham added 3 to 43 1/4.  Both stocks appeared on the most active list.  Warner-Lambert rose 3 to 110 1/4.  Canadian Pacific continued to climb amid rumors that Hanson PLC is accumulating shares of the company.  The stock was third on the most active list, rising 1/8 to 23 1/2.  On Friday, the stock closed with a gain of 1 3/8.  Hanson gained 1/4 to 18 7/8.  Erbamont N.V. leapt 5 to 36 1/8 and Himont Inc. advanced 3 5/8 to 47 3/4.  Montedison S.p.A. proposed buying the remaining outstanding shares of the two companies that it doesn't already own.  It is offering $35 in cash plus warrants for each Erbamont share and $47 in cash plus warrants for Himont shares.  Montedison gained 1/4 to 18 1/2.  Coca-Cola Co. surged 4 1/2 to 68, following Warren Buffett's disclosure that he is seeking clearance to buy as much as 15% of the company's shares.  Coke said it is "delighted" with Mr. Buffett's interest.  Buffett-controlled Berkshire Hathaway, the board's priciest stock, added 75 to 7,500.  McDonnell Douglas, which said it will sell its Network Systems business to British Telecommunications for $355 million, gained 1 1/2 to 74 3/4 on the news.  British Telecommunications' ADRs rose 3/8 to 43.  Pennwalt surged 4 5/8 to 131 5/8.  Elf Aquitaine said the Federal Trade Commission will permit it to complete the $132-a-share tender offer for Pennwalt.  Compaq Computer rebounded 2 7/8 to 88 1/4, following its 2 1/4-point loss on Friday.  The company repeated optimistic forecasts for the personal computer industry at a meeting with analysts in Boston.  At the meeting, the company said it expects the industry to grow at 15% to 20% over the next year.  The projection was more bullish than one given last week by Microsoft, the industry's primary supplier of operating system software.  Some other computer stocks showed strength: International Business Machines closed up 1 5/8 to 115.  Digital Equipment rose 2 to 95.  USX slid 1 to 35 5/8 amid speculation that Carl Icahn may sell his 11% stake in the company.  The American Stock Exchange Index added 2.05 to 376.56.  Volume totaled 11,610,000 shares.  Wang Laboratories ran into trouble, slipping 1/4 to 6 1/8.  The company reported a $375 million loss for its fourth quarter, ended June 30, compared with net income of $13.4 million a year earlier.  The latest quarter includes restructuring charges of $234 million and a one-time tax provision of $30 million.  The computer maker also announced that it wouldn't pay a dividend in the current quarter, and said it would lay off more workers in the coming year.  Western Digital lost 1/4 to 8 3/4.  The company reported fiscal fourth-quarter earnings of 15 cents a share, down from a yearago share net of 52 cents.  Illinois Central Transportation Co. said the $440 million, or $20-a-share, acquisition of the company by Prospect Group Inc. has been completed, following the transaction's approval by the railroad's shareholders.  Prospect is a New York investment concern.  Clarcor Inc. said it agreed to purchase 501,600 shares of its common stock, or a 6.3% stake, from Banner Industries Inc. and certain other parties for $41.50 a share.  In connection with the purchase, Clarcor said Banner and related parties agreed not to acquire any additional shares or take any actions to seek control or influence the management, board or policies of Clarcor for five years.  Clarcor, a Rockford, Ill., maker of packaging and filtration products, has about 7.9 million shares outstanding.  In national over-the-counter trading yesterday, Clarcor shares tumbled $6.125 to close at $35.625.  W.R. Berkley Corp. said it terminated its agreement to acquire a unit of John Hancock Mutual Life Insurance Co., Boston.  In mid-June, Berkley, an insurance holding company, had said it agreed to purchase Unigard Insurance Group, a regional property-casualty insurer, for about $130 million.  Berkley said the companies were unable to agree on certain terms of the proposed acquisition.  Consolidated Rail Corp., Philadelphia, said it plans to establish an Employee Stock Ownership Plan funded by as much as $600 million of its shares.  The freight railroad said, subject to labor talks as well as resolution of tax and other legal issues, an ESOP trustee would borrow as much as $600 million to acquire the shares.  About 30,000 employees would be eligible to participate in the plan, which would have a maximum value of $500 million to union employees and a minimum of $100 million to non-union employees.  Conrail said the plan would be in lieu of some existing benefits, contributions to existing benefit plans, or some other arrangements.  The plan would have an initial size of up to 10% of Conrail's common, or about $260 million at current prices.  U.S. Banknote Co. said it extended to Aug. 10 its $7-a-share offer for International Banknote Co. to allow additional time for discussions with the Justice Department's Antitrust Division.  A unit of U.S. Banknote has offered to buy up to 14.9 million common shares of International Banknote, a printer of currency and stock certificates.  At July 28, 9.3 million shares, or about 49% of those outstanding, had been tendered.  Closely held U.S. Banknote also produces stock certificates and currencies.  A federal judge in W. Herbert Hunt's 10-month-old personal bankruptcy case stripped the former billionaire of the exclusive right to negotiate with his creditors and invited creditors to submit their own reorganization plans.  But Judge Harold C. Abramson extended the exclusive negotiating rights of Mr. Hunt's brother, Nelson Bunker Hunt, until Aug. 31, as both sides apparently have been moving closer to a settlement in that case.  Judge Abramson ruled against W. Herbert Hunt despite claims from Mr. Hunt's attorney, Stephen A. McCartin, that his client has made "significant progress," especially in negotiations with the Internal Revenue Service, which claims the brothers together owe more than $1 billion in back taxes.  Mr. McCartin said competing plans would distract from those talks and lead to confrontations as creditors jockey for position with their own plans.  Such confrontations have already split the ad hoc negotiating committee that once included the three major creditors: the IRS, Manufacturers Hanover Trust Co. and Minpeco S.A., a Peruvian minerals concern.  Last month, Manufacturers Hanover, which is seeking repayment of a $36 million loan, asked the judge to give its claim priority over that of Minpeco, which won a $130 million jury award last year in a case stemming from the Hunt brothers' alleged attempts to corner the 1979-1980 silver market.  Manufacturers Hanover and the IRS have drafted a reorganization plan that would substantially reduce Minpeco's ability to collect from the Hunts.  Minpeco, which is drafting its own plan, has threatened to sue if the IRS and Manufacturers Hanover try to force their plan through the court.  Meanwhile, even as a 1982 IRS case against the Hunts has gone into a three-week recess in Washington, D.C., settlement negotiations between the IRS and the Hunts continue.  Mr. McCartin said W. Herbert Hunt has already agreed to sell everything but his personal possessions and give 70% of the proceeds to the IRS and 30% to other creditors.  But points of conflict remain.  The IRS wants to maintain a $90 million claim on the future earnings of Mr. Hunt, who has only agreed to $60 million.  Abbott Laboratories said it completed an agreement to acquire Pancretec Inc., a San Diego-based manufacturer of ambulatory-infusion pumps for the health-care market, for about $54 million.  Pancretec's shareholders voted overwhelmingly in favor of the proposed merger, allowing Abbott to acquire all of Pancretec's equity outstanding, Abbott said.  Pancretec, which has become an Abbott subsidiary, will continue to develop and manufacture ambulatory-infusion systems for both hospital and alternate-site applications.  Eaton Corp. said it completed the purchase of King-Seeley Inc., a unit of Household International Inc., of Prospect Heights, Ill.  King-Seeley, Kendallville, Ind., makes electromechanical and electronic control devices for electric ranges.  Separately, Eaton said it sold the stock of its Eaton Credit Corp. unit to Helios Capital Corp., a subsidiary of Sun Company Inc. of Radnor, Pa.  Eaton Credit is a full-service commercial finance company and, under terms of the acquisition, Helios can retain the Eaton Credit name for up to one year.  Eaton makes engineered products that serve the automotive, industrial, commercial and defense markets.  General Instrument Corp. said it will buy about 6.8 million shares at $35.50 a share under a recent "Dutch auction" offer to shareholders.  The maker of cable-TV electronics, coaxial cable and satellite-encryption systems said about 8.1 million shares were tendered under the offer, which expired Friday.  The company had invited holders to tender shares at prices between $34 and $38 a share.  It will be purchasing about 84% of the shares tendered, and all odd lots -- blocks of less than 100 shares each.  The purchase amounts to about 20% of the company's shares.  In a Dutch auction, the buyer sets a price range, and holders give a price at which they are willing to sell shares.  The buyer then picks a price and buys shares at that price from holders who offered to sell at that price or lower.  Unocal Corp. posted an 88% increase in second-quarter net income to $120 million, or $1.02 a share, from $64 million, or 55 cents a share, a year ago, on a 20% rise in revenue.  Revenue increased to $3.08 billion from a restated $2.58 billion a year ago.  Latest second-quarter net included $27 million in after-tax gains from the sale of surplus properties in Torrance, Calif., and San Diego County, and an $11 million gain from the settlement of certain pension obligations.  Year-earlier net included a $17 million reduction in the company's income-tax provision because of adjustments of foreign deferred tax liabilities and an $8 million gain from the settlement of natural-gas contracts, offset by a $6 million provision for continuing litigation.  In addition to the extraordinary gains, Unocal attributed the improved earnings in the latest quarter to higher crude-oil prices and improved oil-shale operations.  Capital expenditures in the quarter fell to $262 million from $319 million in the year-earlier quarter.  Total debt at June 30 was down to $4.3 billion this year from $4.6 billion last year.  For the six months, net fell 14% to $207 million, or $1.77 a share, from $242 million, or $2.08 a share, a year ago.  Year-earlier net included a $456 million gain from an accounting change, offset by $322 million of losses from write-downs of assets.  Unocal's revenue for the six months climbed 17% to $5.72 billion from $4.89 billion.  Separately, Unocal named Claude S. Brinegar to the new post of vice chairman.  Mr. Brinegar, 62 years old, will continue as executive vice president and chief financial officer of Unocal, and as a member of the executive committee.  Are there any rights left for shareholders?  Not many, it seems, in the wake of last week's Delaware Supreme Court decision in the battle for Time Inc.  And that upsets advocates of shareholder rights.  They say that the message from the Delaware courts is clear.  If shareholders don't like the way a board is running a company, they have two choices: try to unseat the board through a proxy fight or sell their stock.  But because it costs millions of dollars to mount a proxy fight that is likely to fail anyway, selling the stock remains the only practical alternative for most investors.  The Delaware Chancery Court, whose decision in the Time case was upheld last week by the state Supreme Court, "found a way to allow corporate managers to appropriate the shareholders' property with complete impunity," says Robert A.G. Monks, a Washington consultant who heads Institutional Shareholder Services Inc.  The Chancery Court declined to block Time's $14 billion purchase of Warner Communications Inc., despite protests by some angry Time shareholders that they should be able to choose between Time's plan to buy Warner and a $200-a-share offer for Time by Paramount Communications Inc.  Chancellor William T. Allen ruled that Time's board was entitled to pursue its long-term strategy and proceed with the acquisition of Warner without a shareholder vote, even though the board knew that the Warner deal would depress Time's stock price in the short term and figured that many shareholders would prefer to accept Paramount's bid.  Time shares closed yesterday at $143.625, far below Paramount's offer.  Whether a company performs brilliantly or poorly, Chancellor Allen wrote, "The financial vitality of the corporation and the value of the company's shares is in the hands of the directors and managers of the firm.  The corporation law does not operate on the theory that directors, in exercising their powers to manage the firm, are obligated to follow the wishes of a majority of shares.  In fact, the directors, not shareholders, are charged with the duty to manage the firm."  While many takeover law experts say that the Delaware court decisions don't really curb shareholder rights, several lawyers who specialize in representing disgruntled shareholders argue that the Time decisions put much more power in the hands of directors at the expense of shareholders.  "This decision says that directors do not have an obligation to present alternatives to shareholders," says Sherrie Savett of the Philadelphia law firm of Berger & Montague, which represented Time shareholders in the Delaware litigation.  "If the board has a long-range plan and it thinks that it is the best one, the shareholders don't have a right to a vote, and the directors can cram a transaction down their throats.  "It will make it much easier for boards to reject hostile takeover bids," Mrs. Savett says.  "For investors who often don't care about the long-term future of the company because they want to get the greatest return now, this bodes ill."  But there are situations in which directors can't ignore the short-term interests of shareholders.  In a landmark 1985 takeover case involving Revlon Inc., the Delaware Supreme Court ruled that once directors decide to sell or drastically restructure a company, they must act as neutral "auctioneers" and obtain the highest price possible.  Another exception involves the use of "poison pills," which are stock-rights plans that, unless redeemed by a board, make a hostile takeover prohibitively expensive for a bidder.  In two recent cases, the Chancery Court ordered boards to redeem poison pills at the end of a takeover battle so that shareholders could choose between the board's proposed restructuring and the bidder's cash tender offer.  However, neither exception came into play in the battle for Time.  Chancellor Allen ruled that Time was not in "Revlon mode," because its directors had never decided to sell the company.  And Chancellor Allen wasn't asked to order Time to redeem its poison pill because Paramount wasn't ready to buy Time shares under its tender offer.  Many takeover law experts say the full impact of the Time case won't be known until the Delaware Supreme Court issues a written opinion in the case, which might not happen for several months.  Last week, a three-justice panel of the court issued a brief oral ruling upholding Chancellor Allen's decision.  "If the Delaware Supreme Court wants to, it can write a fairly narrow opinion" restricted to the unusual facts of the Time case, says Bernard Black, an associate professor at Columbia University Law School.  "Or they can write something much broader that sheds light on future cases."  The Time case, Mr. Black says, could give the state Supreme Court "the opportunity to say things that people would interpret as shedding light on the 'just say no' defense," in which a company's board simply refuses to entertain a hostile takeover bid.  Explicit support by the Delaware Supreme Court for this defense would be a major blow for shareholder rights.  In a broad sense, the Time case shows that "absent some really offensive behavior by the board, the Court of Chancery and perhaps the Supreme Court are going to give great latitude to the board of directors," says Richard Greenfield, a Haverford, Pa., lawyer who specializes in representing shareholders.  "It just makes that point in a very forceful way," he says.  Ramada Inc. holders at the annual meeting approved the Phoenix, Ariz., company's planned restructuring into a new casino company, Aztar Corp.  The plan calls for the company to sell its hotel business to New World Development Co. of Hong Kong and Prime Motor Inns Inc., Fairfield, N.J., for $540 million and to distribute cash and stock in Aztar to Ramada shareholders.  For each Ramada share, holders will get one-half of an Aztar share and $7 in cash minus 40% of any amount by which the mean trading price of Ramada's common exceeds $14 a share the day the transaction is completed.  They also will get one cent a share of Ramada stock to redeem preferred-stock purchase rights.  The new company will operate the TropWorld Casino & Entertainment Resort in Atlantic City, N.J., the Tropicana Resort and Casino on the Las Vegas strip and the Ramada Express Hotel and Casino in Laughlin, Nev.  Aztar will keep most Ramada senior executives, with Richard Snell remaining chairman and chief executive officer.  Growing concern that the U.S. economy is heading toward a recession and expectations that the Federal Reserve will further ease interest rates will keep the dollar from rising this month, a survey of currency analysts found.  But according to the consensus of 10 analysts in four nations interviewed by Dow Jones International News Service, the U.S. currency will rise modestly as summer gives way to autumn.  Most of the analysts, interviewed last week in Tokyo, London, New York and Frankfurt, expect spiritless summer trading for the month.  "It's a quiet time of the year," said Dale Larson, a senior economist with Bank of America in Los Angeles.  "The dollar has just come off a period of strength, and declining U.S. rates are reducing {its} source of strength."  According to the analysts' average estimates, the dollar will end the month at 1.8652 marks and 138.14 yen in August.  In late New York trading yesterday, the dollar stood at 1.8648 marks and 136.95 yen, down from 1.8805 marks and 139.20 yen late Friday.  The British pound was quoted at $1.6651, up from $1.6530 late Friday.  A month ago, a similar poll forecast that the dollar would be at 1.9570 marks and 144.85 yen at the end of July.  Although analysts surveyed in June were too optimistic in forecasting the currency's position at the end of July, they did foresee the gradual easing in U.S. monetary policy that has damped investor enthusiasm for the dollar.  Several analysts said they expected an easing of U.S. interest rates to reduce demand for the dollar in the longer term.  In recent testimony before Congress, Federal Reserve Board Chairman Alan Greenspan said the U.S. central bank's current policy is aimed at avoiding "an unnecessary and destructive recession."  The chairman's comments were viewed by many as a shift away from the Fed's longstanding emphasis on cooling inflation, leaning instead toward an easier credit policy in response to a slowing U.S. economy.  Analysts agreed that there is a widening belief that the Fed will further relax rates.  Some traders predicted that the Fed will push the federal funds rate, the rate on short-term loans between member banks, below its current 9% to about 8.25%.  Werner Bauer, chief trader with Bethmann Bank in Frankfurt, sees the federal funds rate pegged lower but says, "It won't happen overnight."  According to Richard Urwin, a currency economist at S.G. Warburg & Co. in London, the Fed's growing concern about a possible recession will lead to a further easing of rates and a lower dollar in the short term.  But Mr. Urwin said that as it becomes clearer that a recession isn't around the corner, the U.S. central bank will take a more cautious credit stance and the dollar will regain its strength.  Ron Talley, a senior economist at Mellon Bank, Pittsburgh, expects the U.S. currency to remain reasonably firm against its Japanese counterpart but predicts the dollar will slip against the mark.  "We still haven't seen the impact of narrowing interest rate differentials (between the U.S. and West Germany)," Mr. Talley said.  "We're likely to see a delayed response."  On June 30, the West German Bundesbank raised two important interest rates by one-half percentage point each, moving its discount rate to 5% and its Lombard rate to 7%.  In the U.S., meanwhile, the federal funds rate has edged down from 9.25% to about 9%.  This rate is closely watched because it often signals credit-policy changes by the Fed.  Other analysts pointed to the periodic efforts by the Group of Seven industrialized nations to move the U.S. currency into a lower trading range and predicted that policy would remain intact at least over the short term.  As one trader said, any attempt at a dollar rally is quickly shot down by central bank interventions.  "It's not easy to overcome that kind of ammunition," he said.  Traders in Tokyo see the yen gaining momentum as the dollar softens.  "People have had their eye on the sideshow, the political situation in Japan," said Takamasa Yamasaki, an assistant manager at Daiwa Bank Ltd.  "But bit by bit, they will turn their eyes back to the main event, the U.S. economic fundamentals, including U.S. interest rates."  The British pound isn't expected to move much in either direction, but economists warn that heightened concern about inflation and Britain's current account deficit could begin to eat away at investor confidence.  Amanda Grantham-Hill, an economist at Baring Brothers & Co. in London, said she believes that rising wage inflation combined with signs of increasing industrial unrest will add to the currency's woes.  But, she adds, a declining dollar could provide the pound with some support and curb the currency's retreat.  In trading yesterday, the dollar retreated, faced with persisting apprehension about falling U.S. interest rates and the slow pace of the economy.  In early trading Tuesday in Tokyo, the dollar fell sharply against the yen.  The dollar opened at 135.95 yen, down 2.45 yen from 138.40 yen at Monday's close.  A rebound in the yen in New York Monday helped pressure the dollar, but much of the market's attention was focused on the U.S. purchasing managers' index, to be released today, and on U.S. employment data, to be released Friday, foreign-exchange traders said.  Both sets of July figures, as well as the June index of U.S. leading indicators due Thursday, are expected to show continued slowing in the economy.  On the Commodity Exchange in New York, gold for current delivery rose $3.30 to $370.50 an ounce in moderate trading.  Estimated volume was 3.4 million ounces.  In early trading in Hong Kong Tuesday, gold was quoted at $370.75 an ounce.  ---  @ Dollar Forecasts  @ Range and average of forecasts on the dollar's foreign-exchange value in August from 10 dealers in the U.S., Japan, West Germany and the United Kingdom  @ NEW YORK  @ LATE 30-DAY 30-DAY  @ MONDAY AVERAGE RANGE  @ Mark 1.8648 1.8652 1.8475 -  @ 1.8830  @ Sterling 1.6651 1.6277 1.5938 -  @ 1.6616  @ Yen 136.95 138.14 136.52 -  @ 139.77  @ Swiss Franc 1.6080 1.6155 1.5780 -  @ 1.6570  Who says lightning doesn't strike twice?  Earlier this year, Montedison S.p.A. made a tender offer for the 27% of Ausimont N.V. that it didn't already own at $35 a share.  Minority holders -- mostly U.S. shareholders -- screamed that the offer was low.  Ausimont's independent directors agreed, and rejected the offer.  But Montedison, as majority owner, was able to force the acquisition through, and completed it last month.  Yesterday, lightning struck again.  Montedison, a Milan, Italy, chemicals concern, proposed that it acquire for cash and securities the publicly held stock of two more Big Board companies -- Erbamont and Himont -- in which Montedison is majority owner.  Montedison is offering mostly cash packages valued at $49 a share for the 19% it doesn't own of Himont, a Wilmington, Del., chemicals company, and $37 a share for the 28% it doesn't yet own in Erbamont, a Stamford, Conn., pharmaceutical company.  Reactions on the offer for Himont are mixed.  However, some analysts and shareholders say the proposal for Erbamont isn't even in the range of acceptable values.  Erbamont markets Adriamycin, a highly profitable anti-cancer drug, and it has some 30 new drugs at various stages of research and development.  Pharmaceutical concerns with rich R&D pipelines are in high demand these days.  Given the high prices that are being paid for pharmaceutical companies, Jay R. Harris, an analyst at Goldsmith & Harris, says a reasonable range for Erbamont would have been $45 to $60 a share.  "I think they're trying to steal our stock.  They are taking advantage of the minority shareholders by making an offer way below reasonable value," Louis Simpson, vice chairman and chief investment officer of Geico, an insurer that owns a stake in Erbamont.  Squibb Corp. last week agreed to be acquired by Bristol-Myers Co. in an $11.52 billion stock swap.  That amounts to 27 times the 1988 earnings of Squibb and 4.4 times Squibb's 1988 sales.  Valuing Erbamont at similar multiples, it would have a value of $57 to over $90 a share.  Those values may be extreme, but they suggest that Montedison's price is out of tune with merger values for pharmaceutical companies.  In a statement, Montedison said its main reason for wanting to own 100% of both companies is "to enhance its ability to compete" in global markets.  A spokeswoman for Montedison, run by Italian businessman Raul Gardini, says the offers for both companies are fair.  The offer for Erbamont represents a 19% premium over Friday's closing stock price.  The premium for Himont is 11%.  However, share prices for both companies had run up a bit in recent days due to rumors that an offer was imminent.  Montedison also says the offers will be subject to the approval of the Erbamont and Himont boards.  Officials at Erbamont's Connecticut offices weren't available for comment.  Calls were referred to Montedison.  Erbamont's directors were said to be in Italy, where a board meeting is scheduled for today.  Montedison's major shareholder is Ferruzzi Group.  Ferruzzi has recently become embroiled in the U.S. soybean debacle.  It came close to cornering the market in U.S. soybeans until the Chicago Board of Trade intervened, forcing it to surrender control of more than 20 million bushels.  U.S. offerings of Ausimont, Erbamont and Himont helped Montedison raise badly needed equity.  Now, some U.S. investors say, the company is trying to strong-arm them into selling shares for less than they're worth.  "I don't know if they will be successful," Mr. Simpson says of the offer for Erbamont, "but I am pretty sure if they were a domestic company, they couldn't do it.  There would be legal remedies."  He adds that he and other Erbamont owners are exploring legal options, but those are thought to be slim.  Erbamont, like Ausimont, is incorporated in the Netherlands Antilles.  Shareholders are said to have only a slight chance of redressing grievances in U.S. courts.  However, Himont is incorporated in Delaware.  Thus, analysts say Himont's shareholders may have more remedies.  Wertheim Schroder, Montedison's investment banker, also says the offers are fair.  However, Wertheim's participation is raising eyebrows.  James Harmon, chairman of Wertheim, previously sat on the boards of both Erbamont and Himont, as well as Ausimont.  However, he resigned his board positions at Erbamont and Himont, reportedly in a protest over Montedison's offer for Ausimont.  Last February, referring to the Ausimont offer, Mr. Harmon was quoted in this newspaper as saying, "I'm more than dismayed by what has taken place here. . . .  They're using maximum pressure tactics to force minority holders to sell their shares."  Yesterday, Mr. Harmon reiterated that Montedison had been "heavy-handed" in its treatment of Ausimont holders.  Asked why Wertheim had agreed to represent Montedison in apparently similar deals, Mr. Harmon said, "That's a good question.  Maybe once in a while by speaking out, it works in the best interest of all holders."  After the Ausimont tender offer, he said, he had urged Montedison to buy out minority holders in its other units, and told them, "let's do it at a fair price."  Mr. Harmon said the per-share value for all of Erbamont "might be greater" than $37; however, he said "it's a fair price" for a minority stake.  Erbamont holders also noted that a Wertheim securities analyst -- one of the few on Wall Street who follow Erbamont -- has issued a series of negative reports on Erbamont, urging holders to sell.  A July 20 report says, "Erbamont is judged to be worth no more than $23" a share.  Several Erbamont holders say the Wertheim reports raise conflict-of-interest questions.  Mr. Harmon sharply denies this.  He says, "We manage our research very separately from our investment activities.  We don't always agree with them."  Wertheim's director of research, as well as its analyst, Jonathan Gelles, both said they had no advance knowledge of the offer by Montedison to buy out the rest of Erbamont.  Erbamont's cancer drug, its biggest producer, is losing market share, Mr. Gelles pointed out in his report.  However, the company is expected to begin marketing new drugs possibly as early as next year.  ---  Erbamont  (NYSE; Symbol: ERB)  Business: Pharmaceuticals  Year ended Dec. 31, 1988:  Sales: $943 million  Net income: $93.2 million; or $2.10 a share  First quarter, March 31, 1989:  Per-share earnings: 36 cents vs. 37 cents  Average daily trading volume: 67,257 shares  Common shares outstanding: 44.3 million  NOTE: All figures are translated in U.S. dollars and based on current exchange rate.  British Telecommunications PLC continued its big push into the U.S. with an agreement to buy McDonnell Douglas Corp.'s electronic data-communications business for $355 million.  For Britain's main phone company, the pact offers control of one of the biggest U.S. providers of electronic information services, a small but fast-growing segment of the global telecommunications market.  McDonnell Douglas's Tymnet unit and related data-communications businesses have annual pretax profit of roughly $25 million on sales of $250 million, U.K. analysts estimate.  If approved by regulators, the Tymnet transaction would intensify competition between British Telecom and American Telephone & Telegraph Co., which last Friday won U.S. court clearance to expand its tiny U.S. role in electronic information services.  Yesterday, a number of electronic publishing companies gained on speculation that AT&T might try to make a foray into the business through a friendly or perhaps even hostile acquisition.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading, Telerate Inc., 67%-owned by Dow Jones & Co., gained 75 cents to $16; Gannett Co. rose 87.5 cents to $49.875; Knight-Ridder Inc. climbed $2.25 to $58.25; Mead Corp. soared $4 to $44.50; and McGraw-Hill Inc. surged $1.50 to $76.75.  For McDonnell Douglas, the Tymnet sale represents part of a strategic push back to its core business: aerospace.  The company had targeted information systems as a high-growth area, but some $340 million in losses by that sector during the past five years have dashed those plans.  "This cutback is a disappointment to me since it represents an abandonment" of McDonnell Douglas's "original goal to be a leading supplier of broad-based information systems," Chairman John F. McDonnell wrote in a letter to employees yesterday.  The financially battered St. Louis company also announced its intention to sell its North American field-service business, which maintains and repairs computers.  In addition, it disclosed that it intends to convert its Information Systems International subsidiary -- which makes computers and acts as a sales agent for the company's entire information-systems operation -- into a separate public entity based in the U.K. Analysts believe it is the first step in completely selling off that business.  In Big Board trading, McDonnell Douglas closed yesterday at $74.75, up $1.50.  The purchase would be British Telecom's second major shopping spree in the U.S. this year.  Last January, it agreed to pay an eye-popping $1.5 billion for a 22% stake in U.S.-based mobile-phone concern McCaw Cellular Communications Inc.  Since the U.K. government privatized British Telecom in 1984, the former British phone monopoly has been pushing beyond its reliable but low-growth main business -- providing more than 95% of Britain's telephone service.  The U.S. market, in particular, "is the way to go" for British Telecom, said Tony Booth, managing director of British Telecom International.  Besides being the world's largest telecommunications market, the U.S. is home base for many of the world's multinational companies.  British Telecom sees those companies, whose U.K. units are already among its biggest customers, as important revenue sources.  The Tymnet purchase, Mr. Booth said, would further boost British Telecom's services to those U.S.-based multinationals.  Tymnet's customers include more than a third of the 100 largest U.S. corporations.  In essence, its business is providing a computer-controlled network for shuttling electronic messages.  The type of message varies widely, and includes electronic mail, records of credit-card transactions and computer-generated invoices and purchase orders.  Besides buying the Tymnet network, British Telecom also plans to buy some related McDonnell Douglas units that run such specialized message services over Tymnet.  Aerospace analysts praised the timing of the Tymnet divestiture and the other moves disclosed by McDonnell Douglas, whose Long Beach, Calif., aircraft business is going through a wrenching restructuring.  Paul Nisbet, of Prudential-Bache Securities, figured that the information-services group eventually will be whittled down to a more manageable operation with annual sales of about $525 million, down from last year's sales of $1.3 billion.  Besides the sales of Tymnet and the field-service business, McDonnell Douglas said in June that it had reached an agreement to sell Telecheck, a check-authorization service.  The annual revenue of the three businesses is about $400 million.  Moreover, McDonnell Douglas late last year sold some of its health-related information businesses.  Mr. Nisbet estimated that McDonnell Douglas could ultimately realize as much as $400 million in capital gains from all its information systems-related sales.  But even more important, he said, is that it will allow the company "to focus its assets and attention on aerospace, and that's very good news for them."  McDonnell Douglas, which posted a $48 million loss for the second quarter, is trying to bring several major military and commercial airplanes on line simultaneously.  Mr. McDonnell, the company's chairman, noted in his letter to employees that the information-systems group and the aircraft-manufacturing sector haven't been adequately "interactive and synergistic."  Indeed, as part of its announcement yesterday, McDonnell Douglas emphasized its "increased commitment" to its systems-integration business, which supplies three-dimensional computer-generated models to help build airplanes.  Mr. McDonnell concluded that, despite a small second-quarter profit, the information-systems group has been unable "to implement several strategic requirements."  He said it has failed, for instance, to attract a "major voice communications partner" and has not developed a product that could "powerfully differentiate us from our competitors."  But because of its high growth, the market for services such as Tymnet is a plum for old-line phone companies such as British Telecom.  Both the U.S. and European markets jumped nearly 45% last year -- to $5.9 billion in the U.S. and $2.98 billion in Europe, according to Systems Dynamics Ltd., a British-based communications consulting concern.  Iranian-inspired terror, which helped end Jimmy Carter's presidency and blemished Ronald Reagan's, has now created George Bush's first foreign policy crisis.  Terrorists in Lebanon claimed to have murdered one of the nine U.S. hostages they hold, Marine Lt. Col. William R. Higgins, and threatened to kill another today.  In response, Mr. Bush rushed back to the White House, cutting short a Western speaking tour, to convene an evening meeting of advisers.  But retaliating for the apparent murder and deterring further killings are tasks fraught with diplomatic and military complications.  And the current crisis is vastly compounded by two factors: the apparent threat to kill more Americans by the day and Mr. Bush's need to establish toughness in his first encounter as president with terrorists.  The president displayed anger over the claim Col. Higgins had been hanged in retaliation for Israel's kidnapping of a Shiite Moslem cleric and pro-Iran leader in Lebanon, a claim the terrorists buttressed by releasing a videotape of a hanging victim vaguely resembling the colonel.  Mr. Bush expressed a desire to do something in response.  "This was a young American colonel serving in an international force, and it is incumbent on all of us to try to rectify this situation if at all possible," Mr. Bush said.  Anger also swept over Capitol Hill, where the Senate passed a resolution, 99-0, that urged Mr. Bush to determine "whether it would be possible to isolate and bring to justice or retaliate against those responsible" and to demand that Israel consult the U.S. before taking similar actions in the future.  But last evening, White House aides were cautioning against any assumption that a military retaliation might be forthcoming, emphasizing the practical difficulties of such a response.  White House spokesman Marlin Fitzwater said, "We don't often know where hostages are being held or who's holding them or who the perpetrators are.  There are a lot of difficult issues here that make one proceed cautiously."  After the president met with his national security advisers, Mr. Fitzwater issued a statement saying, "This was primarily an informational meeting at which all aspects of the case involving Col. Higgins and the other hostages were discussed."  Congressional leaders who met with Mr. Bush later also indicated the president hadn't decided on a plan of action.  "The options are very few for retaliation," said one administration official.  "One of the best things we could do now is to be patient and wait for an opportunity to retaliate."  Another administration official emphasized that nothing has been ruled out, but added, "It's still early in the process."  He said diplomatic and economic pressures against both Iran and Syria were being weighed.  A failure to respond, or a response that seems timid, could have a price, too, by suggesting that the new administration is weak.  In addition, administration officials may be deliberately playing down the possibility of military action to avoid making any eventual military move harder by signaling one in advance.  The group that claimed to have killed 44-year-old Col. Higgins, "Organization for the Oppressed on Earth," is believed by U.S. intelligence agencies to be a faction of Hezbollah, the pro-Iranian Shiite Moslem terrorist group in Lebanon.  Another Hezbollah faction, "Revolutionary Justice Organization," issued the threat to kill a second U.S. hostage, Joseph Cicippio, 58, an official of the American University in Beirut.  Mr. Cicippio was seized in 1986.  The Associated Press reported that its Cyprus office received a call, allegedly from the "Oppressed on Earth" group, claiming that Anglican Church official Terry Waite, a Briton, also would be killed today unless Israel frees the Shiite leader, Sheik Abdel Karim Obeid.  Sheik Obeid is believed to have been personally involved in some of the hostage takings, especially that of Col. Higgins.  An Israeli official said he was being "interrogated."  The first task for U.S. officials will be to determine whether Col. Higgins actually was killed yesterday, as his captors claimed.  Some Middle East analysts have suspected he was killed months ago, and there's at least a chance the victim shown in the tape released in Lebanon wasn't Col. Higgins, or that the tape was made some time ago.  If the U.S. concludes Col. Higgins actually was killed by the terrorists, the pressure on President Bush to retaliate will be strong.  Already, lawmakers in Congress are clamoring for swift, strong retaliation.  "We must strike back," said Rep. Helen Bentley (R., Md.).  Failure to respond could invite more incidents and leave unchallenged the threats to kill other hostages unless Sheik Obeid is released by Israel.  But it will be especially difficult for Mr. Bush to decide whether, or how, to strike back.  For starters, any military move could put at risk the lives of eight other American hostages, and hostages from Britain, Ireland, Italy and elsewhere.  The situation is further complicated by the fact that it is not the U.S. but Israel, through its imprisonment of Sheik Obeid, that holds a key to the crisis.  Yet the U.S. isn't in a position to press Israel to release the Moslem cleric because doing so after the claimed assassination of Col. Higgins would appear to be caving in to the terrorists' latest violence.  And choosing a target for retaliation -- the terrorists themselves, their bases in Lebanon or their Iranian sponsors -- would be difficult.  "The president is going to have to decide if he's going to retaliate against Iran directly, or if he's going to retaliate against Hezbollah bases in Lebanon," says one government counterterrorism official.  Over the weekend, the White House implied it would hold Iran responsible for the hostages' safety; it said the U.S. would be depending on those who "have influence with the hostage-holders" to see that they weren't harmed.  Yet this would be a particularly awkward time to strike at Iran because the country has just picked a new president, Hashemi Rafsanjani, who, it's hoped, might temper Iran's extremism now that Ayatollah Khomeini is dead.  Robert Gates, the president's deputy national security adviser, told reporters that "There has been considerable dispute over the last several years just how close the connection is between Iran and the Hezbollah and the degree of control Iran has. . . .  There's clear evidence of influence.  The question is the degree of control."  That leaves the option of a military strike at terrorists or their bases, which are mainly in Lebanon's Bekaa Valley, an area under Syrian control.  U.S. intelligence agencies have identified as potential targets there buildings known to have been used by Hezbollah forces and their mentors, the Iranian Revolutionary Guards.  But they aren't certain which factions use which buildings or when they are present.  U.S. intelligence about the terrorists is considered poor.  It has proven difficult to infiltrate small terrorist cells, which often are held together by family relationships.  And during the 1980s, Lebanese terrorists killed two of the Central Intelligence Agency's top Middle East operatives, Robert Ames and William Buckley.  The dearth of intelligence is one reason the U.S. has never staged a military strike in Lebanon in retaliation for any of the terrorist assaults against Americans, including the 1983 slaughter of 241 Marines near Beirut.  In 1983, the U.S. Navy tried to bomb Syrian antiaircraft batteries in Lebanon, which had fired at a reconnaissance jet, but lost two planes in the effort.  The U.S. has a wide variety of forces ready in the Mediterranean should President Bush and his advisers choose a military option.  The aircraft carrier Coral Sea, accompanied by a battle group, is scheduled to resume patrolling tomorrow after completing a port call in Alexandria, Egypt.  A three-ship Marine amphibious task force including the helicopter carrier Nassau is sailing in the Mediterranean; it holds 2,400 Marines.  The cruise-missile equipped battleship Iowa and accompanying warships are anchored in Marseilles, France.  Altogether, according to a Pentagon spokesman, the U.S. has about 24 warships in the Mediterranean.  President Bush could also call on the new Special Operations Command, Tampa, Fla., if he decides to mount a commando operation.  The unit is designed to coordinate the growing special forces capabilities of all three services.  The crisis could strain U.S.-Israeli relations.  U.S. officials insist Israel didn't consult them before it decided last week to kidnap Sheik Obeid in a commando raid.  The Israeli move apparently was an effort to trade the sheik for Israeli prisoners and Western hostages held in Lebanon.  Israeli Defense Minister Yitzhak Rabin made such a swap offer yesterday morning, just as the terrorists supposedly were killing Col. Higgins.  But U.S. condemnation of the Israeli kidnapping was faint, with President Bush saying merely: "I don't think kidnapping and violence helps the cause of peace."  White House Chief of Staff John Sununu told reporters the Bush administration hasn't discussed the kidnapping with the Israelis and has protested only the proposed swap.  The U.S. opposes making deals with terrorists.  Still, the apparent Higgins murder holds the potential for a significant U.S. backlash against Israel.  Yesterday, Senate Minority Leader Robert Dole (R., Kan.), said "I would hope the Israelis would take another look at their actions, which they must have known in advance would endanger American lives."  Rep. Lee Hamilton (D., Ind.), chairman of the House Middle East subcommittee, said, "We would like to see Israel bring us in.  If we are going to be in on the crash landing, we would like to be in on the takeoff as well."  U.S. diplomacy in the crisis also is complicated by a recent warming of relations between Iran and the Soviet Union.  Soviet Foreign Minister Eduard Shevardnadze, who has just held a meeting with Secretary of State James Baker, is visting Tehran this week.  Mr. Bush may hesitate striking directly at Iran for fear that would drive Tehran even closer to the Soviets.  CONGRESS didn't pass a $100,000 ceiling on gains investors can claim through property exchanges in a single year.  A recent real estate column incorrectly reported that it did.  (See: "REAL ESTATE" -- WSJ July 28, 1989)  Annualized interest rates on certain investments as reported by the Federal Reserve Board on a weekly-average basis:  @ Week Ended:  @ July 28, July 21,  @ 1989 1989  @ Treasury bills (90 day)-a 7.98 7.97  @ Commrcl paper (Dealer, 90 day)-a 8.59 8.65  @ Certfs of Deposit (Resale, 90 day) 8.69 8.75  @ Federal funds (Overnight)-b 9.14 9.24  @ Eurodollars (90 day)-b 8.84 8.81  @ Treasury bills (one year)-c 7.86 7.96  @ Treasury notes (three year)-c 7.77 7.89  @ Treasury notes (five year)-c 7.75 7.88  @ Treasury notes (ten year)-c 7.97 8.07  @ Treasury bonds (30 year)-c 8.08 8.14  a-Discounted rate. b-Week ended Wednesday, July 26, 1989 and Wednesday July 19, 1989. c-Yields, adjusted for constant maturity.  The Chicago Mercantile Exchange, on the eve of expected federal indictments of some of its members, has brought disciplinary charges against four traders in connection with yen-pit trades made with an undercover FBI agent.  The Merc action, which hasn't been announced, is likely to bring a highly negative response from federal prosecutors, who earlier this year warned the exchange that its internal investigation could interfere with the government's 2 1/2-year inquiry of alleged trading abuses at the Merc and the Chicago Board of Trade.  The first wave of federal indictments is expected as soon as tomorrow.  It couldn't immediately be learned if the Merc intends to build a large number of cases based on trades under federal scrutiny.  A Merc spokesman last night said the exchange wouldn't comment on a pending disciplinary case.  As for the exchange's motives in bringing such cases, he said: "We are obligated under our rules and the Commodity Exchange Act to investigate any wrongdoing brought to our attention."  U.S. Attorney Anton R. Valukas wouldn't comment.  The charges of prearranged trading were decided on July 18 by a special committee of the Merc's board, and could result in fines and expulsion of the traders, according to a person familiar with the internal charges.  The action also raises what defense lawyers say are serious constitutional problems, because the Merc in this case and others is charging traders with failure to cooperate with the exchange's inquiry, though traders could risk self-incrimination in the federal probe should they cooperate.  The Merc sought in its internal investigation to interview the FBI mole, who traded in the yen pit, but the U.S. attorney's office refused to make him available.  The Merc members and former members charged have all been contacted by the federal investigators, according to people familiar with the inquiry.  The four charged are:  -- Brian E. Sledz, who sold his Merc seat for $350,000 last Jan. 19, two days after the federal probe was disclosed.  He was charged with three counts of prearranged trading.  Mr. Sledz netted more than $1 million at the Merc last year.  -- James G. Sledz, the younger brother of Brian, who left the exchange the same day.  He was charged with two counts of prearranged trading.  He netted close to $200,000 at the Merc last year.  -- Sam Cali, formerly a member of a powerful broker group that has ties to a top Merc official.  He was charged with a single count of prearranged trading and with failing to cooperate with the Merc's investigation.  -- Thomas A. Crouch, one of the few exchange members to comment publicly on the federal probe, in a February Chicago Tribune article.  He was charged with a single prearranged trade and failure to cooperate.  The Merc began an investigation into trading in the yen pit and the Swiss franc futures pit after the federal inquiry was disclosed.  The trades in question occurred in December in yen-futures contracts expiring both that month and in March.  Thomas A. Durkin, a lawyer for Mr. Cali, confirmed last night that his client had been charged by the Merc and said the Merc charges are an attempt to appear tough in the face of the federal investigation -- "an incredible case of {hide} covering."  Mr. Durkin asserted his client is being made a "scapegoat" for the Merc's own failings.  "If this is really such a scandal, where was the Merc compliance department?"  Mr. Durkin said.  "Where has everybody been?"  He added of Mr. Cali, "I think he is innocent of any criminal wrongdoing."  Mr. Cali is expected to be indicted in the federal investigation and charged with mail and wire fraud and violations of the Racketeer Influenced and Corrupt Organizations law, according to a person familiar with the inquiry.  Entire trading pits are expected to be named racketeering enterprises.  Mr. Cali was until earlier this year a broker with ABS Partners, the Merc's most influential broker group, which has close ties to John F. Sandner, a former Merc chairman and currently a top policy adviser and director.  James McGurk, a lawyer for Brian Sledz, declined to comment on the Merc disciplinary action.  By letter, he told the exchange in June that because Brian Sledz is no longer a member, he isn't required to appear for questioning.  The Merc disagreed.  Mr. McGurk said he is fighting in Illinois state court for Mr. Sledz's $350,000 proceeds from the sale of his seat in January.  He said the Merc argued that it held the money because of pending disciplinary proceedings.  But the lawyer contended there were no charges when the seat was sold, or for months after that.  He said the Merc argued that the proceedings begin with an inquiry, and not formal charges.  Mr. Cali and Brian Sledz are friends, and traders say both occasionally went to breakfast with the FBI mole, who went by the name Peter Vogel.  Mr. Cali also played basketball with the FBI man, whom defense attorneys have since identified as Dieter Volk.  Mr. Crouch and Brian Sledz stood close to each other in the yen pit, and Mr. Crouch sometimes filled trading orders for Mr. Sledz.  Mr. Crouch was quoted in a Feb. 5 Tribune article as saying "Vogel" claimed to have big trading losses and would enter into tax-scam trades with successful traders.  Other traders have said "Vogel" offered to take winning trades and kick back most of the winnings in cash to the opposite trader, helping the trader to convert some of his profits into tax-free income.  The practice is illegal, both under commodities law and tax law.  Mr. Crouch wouldn't comment on the internal charges.  Brian Sledz, through his lawyer, wouldn't comment.  James Sledz couldn't be reached.  Prosecutors are concerned that exchange investigations of trades the government is scrutinizing could hamper the federal inquiry.  Exchange cases could create evidence that might contradict federal evidence, or otherwise confuse a jury.  And exchange cases could also benefit potential federal targets by allowing them early on to examine evidence on the trades.  Lawyers representing traders, exchange clearing firms and others have freely exchanged information about government subpoenas they receive, and also supply each other with copies of records handed over to prosecutors.  Century Telephone Enterprises Inc. said it completed the acquisition of Universal Telephone Inc. for $90 million.  Century is a telecommunications concern.  Universal, a telephone systems company, was formerly a unit of Minnesota Power & Light Co. of Duluth, Minn.  West Co., a packaging maker, said it will buy as many as 1.6 million, or about 10%, of its common shares outstanding.  The company said the buy-back, which it estimated will cost approximately $30 million, was initiated for investment purposes and maintaining a healthy capital structure.  Rochester Telephone Corp. said it completed its purchase of Citizens Telephone Co. of Fairmount, Ind., for an undisclosed number of its common shares.  Citizens, which serves about 2,100 phone lines in a 70-square-mile territory about 55 miles northeast of Indianapolis, becomes Rochester Telephone's second telephone subsidiary in Indiana and its 13th overall in four states.  The acquisitions of six other companies are pending, with completion scheduled before year end.  Rochester Telephone expects to serve more than 600,000 access lines in six states when the acquisitions are completed.  John W. Reece was named president and chief operating officer of this hazardous-waste management concern, succeeding Frank Jungers, who remains vice chairman.  Mr. Jungers served in those positions on an interim basis after the resignation in December of Andrew Franklin, who left the company to pursue other interests.  Mr. Reece was formerly a group vice president for Guy F. Atkinson Co., San Francisco.  MOSLEM EXTREMISTS CLAIMED to have killed a U.S. hostage in Lebanon.  A pro-Iranian Shiite Moslem group said it hanged Lt. Col. William R. Higgins to retaliate for Israel's abduction Friday of a Moslem cleric.  The holders of other foreign hostages in Lebanon threatened to kill another American unless the clergyman is released.  Israel said the Moslem spiritual leader had confessed to "guiding" Higgins's kidnapping.  Bush, meanwhile, condemned the reported killing of Higgins and called a crisis meeting with national security advisers to consider U.S. responses to "this brutal murder."  He also met with congressional leaders.  A spokesman for Premier Shamir called the claims about Higgins "odious," but said Israel remains ready to trade Moslem prisoners for hostages.  ---  Cambodian peace talks appeared stalled in Paris amid accusations against the Khmer Rouge.  Vietnam called for the "eradication" of the guerrilla group.  But China cautioned against excluding the Khmer Rouge from an interim Phnom Penh government once Hanoi withdraws.  The U.S. re-established high-level contact with China nearly two months after Beijing's crackdown on pro-democracy protesters.  Secretary of State Baker held talks with his Chinese counterpart at the parley in Paris on Cambodia's future.  ---  Poland's Communist Party named Interior Minister Kiszczak as its candidate to be prime minister.  Kiszczak, who has held his post since 1981, led two months of talks this year that resulted in Solidarity's legalization and partially free elections.  Poles, meanwhile, braced for higher food costs under Warsaw's plan to end price controls today.  ---  Bush vetoed a congressional resolution imposing conditions on an agreement with Tokyo for the joint U.S.-Japanese production of an advanced jet fighter, the FSX.  The veto, the second of Bush's presidency, was expected.  ---  The House approved a nearly $8.7 billion military construction bill.  The 382-29 vote came after the Democratic-controlled chamber brushed aside an effort to force delays in base closings that are scheduled to begin next year.  ---  Beirut residents jammed a coastal highway leading south from the capital to escape artillery duels between Christian and Syrian forces.  Police estimated that only 200,000 of Beirut's 1.5 million inhabitants remain.  More than 500 people have been killed in fighting that erupted March 4, the latest round in Lebanon's 14-year-old civil war.  ---  Chileans approved constitutional changes to weaken the military's power over a future civilian government.  Following Sunday's referendum, which was supported by President Pinochet and his political opponents, opposition parties pledged further changes if they win elections slated for December.  ---  Members of a House panel suggested that crimes, including perjury and conspiracy to violate federal regulations, probably were committed by former HUD officials.  The subcommittee, which focused on contradictions in the testimony of several witnesses at hearings, is investigating a scandal at the housing agency.  ---  Federal officials said illegal drug use declined 37% last year from 1985.  But a wide-ranging survey found that heavy cocaine use rose 33% during the period.  Separately, U.S. Customs chief von Raab announced his resignation and asserted that the government isn't committed to a war on drugs.  ---  Bush summoned the 50 state governors to meet this fall to discuss ways "to improve our nation's educational performance."  The president announced the Sept. 27-28 forum, probably in Washington, at a National Governors' Association meeting in Chicago.  ---  Afghan guerrillas bombarded Kabul with rockets, killing at least 21 people and injuring about 22 others, Afghanistan's government said.  In Pakistan, a rebel official said one guerrilla faction attacked a rival group and killed 59 people, mostly women and children.  A date wasn't given for the assault.  ---  Hundreds of wildfires have scorched more than 90,000 acres in five Western states, overrunning a mountain hamlet in Idaho and menacing a remote region in Oregon.  Most of the blazes were caused by lightning last week, authorities said.  ---  Pete Rose received a setback in his lawsuit against baseball Commissioner A. Bartlett Giamatti when a U.S. judge in Columbus, Ohio, ruled that the case belonged in federal court.  Rose had sought to keep the suit, an effort to block Giamatti from deciding whether the Cincinnati Reds manager bet on ball games, in a county court.  Monday, July 31, 1989  The key U.S. and foreign annual interest rates below are a guide to general levels but don't always represent actual transactions.  PRIME RATE: 10 1/2%.  The base rate on corporate loans at large U.S. money center commercial banks.  FEDERAL FUNDS: 8 15/16% high, 8 7/8% low, 8 7/8% near closing bid, 8 15/16% offered.  Reserves traded among commercial banks for overnight use in amounts of $1 million or more.  Source: Fulton Prebon (U.S.A.) Inc.  DISCOUNT RATE: 7%.  The charge on loans to depository institutions by the New York Federal Reserve Bank.  CALL MONEY: 9 3/4% to 10%.  The charge on loans to brokers on stock exchange collateral.  COMMERCIAL PAPER placed directly by General Motors Acceptance Corp.: 8.50% 30 to 44 days; 8.375% 45 to 59 days; 8.25% 60 to 89 days; 8.125% 90 to 119 days; 7.875% 120 to 179 days; 7.50% 180 to 270 days.  COMMERCIAL PAPER: High-grade unsecured notes sold through dealers by major corporations in multiples of $1,000: 8.625% 30 days; 8.50% 60 days; 8.375% 90 days.  CERTIFICATES OF DEPOSIT: 8.50% one month; 8.44% two months; 8.40% three months; 8.20% six months; 8.13% one year.  Average of top rates paid by major New York banks on primary new issues of negotiable C.D.s, usually on amounts of $1 million and more.  The minimum unit is $100,000.  Typical rates in the secondary market: 8.60% one month; 8.40% three months; 8.25% six months.  BANKERS ACCEPTANCES: 8.47% 30 days; 8.28% 60 days; 8.12% 90 days; 7.97% 120 days; 7.90% 150 days; 7.85% 180 days.  Negotiable, bank-backed business credit instruments typically financing an import order.  LONDON LATE EURODOLLARS: 8 11/16% to 8 9/16% one month; 8 5/8% to 8 1/2% two months; 8 9/16% to 8 7/16% three months; 8 7/16% to 8 5/16% four months; 8 7/16% to 8 5/16% five months; 8 3/8% to 8 1/4% six months.  LONDON INTERBANK OFFERED RATES (LIBOR): 8 11/16% one month; 8 5/8% three months; 8 3/8% six months; 8 1/4% one year.  The average of interbank offered rates for dollar deposits in the London market based on quotations at five major banks.  FOREIGN PRIME RATES: Canada 13.50%; Germany 8.50%; Japan 4.875%; Switzerland 8.50%; Britain 14%.  These rate indications aren't directly comparable; lending practices vary widely by location.  TREASURY BILLS: Results of the Monday, July 31, 1989, auction of short-term U.S. government bills, sold at a discount from face value in units of $10,000 to $1 million: 7.65%, 13 weeks; 7.35%, 26 weeks.  FEDERAL HOME LOAN MORTGAGE CORP. (Freddie Mac): Posted yields on 30-year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days. 9.61%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 9%, 2% rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  FEDERAL NATIONAL MORTGAGE ASSOCIATION (Fannie Mae): Posted yields on 30 year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days (priced at par).9.54%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 8.60%, 6/2 rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  MERRILL LYNCH READY ASSETS TRUST: 8.95%.  Annualized average rate of return after expenses for the past 30 days; not a forecast of future returns.  Bond prices jumped on expectations that several key economic reports due this week will show further weakness in the economy.  For bond investors, such news raises the possibility that the Federal Reserve will further loosen its grip on credit and allow interest rates to fall further.  "The rally was predicated on speculation that the Federal Reserve eventually will have to cut rates drastically" in the face of a sharp economic slowdown, says Lawrence Leuzzi, managing director at S.G. Warburg & Co. "People now believe we are heading for a bumpy landing rather than a soft landing."  David Jones, a senior vice president and economist at Aubrey G. Lanston & Co. termed the mood in the bond market as "almost euphoric."  The Treasury's benchmark 30-year bond rose 7/8 point, or about $8.75 for every $1,000 face amount.  Its yield slipped to 7.91% from 7.99% Friday, which was the first time in more than two years that the rate had dipped below 8%.  Corporate bonds also rose while municipal bonds were unchanged to slightly higher.  Mortgage-backed securities, which have been hurt as several ailing savings and loans associations liquidate their portfolios, ended mixed.  Yesterday's bullish sentiment was fueled by rumors that the latest National Association of Purchasing Management economic index, which is due out today, will come in at about 45%, well below the 48.8% June level.  The index will provide the first look at how the economy fared in July.  An index under 50% implies a slowing economy while one above 50% suggests the economy is expanding.  Economists contend that Thursday's data on June leading indicators and the July employment report, scheduled for release Friday, also will reveal slower growth.  Mr. Leuzzi says some traders are speculating that the Fed might even cut its discount rate.  That rate, now at 7%, is the fee the Fed charges on short-term loans to banks and savings institutions.  Few economists, however, believe that the Fed will resort to such drastic measure prior to its next policy meeting Aug. 22.  Meanwhile, traders said investors are awaiting details of the government's huge quarterly refunding, which could put between $28.5 billion to $29.5 billion of new Treasury securities on the market.  Although interest rates have dropped as much as 1 1/2 percentage points since May's $28.8 billion refunding, analysts say there continues to be strong demand for Treasury issues from both foreign and domestic investors.  William Sullivan, director of money market research at Dean Witter Reynolds Inc., says next week's auction "can be underwritten in a declining rate atmosphere if the data that are coming out, including the purchasing manager's survey and employment, portray a continuing sluggish economy for July."  Refunding details will be outlined tomorrow by the Treasury, which is expected to sell the securities next Tuesday through Thursday.  Analysts doubt if the recent debt ceiling problems will obstruct the refunding.  Congress last week agreed to a $70 billion temporary increase in the nearly exhausted $2.8 trillion debt limit.  The measure, which must be passed by the House and Senate and signed by President Bush, could be in place by week's end.  Between $9.75 billion and $10 billion three-year notes, $9.5 billion to $9.75 billion of 10-year notes and $9.5 billion to $9.75 billion of 30-year bonds are estimated to be auctioned at next week's Treasury refunding.  Those estimates represent little change from the $9.79 billion three-year, $9.53 billion 10-year and $9.54 billion 29 3/4-year issues sold in May's refunding.  Treasury Securities  Treasurys ended higher in light trading with long-term securities posting much larger gains than shorter-term securities.  The benchmark 30-year bond was quoted at 110 27/32 compared with 109 31/32 Friday.  The latest 10-year notes were quoted at 108 29/32 to yield 7.975% compared with Friday's price of 108 17/32 and yield of 7.85%.  The latest five-year note rose a little more than 1/8 point.  At the government's weekly auction, short-term interest rates moved sharply lower from a week earlier.  The average discount rate on new three-month Treasury bills was 7.65%, down from 8.09% at last week's auction.  The discount rate on new six-month Treasury bills was 7.35% compared with 7.73% last week.  The rate on the three-month bill was the lowest since the average of 7.54% at the auction on Nov. 7, 1988.  The six-month bill yield was the lowest since the average of 7.34% at the auction on Sept. 19, 1988.  Here are details of yesterday's auction:  Rates are determined by the difference between the purchase price and face value.  Thus, higher bidding narrows the investor's return while lower bidding widens it.  The percentage rates are calculated on a 360-day year, while the coupon equivalent yield is based on a 365-day year.  @ 13-Week 26-Week  @Applications ............ $27,913,280,000 $22,217,400,000  @Accepted bids ........... $6,403,295,000 $6,403,205,000  @Accepted at low price ... 68% 3%  @Accepted noncompet'ly ... $1,479,440,000 $1,195,495,000  @Average price (Rate) .... 98.066 (7.65%) 96.284 (7.35%)  @High price (Rate) ....... 98.069 (7.64%) 96.289 (7.34%)  @Low price (Rate) ........ 98.066 (7.65%) 96.274 (7.37%)  @Coupon equivalent ....... 7.91% 7.74%  @ Both issues are dated Aug. 3.  The 13-week bills mature Nov. 2, and the 26-week bills mature Feb. 1, 1990.  Corporate Issues  Corporate securities ended 1/8 to 1/4 point higher in sluggish trading.  Meanwhile, Thailand became the first Asian nation to issue Yankee bonds, dollar-denominated bonds issued in the U.S. by foreign banks and corporations.  The $200 million issue of non-callable 10-year notes, underwritten by Salomon Brothers Inc., was priced to yield 8.70%.  Among other new issues, John Deere Capital Corp., a unit of Deere & Co., offered $150 million of 30-year subordinated debentures priced to yield 8 5/8%.  Limited Inc., a women's clothing retailer, offered $100 million of 10-year non-callable notes priced to yield 8 7/8%.  Syndicate managers say other deals are being finalized and should come to market in the next day or two.  Among them is a $200 million issue of 10-year subordinated debentures by Penn Central Corp.  Mortgage-Backed Securities  A subsidiary of Japan's Nomura Securities Co. issued $150 million of U.S. collateralized mortgage obligations, becoming the first foreign financial institution to underwrite and distribute the securities.  Investment bankers said the move by Nomura underscores the growing internationalization of the U.S. mortgage market and reflects the growing appetite of foreign investors for U.S. mortgage-backed securities.  In February, Nomura filed a registration with the Securities and Exchange Commission to issue as much as $1.1 billion of mortgage securities.  Nomura said the bulk of the new Ginnie Mae CMOs will go to Japanese investors, although it expects to sell future mortgage securities world-wide.  Meanwhile, mortgage securities were mixed in secondary trading.  Sales of mortgage securities by ailing thrifts have been keeping the mortgage market under a cloud and the story was no different yesterday.  Traders said there were several portfolio liquidations by thrifts, including the sale by one of $500 million Ginnie Mae 9% securities.  "As prices move up the thrift selling accelerates," said one trader.  And although the market has lagged Treasurys, "its ability to absorb the supply has been nothing short of amazing," another said.  August Ginnie Maes closed up 4/32 at 99 11/32, yielding 9.21% to a 12-year average life assumption.  Other Ginnie Maes were quoted from down 2/32 to up as much as 7/32.  Municipal Issues  Municipal bonds were unchanged to 3/8 point higher in very quiet dealings.  With the available supply of bonds in the secondary market thin and investors focusing on new issues, seasoned municipals have been languishing for weeks.  "It's dead," summed up one trader.  "There's been virtually no trading."  Traders are hoping that some activity will spill over into the secondary market today from what's expected to be a bustling new-issue market.  A BankAmerica group may launch $3 billion of California revenue anticipation notes due in 1990.  Speculation is that the notes will be priced to yield 5.65%, about a tenth of a percentage point less than underwriters were contemplating Friday.  Nonetheless, the rate still would be significantly below what the state had to pay last year when it came to market with $3.2 billion of similar notes.  That issue was priced to yield 6%.  On the long end of the municipal market, underwriters led by Prudential-Bache Capital Funding are expected to set tentative pricing today for $825 million Puerto Rico Electric Power Authority revenue and revenue refunding bonds.  The authority, which supplies most of the electric power consumed in Puerto Rico, is one of the largest municipal utilities in the U.S.  Foreign Bonds  Friday's bond market rally in the U.S. spilled over into West Germany and Japan where prices rose in busy trading.  West Germany's 6 1/2% bonds due February 1999 rose 0.15 point to 102.65, for a yield of 6.61%.  The 6 1/2% notes due 1994 gained 0.05 point to 99.50, for a yield of 6.62%.  In Japan, the bond market continued to gather strength from tight supply and expectations of further easing in U.S. monetary policy.  Japan's benchmark No. 111 4.6% bond due 1998 closed at 97.12 to yield 5.07%.  In Britain, government bonds ended little changed in quiet trading.  The benchmark 11 3/4% bond due 2003/2007 rose 2/32 to 116, to yield 9.60%.  The 11 3/4% notes due 1991 fell 1/32 to 100 1/8, to yield 11.60%.  Wang Laboratories Inc., strapped by short-term debt and falling sales, posted a $374.7 million net loss for the fiscal fourth quarter and said it is trying to renegotiate loan agreements with its banks.  Wang also suspended its quarterly dividends and said it will further reduce its work force in the first half of fiscal 1990.  Wang's deteriorating finances are a growing cause for concern because major computer buyers look for financial stability in choosing new equipment from suppliers.  "Customers are being scared off right now," said Jay Stevens, an analyst with Dean Witter Reynolds Inc.  The weak results could force the company to sell some assets and seek new capital investment, analysts said.  The lumbering Lowell, Mass.-based computer maker said the loss for the quarter ended June 30, included a restructuring charge of $234 million and a one-time tax charge of $30 million.  Wang earned $13.4 million, or eight cents a share, a year earlier.  Fourth-quarter revenue fell 5% to $783.7 million from $822.8 million.  Wang said restructuring charges, which included write-downs, brought its net worth below the level required by revolving credit agreements with its lenders.  But the company said the banks have granted waivers through Aug. 10 and negotiations to amend and expand the agreements are continuing.  Wang also disclosed that it hired Lodestar Group and Salomon Brothers Inc. as financial advisers.  "Any way you look at it, it was a really bad year," President Frederick A. Wang said.  "But we have to move forward from here.  We've made real progress reducing expenses and refocusing the company on key vertical markets" and document-imaging technology.  A big operating loss of $94 million leaves Wang highly leveraged and gives it less flexibility in dealing with its bankers, credit analysts said.  The suspension of quarterly dividends, which had been four cents a share on Wang's Class B common stock and 2.75 cents a share on Class C stock, was seen as a move to conserve cash and placate nervous bankers.  Wang said it would "consider an annual dividend policy as soon as operating performance permits."  One source close to the company's credit problems likened Wang to a Latin American debtor nation.  "The banks are so far into this right now that they couldn't walk away if they wanted to," he said.  He added, "It's a little late in the game to be renegotiating revolving debt.  They {Wang} didn't expect things to slow down this quickly, and they clearly won't be negotiating from a position of strength."  In American Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Wang Class B shares closed at $6.125, down 25 cents.  In an interview, Mr. Wang said the company has reduced overhead and cut manufacturing capacity "to a level more consistent with demand," lowering annualized expenses by more than $200 million.  He said the company would consider selling a minority interest in Wang, among other options, to raise capital.  Mr. Wang also said the company is considering the sale of its Allen, Texas-based Intecom unit, a maker of office telephone systems Wang bought in 1986 for about $250 million.  Even though Wang has invested an estimated $200 million more in Intecom, the unit's results have been disappointing.  He also disclosed that Harold P. "Bob" Ano, a senior vice president and a corporate officer, resigned "to pursue other interests."  Analysts said the operating loss was deeper than expected.  Mr. Stevens of Dean Witter noted that international sales, which have helped Wang and other major computer makers weather weakening U.S. demand, "collapsed" in the quarter.  Barry F. Willman of Sanford C. Bernstein & Co. said he expects Wang will cut its work force 10% to 12%.  Wang, which has reduced its payroll to 28,300, from 31,516 last year, confirmed that further cuts are planned during the next six months but declined to offer specific numbers.  Wang said the restructuring charges included employee severance costs, costs associated with the realignment of its U.S. sales and service units and plant closings, and unspecified write-downs of the value of the telephone manufacturing and information services units.  For the full year, Wang reported a net loss of $424.3 million, compared with net income of $92.7 million, or 56 cents a share, a year earlier.  Revenue fell 1.4% to $3.03 billion from $3.07 billion.  A federal jury convicted five officials of Princeton/Newport Limited Partnership and a former Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. trader in the first-ever racketeering trial of securities firm officials.  The jury returned guilty verdicts on all but one of 64 felony counts involving a variety of acts of conspiracy, racketeering, and securities, wire and mail fraud.  The verdict is a huge victory for prosecutors in their controversial effort to apply the potent Racketeer Influenced and Corrupt Organizations law, or RICO, to securities transactions.  And it seemed likely to pave the way for more indictments in the government's continuing war on Wall Street corruption.  At the end of a trial that lasted five weeks, the jury of nine men and three women took less than three days of deliberation to convict.  The jurors found that all the defendants were guilty of cheating the government out of taxes and of running afoul of RICO, which provides for prison sentences of as long as 20 years for each count and forfeiture of illegally gotten gains.  In an indictment first brought a year ago, the government charged the six defendants with conspiring to create illegitimate tax losses through a series of prearranged securities transactions.  In these deals, Princeton/Newport allegedly sold securities at a loss and then repurchased them by prior agreement at the same or slightly higher prices; such a practice is known as stock parking.  The defendants faced an expanded indictment in January.  To prove its case, the government relied largely on dozens of tape-recorded conversations between several of the defendants and traders at several other securities firms, including Drexel, First Boston Corp. and Merrill Lynch & Co.  Among the government's witnesses were William Ward Hale, a former trader at Princeton/Newport who was fired in 1987, and Frederick Joseph, Drexel's chief executive officer.  The government charged that between 1984 and 1986, Princeton/Newport created fraudulent tax deductions by engaging in rigged and prearranged trades in 59 different securities transactions.  The government also alleged that Princeton/Newport helped Drexel manipulate the price of C.O.M.B. Co. stock on behalf of Drexel and illegally parked Mattel Co. stock for Drexel.  The defendants in the case were James Sutton Regan, the managing general partner of Princeton/Newport, and Jack Z. Rabinowitz, Charles M. Zarzecki and Paul A. Berkman, all of whom were general partners of the investment firm.  Also convicted were Steven B. Smotrich, Princeton/Newport's comptroller, and Bruce Lee Newberg, a former Drexel junk-bond trader who worked for Michael Milken, the former head of Drexel's junk-bond operations.  Mr. Newberg faces yet another trial next year, along with Mr. Milken, on charges that are related in part to alleged wrongdoing by Drexel in trading with Princeton/Newport.  Yesterday's verdict, returned late in the day, is a major coup in the government's continuing investigation of Mr. Milken, certain other current and former Drexel employees, and several Drexel clients.  Prosecutors are understood to have hoped that Mr. Newberg would become a witness against Mr. Milken in return for a more lenient sentence if he was convicted in this case.  A teary-eyed Mr. Newberg had no comment after the verdict was read.  Fred Hafetz, one of his attorneys, said Mr. Newberg would appeal.  Defense lawyers in the case and others complained that the use of RICO against the six defendants in this tax-related case was a significant misuse of the statute.  The Justice Department also has seemed somewhat concerned lately.  Last month, Paul Coffey, a Justice Department official, was understood to have told attorneys for some current and former Drexel employees who may soon be indicted that approval of RICO charges against those individuals was being held up pending the outcome of the Princeton/Newport case.  The Justice Department must approve all RICO charges before they can be brought.  The victory may prove to be a vindication of Rudolph Giuliani, the former U.S. attorney now running for mayor of New York City, and Bruce Baird, the chief of the Manhattan U.S. attorney's office's securities-fraud unit.  Messrs.  Giuliani and Baird were sorely criticized by defense attorneys last year who said that they were attempting to bludgeon defendants in this case into testifying against others by charging them with racketeering.  "The government brought this case to terrorize these people into becoming witnesses" against Mr. Milken and Robert Freeman, said Paul Grand, an attorney for Mr. Zarzecki, in an interview shortly before the verdict was returned.  Mr. Freeman, a partner at Goldman, Sachs & Co., was indicted in 1987 on insider-trading-related charges.  Those charges were later dropped and the government has said it intends to seek an expanded indictment.  Jack Arsenault, a lawyer for Mr. Berkman, said that Mr. Baird told him in August 1988 that if Mr. Berkman was willing to "cooperate, fine," but if not, "we are going to roll right over you to get where we want to go."  Mr. Baird denied ever having made such a statement.  Yesterday, he declined to comment on the verdict in this case.  Mr. Regan, the lead defendant in this case, is a close friend of Mr. Freeman.  The two went to Dartmouth College together in the 1960s and have frequently done business together since.  Some lawyers who weren't connected with the Princeton/Newport case have said in recent days that it is likely that a new indictment of Mr. Freeman would be sought after the Princeton/Newport case ends.  Mr. Freeman's attorneys couldn't be reached to comment.  Because the defendants were found guilty of racketeering, the jurors will begin today to consider the amount that the government may seek from defendants in asset forfeitures.  Under RICO, the government can require forfeiture of ill-gotten gains and certain other assets.  Jurors weren't permitted to give interviews pending those deliberations.  The government had tied up about $22 million in assets belonging to all six defendants before the trial began.  The verdict is likely to be viewed as an affirmation of Drexel's wisdom in agreeing in December to plead guilty to six felony counts, including one relating to trading with Princeton/Newport, rather than face RICO charges.  Drexel had been criticized by lawyers for defendants in the Princeton/Newport case for agreeing to plead guilty.  Shortly before jurors returned the verdict yesterday afternoon, Mr. Zarzecki, a defendant in the case, turned to relatives of other defendants and turned up his thumbs in a gesture of confidence.  But as jury foreman Ralph Jimenez, a bus driver, began to read the verdict, most of the defendants sat emotionless and numb.  For most of the half hour it took Mr. Jimenez to recite the jury's findings, the wives of all of the defendants cried in disbelief.  Theodore Wells, Mr. Regan's attorney, said he planned to appeal, although he didn't say on what grounds.  Mr. Grand said all of the defendants could be expected to appeal, partly on the grounds that U.S. District Judge Robert Carter wouldn't allow testimony from two tax experts that the defendants wished to call.  The defendants are also likely to appeal on the grounds that their attorneys were so limited by the judge in what they could ask Mr. Joseph on cross-examination, that it seemed worthless to do anything at all.  International Mobile Machines Corp. said a Hughes Aircraft Co. unit invested $10 million in the company and received 400,000 shares of a new series of convertible preferred stock.  Philadelphia-based International Mobile said the Hughes unit, Hughes Network Systems Inc., also received warrants to purchase common stock.  Hughes Aircraft is owned by General Motors Corp.  International Mobile, which makes and sells digital radio telephone systems, has 14.1 million shares and one million convertible preferred shares outstanding.  Under terms of the agreement, International Mobile and Hughes Aircraft will cooperatively market and develop digital telephone products.  International Mobile's stock rose 12.5 cents yesterday to close at $9.625 in national over-the-counter trading.  MiniScribe Corp., Longmont, Colo., said it agreed to buy $9 million of secured debt of Domain Technology Inc. at a discount to ensure a supply of disks for its disk drives.  MiniScribe, which has had financial troubles itself and is in the process of restating previous financial results, also said that it will provide Domain with some short-term financing so that Domain can continue to operate.  MiniScribe said that if Domain failed, MiniScribe could have near-term supply problems.  The purchase price for the debt and the amount of financing weren't disclosed.  MiniScribe said one of its units would buy the debt from Bank of New England and Bank of the West in exchange for notes guaranteed by MiniScribe.  Domain, based in Milpitas, Calif., has been operating since late June under protection from creditors under Chapter 11 of the federal Bankruptcy Code.  Tokyo stocks surged, closing near their highs for the day, with the Nikkei average of 225 issues finishing at a record.  London share prices retreated sharply from the day's highs in response to a technical price cutting exercise by market makers and a lackluster showing on Wall Street.  In Tokyo, the Nikkei rose 248.24 points to 34953.87, breaking Thursday's record of 34785.28 points.  The index fell 79.65 points Friday.  In Tokyo Tuesday, the Nikkei index declined 11.24 points, to 34942.63, just after the market opened.  Volume on the first section Monday was estimated at 500 million shares, down from 876.8 million shares Friday.  Turnover fell from last week, when it surged well above one billion shares in three consecutive sessions.  Volume came in at 1.03 billion shares last Tuesday, surpassing the one billion share level, a benchmark of healthy trading, for the first time since June 1.  Brokers said overall market activity was muted yesterday because buying was concentrated in electrical utilities.  Power utilities generally trade on low volume because of their relatively high share prices, though their strong capitalization weighting tends to pull the rest of the market higher, brokers said.  Advancing issues outnumbered decliners 555 to 344, and 198 issues were unchanged.  The Tokyo Stock Price Index of all issues listed in the first section, which gained 1.13 points Friday, was up 22.29 points at 2628.90.  NTT received renewed interest from investors after a protracted slump.  The Nikkei Shinbun reported in its morning edition that the Ministry of Finance has decided to delay an NTT issue.  The Ministry of Finance denied the report but said a suspension of the issue is one option being considered.  Under Japanese law, the ministry has until next March to decide whether to issue new shares.  NTT rose 100,000 yen ($716.59) to close at its high for the day of 1.7 million yen ($12,182).  Investors bought a broad range of stocks.  Among them, those benefiting from the triple merits of lower interest rates, the strong yen and lower oil prices were particularly popular.  Specifically, electric utilities surged on lower oil prices and the outlook for lower interest rates.  Tokyo Electric Power was up 200 yen at 6,330 yen, Chubu Electric gained 150 yen to 4,720 and Kansai Electric Power rose 190 yen to 5,030.  Other issues encouraged by the "triple merit" scenario were construction and steel stocks.  Kumagai Gumi rose 20 yen to 1,700.  Ohbayashi was up 10 yen at 1,920.  Large steel issues were generally mixed.  But smaller steel companies made gains.  Tokyo Steel gained 50 yen to 4,650.  Yamato Kogyo was up 50 yen at 1,940.  Blue-chip electrical stocks were lower last week but were strong yesterday.  Sony was up 20 yen at 7,920 but off from its high for the day of 8,040 yen.  Kyocera rose 90 yen to 6,400.  Fanuc gained 50 yen to 6,650.  Meanwhile, in London, the market opened slightly lower but raced to highs for the day around midday on a mixture of speculative, futures and program buying.  Investor interest dried up during the afternoon, prompting market makers to cut prices in a bid to lure buyers.  The Financial Times-Stock Exchange 100-share index ended at a low for the day of 2297, a decline of 9 points.  At its highest, the index touched 2319.9, a rise of 13.9.  Selling pressure was described as minimal, with most players preferring to hug the sidelines, awaiting a clearer idea of where the market is headed.  "The market just ground to a halt during the afternoon," one trader said.  "It was a total bore."  At the close, the narrower Financial Times 30-share index was down 12.7 points at 1912.1.  Volume amounted to a slim 429.5 million shares, down from 585.7 million Friday.  The 100-share index, which regained its pre-crash levels Friday, slipped back below the psychologically sensitive 2300 point level.  Among the 100-share index stocks, 32 finished higher, 11 unchanged, and the rest lower.  "There was very little for the market to get its teeth into today," one dealer complained.  The market's early lurch forward was underpinned by strong gains in the banking and pharmaceutical sectors, as several dealers were caught short of stock.  In banking, market attention remained firmly fixed on interim earnings figures due later this week from National Westminster Bank, Barclays Bank, and Midland Bank.  Barclays rose 6 pence (10 cents) to 515 ($8.48), Standard Chartered gained 10 pence to 540, and National Westminister rose 1 pence to 327.  Lloyds, which reported interim results last week, began trading ex-dividend and gained 5 pence to 362.  The Royal Bank of Scotland ended 17 pence higher at 427, following news of plans to raise its capital base under the new international capital-adequacy guidelines.  In Frankfurt, share prices closed mixed in sluggish trading after recouping early losses.  Stock prices in Brussels rose in moderate trading, propelling the market index to a record.  Amsterdam share prices closed mixed with sufficient gains to nudge that market's main indicator to a high as well.  Elsewhere, share prices closed higher in Stockholm, lower in Paris, and mixed in Zurich and Milan.  South African gold stocks closed higher.  In Hong Kong, surging real-estate shares led the the market 1.8% higher on the best volume in more than six weeks, helped by strong local property sales and surging overseas equity markets.  Shares in Taipei soared 3.6% in extremely heavy trading, fueled by technical strength and what is perceived as the government's softening stance toward underground investment companies.  In other Asian and Pacific trading, shares closed higher in Singapore, Seoul and Sydney and lower in Manila and Wellington.  Here are price trends on the world's major stock markets, as calculated by Morgan Stanley Capital International Perspective, Geneva.  To make them directly comparable, each index is based on the close of 1969 equaling 100.  The percentage change is since year-end.  @ % This  @ Jul 28 Jul 27 Year  @ U.S. ......................... 315.4 315.3 + 23.1  @ Britain ...................... 696.5 691.5 + 27.5  @ Canada ....................... 432.6 431.9 + 17.8  @ Japan ........................ 1544.2 1544.4 + 8.7  @ France ....................... 524.8 521.2 + 18.6  @ Germany ...................... 243.5 244.9 + 17.1  @ Hong Kong .................... 1897.9 1870.1 - 6.5  @ Switzerland .................. 224.0 221.7 + 29.6  @ Australia .................... 327.2 327.6 + 12.7  @ World index .................. 540.0 540.6 + 9.2  ---  @ Weekly Percentage Leaders  @ Last week's best and worst performing stocks among those issues that make up 80% of the world's stock market capitalization (in local currency)  @ ISSUE (COUNTRY) CLOSE %CHG.  @ WINNING ISSUES  @ Squibb (U.S.) .................... 110.50 + 33.3  @ Bell Group (Australia) ........... 0.85 + 30.8  @ Avis Europe (Britain) ............ 5.76 + 30.6  @ Hattori Seiko (Japan) ............ 3080.00 + 24.2  @ Procordia b Fria (Sweden) ........ 220.00 + 22.2  @ Majorette (France) ............... 265.50 + 19.6  @ Baer Holding Part (Switz'land) ... 550.00 + 19.6  @ Holiday Corp. (U.S.) ............. 69.875 + 18.3  @ Great Eagle (Hong Kong) .......... 3.25 + 18.2  @ LOSING ISSUES  @ Hooker Corp. (Australia) ......... 0.26 - 42.2  @ Bond Corp. Intl (Hong Kong) ...... 1.32 - 23.7  @ ACF Holding (Neth'lands) ......... 49.90 - 15.4  @ Citroen Hispania (Spain) ......... 1375.00 - 13  @ Prime Computer (U.S.) ............ 16.625 - 11.9  @ Amdahl (U.S.) .................... 14.375 - 9.4  @ Bond Corp. (Australia) ........... 0.77 - 9.4  @ Norsk Hydro (Norway) ............. 150.00 - 9.4  @ Klockner-Werke (W.  Germany) ...... 144.50 - 9.1  @ United Scientific Hold. (Britain) 1.30 - 9.1  @ Source: Morgan Stanley Capital Intl.  Perspective  The Senate voted to substantially increase Northrop Corp.'s financial liability to repair technical or manufacturing problems that may beset the B-2 Stealth bomber.  Reflecting concerns by many lawmakers about Northrop's quality-control efforts and the performance of the radar-eluding B-2s, the Senate approved warranty standards believed to be more stringent than those applied to any other major weapons system in recent years.  By a voice vote, the Senate adopted an amendment offered by Sen. Carl Levin (D., Mich.) that could require Northrop, among other things, to give up all of its profit on the next five Stealth bombers if repairs are needed for certain contractor-caused defects.  The amendment doesn't affect the first six B-2s covered by a research and development contract, but it would kick in when low-volume production begins on the next batch of airplanes.  According to Sen. Levin, the Air Force estimates that Northrop could make a profit of about $50 million on each of the aircraft.  But under its current contract with the Pentagon, he said, the firm has a maximum liability of $4 million a plane to fix its own mistakes.  "That's simply unacceptable," Sen. Levin asserted.  "I'm afraid that's not good government."  The amendment gives the defense secretary an escape clause to adhere to a less-stringent standard, but only if he justifies his reasons to Congress.  In Los Angeles, Northrop officials declined comment on the amendment, saying they hadn't had time to study it.  But analysts said it appeared, on first glance at least, that the legislation was more significant politically than financially.  "It's a great way of putting their feet to the fire," said Wolfgang Demisch, of UBS Securities in New York.  But he added that he'd "be very surprised" if the aerospace concern's bottom line was much affected.  Indeed, Mr. Demisch seemed more encouraged than discouraged by the news from Capitol Hill.  He said profits of $50 million-a-plane, depending on how they are measured, suggested slightly better margins than he believed possible so early in a program.  Some, though, said even if Northrop's balance sheet escapes real damage, its stock price could be hurt by the tone of Sen. Levin's amendment.  Congress has "put another knife in and twisted it," said Howard Rubel, an aerospace analyst with Cyrus J. Lawrence Inc.  Sen. John Warner of Virginia, the Republican floor manager for the $305 billion military authorization bill, served notice that he and other lawmakers may try to water down the B-2 warranty provision during talks with House leaders.  In other matters, the Senate today is expected to approve a series of non-binding amendments intended to reduce the cost of keeping U.S. troops overseas.  Lawmakers are likely to demand that President Bush begin negotiations aimed at prodding Japan and South Korea to shoulder billions of dollars of additional costs to keep American soldiers and sailors in Asia.  The Senate, as it struggles to dispose of more than 70 remaining amendments to the defense bill this week, also is expected to include language intended to head off unilateral troop reductions by U.S. allies in Europe.  Lawmakers, in effect, want to mandate U.S. troop cuts in proportion to cutbacks in uniformed strength by European allies, if they occur.  Sen. Sam Nunn (D., Ga.), chairman of the Armed Services Committee, said the message to European leaders will be clear: "If you cut unilaterally, we're not going to be left holding the bag," he said.  ---  Rick Wartzman in Los Angeles contributed to this article.  The House approved a nearly $8.7 billion military construction bill after brushing aside an effort to force delays in base closings that are slated to begin next year.  The final 382-29 vote came as the Democratic-controlled chamber plunged into a more raucous fight over its own budget, driven upward by the rising costs of congressional mail.  By a 246-167 margin, lawmakers rejected a Republican-sponsored cut of 6.25% from the proposed legislative budget for fiscal 1990, but Democrats were forced to take a series of symbolic steps to defuse criticism going into next year's elections.  Under provisions that passed overwhelmingly yesterday, the number of newsletters mailed districtwide would be reduced by one-third, and the proposed mail budget for the fiscal year beginning Oct. 1 would be held to $124.5 million, or more than $10 million below the level first recommended by the House Appropriations Committee.  Even with this cut, funding for congressional mail would more than double from the $53.9 million appropriated this year.  A major part of the increase is owed to a shortfall in the current year's account, but the growing costs make the franking privilege a ready symbol of the power of incumbency so associated with the House.  The Senate, whose members are less dependent on mail, is expected to demand further reductions.  Within the Senate Appropriations Committee, there is pressure this week to cut another $40 million from the House-passed level, and requirements are being considered to force House members to publicly report -- as senators now do -- what is spent by individual offices.  The final bill, approved 291-123, allocates an estimated $1.58 billion for the fiscal 1990 legislative budget, which includes not only the operations of the Capitol but also the Library of Congress and the General Accounting Office.  Within this total, congressional operations would increase more than 12% from the current fiscal year, and mail costs would account for most of this increase.  The boisterous debate is an annual event, with members last night shouting down an effort to cut mailings of calendars to constituents and then seeking to embarrass the Senate for the added cost of maintaining scores of Capitol "hideaway" offices for its members.  The new restrictions on districtwide mailings could save $2 million by cutting the number of annual newsletters to four from six.  But the Democratic leadership preserved the right of members to send practically unlimited "town meeting" notices, which often serve as a device for an incumbent to build visibility at home.  The military construction bill approved earlier in the evening reflects a cut of less than 3% from current funding and adds $143 million to the initial budget submitted by the Bush administration.  Military bases in North Carolina, Texas and California are conspicuous, with the funds added by influential members from those states, and abroad the legislation seeks to influence decisions on a range of issues from the rights of U.S. contractors to moving a tactical air wing in Spain.  As reported by the House Appropriations Committee last week, the measure included a provision seeking to delay closing nearly a dozen bases, but the Democratic leadership forced proponents to back away, at least temporarily.  The issue will be renewed when the GAO completes studies of the estimated savings from several of the most sensitive posts.  FIVE PRINCETON/NEWPORT officials and a former Drexel trader were convicted in the first-ever racketeering trial of securities firm officials.  The six were accused of conspiring to create illegitimate tax losses through prearranged securities trades.  The verdict, a big victory for prosecutors, may spur more indictments for corruption on Wall Street.  ---  Stocks and bonds rallied on speculation that the Fed will drive short-term interest rates down further because of the slowing economy.  The Dow Jones industrials climbed 25.42, to 2660.66, while long-term bonds rose nearly a point.  The dollar slumped.  The prime rate was trimmed to 10.5% from 11% by most major banks.  The long-awaited reduction could finally lower borrowing costs for consumers and small businesses.  ---  A major Coca-Cola holder, Berkshire Hathaway Chairman Warren Buffett, may seek approval to more than double his stake to 15%.  The move could expand Buffett's growing influence at the soft-drink giant.  ---  A new tax package may be proposed by Rostenkowski today that includes a cut in capital-gains taxes.  But it's unclear whether the Ways and Means chairman can get his panel or the House to support the plan.  ---  Chrysler posted a 6.6% rise in second-quarter earnings, but the No. 3 auto maker expects its profit outlook to worsen for the rest of the year.  ---  The Chicago Merc brought disciplinary charges against four traders involving yen trades made with an undercover FBI agent.  The move is likely to anger U.S. prosecutors, who are about to indict some members.  ---  Northrop's financial liability for repairs on the B-2 Stealth bomber would increase substantially under an amendment approved by the Senate.  ---  British Telecom agreed to buy McDonnell Douglas's electronic data-communications unit for $355 million, continuing a big U.S. expansion. ---  Consumer confidence rose in July to its highest level in two decades despite signs of a slowing economy, a Conference Board survey shows.  ---  Texas Air reported a $109.3 million loss for the second quarter, reflecting the strike and subsequent Chapter 11 filing at Eastern Air.  The loss came despite a $250 million gain from the sale of the East Coast shuttle.  ---  B.A.T Industries may be forced to sell off its vast holdings to thwart a $21.8 billion bid by Anglo-French financier Sir James Goldsmith.  ---  Elf Aquitaine settled antitrust objections with U.S. regulators, allowing the French firm to proceed with its $1.05 billion takeover of Pennwalt.  ---  Coors is holding talks with Stroh Brewery about buying some assets.  Analysts say the preliminary discussions probably involve some or all of Stroh's beer brands or breweries.  ---  Wang Labs posted a $374.7 million quarterly loss and said it is trying to renegotiate loan accords with banks.  Wang also suspended its dividends.  ---  Markets --  Stocks: Volume 166,650,000 shares.  Dow Jones industrials 2660.66, up 25.42; transportation 1277.74, up 8.54; utilities 221.20, up 1.38.  Bonds: Shearson Lehman Hutton Treasury index 3372.02, up 26.32.  Commodities: Dow Jones futures index 128.12, up 0.19; spot index 128.48, off 1.42.  Dollar: 136.95 yen, off 2.25; 1.8648 marks, off 0.0157.  Industrial subsidies have been put on the European Community Commission's hit list.  Completing a major review of competition policy, Commissioner Sir Leon Brittan says he will be scrutinizing not only new proposals for national subsidies, but will soon begin a broad review of existing subsidies that may cause unfair competition among community companies.  EC nations annually pump out industrial aid valued at about 3% of gross national product.  The assistance ranges from fat subsidies for auto makers and steel companies to leaner financing for start-up companies, for research or for product launchings on export markets.  In 1986, the most recent year for which data are available, subsidies added up to the equivalent of $109.6 billion, with the agriculture, coal and transportation industries receiving the greatest share.  Sir Leon believes the community's program to create a single market by 1992 will intensify the temptation among member states to try to prop up their less competitive industries.  Reflecting his determination to crack down, the commission last week said it will investigate a revised Dutch aid package for AB Volvo.  "No other EC car manufacturer benefits from such a favorable financial instrument for the development of new car models," the commission declared.  Italy wins the subsidy sweepstakes by a long shot.  In 1986, the country doled out close to $26.31 billion to its industries, more than three times as much as West Germany, four times as much as France and eight times as much as Britain.  The EC says Italian aid is also growing at a faster pace than assistance in the other member states.  Mergers and other cross-border pacts are proliferating in Europe, fueling monopoly fears.  The commission says there were 383 mergers within the community last year, a 26% jump from 1987.  And there were 111 joint-venture agreements, a 23% rise.  The largest number of mergers occurred in the chemical sector, followed by the food-and-drink industry.  Geographically, France witnessed 122 mergers, followed by the United Kingdom with 106, West Germany with 52 and Italy with 49.  Continued concentration of industry at this pace could create serious problems for the planned barrier-free market.  "The anticipated important economic benefits from the single market would be severely restricted if merger activity during the adjustment period increased monopoly power," the competition report concludes.  Sir Leon says he hopes to win stronger EC powers by the end of this year to stop anti-competitive mergers or acquisitions.  Producers of toxic waste in Europe could be made liable for damages.  An expected EC proposal would make companies responsible for damages caused by their waste.  The plan, which one official describes as "revolutionary," is aimed at preventing the lengthy and often inconclusive legal battles that follow accidents or incidents of contamination.  Claimants would still have to prove a link between the company and the waste, but evidence of negligence would no longer be necessary.  The plan, advocated by Environment Commissioner Ripa di Meana, may run into opposition when it goes to EC ministers for approval, although five community governments already have similar rules.  Another hormone ban may spark further trade tensions with the U.S.  An 18-month-to-two-year "moratorium" on use of the controversial new hormone bovine somatotropin, or BST, is expected to be announced soon.  The hormone can boost cows' milk production as much as 25%.  Brussels argues that the delay will allow more time for scientific studies on possible health risks.  But the U.S. links the BST issue to the EC ban on hormones in meat, and warns the trade bloc against decisions that aren't scientifically justified.  Although the U.S. likely would suffer little or no damage from a BST ban, Washington fears the move could set a dangerous precedent for future technological developments in farming.  The U.S. is expected to authorize the hormone soon. 